" double quote string "
"" can mess up subobject access and is used by MongoDB internally.
"' URL could not be accessed: " .
"0" bit is found at position 7.
"4" as key is taken as key 4 9.2 as key is truncated to key 9 "12.8" as key is treated as key with that string, NOT truncated and made int 12 NULL as key becomes key ""
"December 18, 1969 8:49:59 AM PST",
"Russia" in Cyrillic with Latin spoof characters
"_" taken as default prefix
"a", // This will make the test pass
"as Circle" is redundant
"auto" is expanded to "ASCII,JIS,UTF-8,EUC-JP,SJIS"
"auto" may be used, which expands to "ASCII,JIS,UTF-8,EUC-JP,SJIS".
"comment" NodeList, NamedNodeMap
"domain" - The domain of the cookie.
"double quoted string"
"frameworks" directory will be created automatically on first git clone of a framework.
"hi" gzdeflated
"httponly" - The cookie can only be accessed through the HTTP protocol.
"man 3 clock_getres" for more details.
"man 3 clock_gettime" for more details.
"path" - The path where information is stored.
"secure" - The cookie should only be sent over secure connections.
"this is a hebrew string"
"this is an arabic string"
' and " are escaped only if they are not paired.
' coverage for ' .
' is broken.
'" listed for update is not installed.
'' as linkname
'00000' means no error.
'B' in ISO-8859-1, x42
'a' gzdeflated
'e' is the base of the natural system of logarithms, or approximately 2.718282.
'false' sets the parser to strictly parse strings into dates.
'include_path' set to true
'input' array containing objects as elements
'input' array containing references to above variables
'parent' doesn't change 'static'
'php' or 'soapval'
'self' doesn't change 'static'
'this' as a method parameter is treated as the 'static' type when type checking within the given method.
'wrogn param' is converted to true
'z' must be set explicitly in this function.
- 1: RegexIterator::USE_KEY
- Blacklist tests that are causing problems with this script running.
- Decide whether proxy-based code needs to be solidified better or whether we should just add the frameworks to our repo officially.
- Diff files showing the tests names and results that are different than expected for the test suite.
- Enhanced data output by the script to include "diff" type information about why a passing percentage is different from a previous run, particularly from a regression perspective.
- Error files showing all the errors and failures from running the test, suite or the fatal if the framework fatals.
- It is possible to pass parameters to the shutdown function by passing additional parameters.
- Multiple test suites are run in separate processes, making the entire testing process a bit faster.
- Raw statistics for each test suite are put in a raw results file for examination.
- RecursiveRegexIterator::REPLACE: none.
- RegexIterator::REPLACE: none.
- Run a single test suite, all of the test suites or a custom set of multiple test suites.
- SIG_SETMASK: Replace the currently blocked signals by the given list of signals.
- SIG_UNBLOCK: Remove the signals from the currently blocked signals.
- Stepping out of destructors.
- Stepping out of iterator methods.
- Stepping over instructions that call iterator methods.
- Stepping over the return from a generator
- Stepping over the return from an async
- Timeout option for running individual tests.
- Zero or more parameters to be passed to the callback.
- Zero or more parameters to be passed to the function.
- `age_timeout_micros`: The maximum age, in microseconds, that a connection in the pool will be allowed to reach before being destroyed.
- `expiration_policy`: A `string` of either `'IdleTime'` or `'Age'" that specifies whehter connections in the pool will be destroyed based on how long it sits idle or total age in the pool.
- `idle_timeout_micros`: The maximum amount of time, in microseconds, that a connection is allowed to sit idle in the pool becore being destroyed.
- `pool_connection_limit`: The maximum number of connections allowed in the pool.
- lets leave that to dedicated tests
- this gives a different control flow inside PDO
- when the day is not the same as the day on the original date:
---- same tests for byKey variants ----
-1 - Query succeeded, no more results coming.
-1 if server is not started.
-1 indicates that the query has returned an error.
-1 indicates that the query returned an error.
-1 is just a valid filename on windows
-1 is used for any depth.
-3662  - should be 108043200
-n - print function nesting depth
-ve size value 2.
-ve value for width
...and use them again.
..and a point on background
..and modify original
..create a clone of it ..Clone
.num_elems elements
//  4 Should match
0 if server is failed, non-zero otherwise
0 is stdin, 1 is stdout, while 2 is stderr.
0 reports less false-positives.
0 should give 0, other falsey things are null
0 wait for any child process whose process group ID is equal to that of the calling process.
0 will be considered as FALSE and removed in default callback
0, 0 is the top left corner of the image.
01100110 in binary
0: Do nothing
0b10 now becomes 0b11
0x1111111111111111111111,
1 - same as 0 but only byte-values with a frequency greater than zero are listed.
1 Driver specific error code.
1 Driver-specific error code.
1 item req, 1 rm'ed
1 message is sent by email to the address in the destination parameter.
1 sub, A0 is not valid as sole/first byte
1 sub, no consume last
1.0 is fully opaque and 0.0 is fully transparent.
1.flag value as default 2.SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally
1.flag value as defualt 2.SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally To test the new keys for the elements in the sorted array.
10 Should match
100 pseudo-random bits generated offline.
10000 zvals collected automatic
1000000, // works, but test would take too long
10101010 in binary
1072915200 this prints the year in a two digit format however, as this would start with a "0", it only prints "4"
11 Should match
11001100 in binary
12 Second should match
1234567890ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
13 Should not match
13 chunk, random
14 Three should match
15 Two should match
16 Four should match
16/June/2006
17 Should match
18 Two should match
19 Three should match
1: Function call
2  No longer an option.
2 - same as 0 but only byte-values with a frequency equal to zero are listed.
2 3 5 4 6 Insert at the beginning and end of the DLL
2 Driver specific error message.
2 Driver-specific error message.
2 possibilities, phpunit.xml and phpunit.xml.dist for configuration
2 read to get on the 2nd node
2 sub as 2nd is potentially valid as lead
2 sub, as 2nd is potentially valid as lead
2 sub, no consume last
20 Should match
2000 pixels per color stripe
21 Should not match
21 chars Japanese string, 21 characters
22 - invalid argument
22 Should match
23 Should match
24 Two should match
25 March 2012, transition to DST
25 Two should match
26 Should match
272 characters
28 Feb 2008 12:00:00
28 October 2012, transition from DST
2: Method call
2nd call ignored
2nd maximum subnormal double
2nd minumum subnormal double
3  message is appended to the file destination.
3 - a string containing all unique characters is returned.
3 6 Insert in the middle of the DLL
3 Should match
3 Static Arrays
3 would be the next element
32 is an arbitrary limit to avoid going above the maximum command line length
32-bit systems
3: IndexArrayMap
4  message is sent directly to the SAPI logging handler.
4 - a string containing all not used characters is returned.
4 good ones
4: MethodExists
5 First three should match
5 chunk, no newline
5 minutes should be enough even for a debug build on a slow machine.
5.4.0  Iterator support was added, as mysqli_result now implements Traversable.
5: Field Access
5C should be escaped
6 Should not match
64 elements
64-bit systems
64bit systems
6: Array Access
7 Should match
76 996   line-break-chars string  Specifies the sequence of characters to append to each line as an end-of-line sign when "folding" is performed on a long header field.
7: Closures et al
8 Should not match
9 Should not match
A "Locale" is an identifier used to get language, culture, or regionally-specific  behavior from an API.
A "Locale" is an identifier used to get language, culture, or regionally-specific behavior from an API.
A Compatibility library with PHP 5.5's simplified password hashing API.
A E_WARNING level error will be generated on failure.
A ImmMap cannot be mutated.
A ImmVector cannot be mutated.
A JavaScript implementation of the DeltaBlue constraint-solving algorithm, as described in:  "The DeltaBlue Algorithm: An Incremental Constraint Hierarchy Solver" Bjorn N.
A PEM formatted private key.
A Plan is an ordered list of constraints to be executed in sequence to resatisfy all currently satisfiable constraints in the face of one or more changing inputs.
A base class for connection, query and error results.
A binary function should not expect a null terminated string, and it should treat input as a raw stream of data
A bit painful in php, exposing the IDs might be better if this is hot
A blank line in a CSV file will be returned as an array comprising a single null field, and will not be treated as an error.
A case for the emitter to get right.
A class extending from SessionHandler allows you to override the methods or intercept or filter them by calls the parent class methods which ultimately wrap the interal PHP session handlers.
A class on the first level in the inheritance chain
A class on the second level in the inheritance chain
A class representing a variable or object for use with SOAP services.
A class that handles prepared statements for the SQLite 3 extension.
A class that handles result sets for the SQLite 3 extension.
A class that interfaces SQLite 3 databases.
A class to represent a row.
A class to represent an iterator over the rows of a `AsyncMysqlRowBlock`.
A class value of 01 indicates a warning and is accompanied by a return code of SQL_SUCCESS_WITH_INFO.
A common use for this is to execute something like the pbmplus utilities that can output an image stream directly.
A concise syntax for getting a collection with a dot-separated name.
A connection between PHP and MongoDB.
A connection manager for PHP and MongoDB.
A constrained variable.
A constraint may be appended to the plan when all its input variables are known.
A cursor is used to iterate through the results of a database query.
A cursor typically fetches a batch of result objects and store them locally.
A database file object.
A database reference is just a normal associative array, not an instance of MongoDBRef, so this class is a little different than the other data type classes.
A date is considered valid if each parameter is properly defined.
A failed server will have its corresponding entry set to FALSE.
A file archive, compressed with Zip.
A first element
A fun test for type inference.
A limit of -1, 0 or NULL means "no limit" and, as is standard across PHP, you can use NULL to skip to the flags parameter.
A list of the flags can found under FilesystemIterator predefined constants.
A long chain of equality constraints is constructed with a stay constraint on one end.
A lot of behaviour needs to be specialcased to collections.
A lower numerical value causes more favorable scheduling.
A maximum of 8192 uncompressed bytes will be read at a time.
A micro second is one millionth of a second.
A much more intense test on lengths
A multi-byte character is counted as 1.
A negative value can be used to move backwards through the file which is useful when SEEK_END is used as the whence value.
A new month was started when the new moon was first observed.
A newline is not automatically added to the end of the message string.
A non-static closure has a bound instance if it has a scope and doesn't have an instance if it has no scope
A nonblocking test whether a connection has completed, or errored out.
A pass case.
A poor man's FileUtil::canonicalize in PHP
A positive increment will lower the priority of the current process, whereas a negative increment will raise the priority.
A process attempting to acquire a semaphore which it has already acquired will block forever if acquiring the semaphore would cause its maximum number of semaphore to be exceeded.
A query can optionally be nested in a "query" field if other options, such as a sort or hint, are given.
A row block is either a full or partial set of result rows from a MySQL query.
A scheduler can be used to schedule a set of tasks based on their relative priorities.
A second variant will take three additional parameters that define the cost of insert, replace and delete operations.
A simple duck typing example
A simple implementation of lossless compression and decompression using Huffman coding.
A simple package of data that is manipulated by the tasks.
A small array based on PHP_OS should cover a majority of systems and makes the problem of locales transparent for the end user.
A specific HPHPC bug constant propagated the value of this 'foo' to the abstract constant declaration 'I::foo'
A splay tree is a self-balancing binary search tree with the additional property that recently accessed elements are quick to access again.
A stream of JSON objects in a format that Facebook's test systems understand.
A task control block manages a task and the queue of work packages associated with it.
A task that manipulates work packets and then suspends itself.
A task that manipulates work packets.
A task that suspends itself after each time it has been run to simulate waiting for data from an external device.
A tile is an image used to fill an area with a repeated pattern.
A timeout can be set at any time and will affect subsequent queries on the cursor, including fetching more results from the database.
A timeout of zero is interpreted as an infinite timeout.
A timer that periodically interrupts a request thread.
A trait that has a abstract function
A type specifier that says what type the argument data should be treated as.
A typical network connection is made up of 2 sockets, one performing the role of the client, and another performing the role of the server.
A unary input constraint used to mark a variable that the client wishes to change.
A unique identifier created for database objects.
A valid json string
A valid key is a string containing a variable name and a valid value is either a filter type, or an array optionally specifying the filter, flags and options.
A valid signature is absolutely required of all executable phar archives if the phar.require_hash INI variable is set to true.
A wait handle representing a condition variable waiting for a notification
A wait handle representing asynchronous execution of async function
A wait handle representing asynchronous execution of async generator
A wait handle representing asynchronous operation
A wait handle that can be waited upon
A wait handle that can resume execution of PHP code
A wait handle that is always finished
A wait handle that succeeds with null after the desired timeout expires
A wait handle that succeeds with null once desired scheduling priority is eligible for execution
A wait handle that waits for a list of other wait handles
A warning will be emitted if a value has the wrong type, and the key/value pair in question will not be flipped.
ADD THE 2 HANDLES
AF_INET6 IPv6 Internet based protocols.
AF_UNIX Local communication protocol family.
ALERT TABLE
ALTER LOGFILE GROUP Syntax 11.1.3.
ALTER LOGFILE GROUP Syntax 13.1.4.
ALTER SERVER Syntax 11.1.5.
ALTER TABLESPACE Syntax 11.1.8.
ALTER TABLESPACE Syntax 13.1.9.
API insert id will be 101 because of UPDATE, SQL unchanged
API to tell this linter which lines were changed
API version 1.1.0 is required for SHA-256 and SHA-512 hash, and API version 1.1.1 is required to store empty directories.
ASCII value in binary form
ASCII value of '3' given
Absolute path
Absolute path.
Absolute paths are assumed to be attempts to load external files from the filesystem.
Absolute paths.
Abstract base interface that cannot be implemented alone.
Abstract class
Abstract method in "normal" class
Abstract method with body
Abstract superclass for constraints having a single possible output variable.
Abstract superclass for constraints having two possible output variables.
Accept a connection.
Accept connection 1
Accept connection 2
Accept that connection
Access entities and notations with values.
Access not existing
Access publicId, systemId, name, internalSubset all with values.
Access via FT_UID
Accessing a nested shape-like array with non static key in non lvalue position doesn't change the array type - usage that should report errors.
Accessing a nested shape-like array with non static key in non lvalue position doesn't change the array type - usage with no errors.
Accessing a shape-like array with non static key in non lvalue position doesn't change the array type - usage that should report errors.
Accessing a shape-like array with non static key in non lvalue position doesn't change the array type - usage with no errors.
Accessing a tuple-like array with dynamic key in non lvalue position doesn't change the array type - usage that should report errors.
Accessing a tuple-like array with dynamic key in non lvalue position doesn't change the array type - usage with no errors.
Accessing fields/passing shapes to functions doesn't change the "known fields" property
According to the DOM standard this requires a DTD which defines the attribute ID to be of type ID.
According to the manual we should get an int but as of today we do get a string...
According to the memcached protocol spec these additional arguments "are subject to change for the convenience of memcache developers".
ActRec functions have a specific structure
Activate the fast drawing antialiased methods for lines and wired polygons.
Activate this constraint and attempt to satisfy it.
Activates the circular reference collector.
Actually send a command to the server.
Actually this value is set only if the process finds it is the only process currently attached to the semaphore.
Adapted from ext/hash/tests/hash_equals.php to remove clowny error tests
Adapted from ext/standard/tests/file/stream_001.php Removed 2/3 spammy warnings
Add "Foo Comment" as comment for the foo entry
Add ADD_DLLS to add extra DLLs like dynamic dependencies for standard  deps.
Add FILE section closing tag to the test case
Add a clean section to the test case
Add a default timezone, because Symfony requires a default timezone in the default php.ini
Add a handler task to this scheduler.
Add a key/value Pair to this Map.
Add a newline to the fatal file if we had a post-test fatal for better visual
Add a preheader to the loop to get interesting behavior.
Add a skipif section to the test case
Add a work task to this scheduler.
Add an EXPECTF section
Add an INI section to the test case
Add an idle task to this scheduler.
Add another text node to title.
Add code snippets here Call them from MeasureBasicOps.php to collect relative CPU time stats
Add constructor argument initialisation to test case
Add entries in the LDAP directory.
Add function or method initilaisation statements to the test case
Add in SQLite module
Add is constprop, and generally a PEI
Add leaf nodes for each symbol to the priority queue.
Add line of code to current helper
Add line of code to current opcode handler
Add microbenchmarks to BasicOps.php and add calls to them here
Add new attribute in a new namespace
Add new attribute w/o namespace
Add required oauth provider parameters.
Add some items to the list
Add the given constraint to the set of all constraints that refer this variable.
Add the indent
Add the new node to the queue.
Add the specified packet to the end of the worklist used by the task associated with the packet and make the task runnable if it is currently suspended.
Add the specified task and mark it as running.
Add the specified task to this scheduler.
Add the test section to call the function
Add this constraint to the constraint graph
Add this packet to the end of a worklist, and return the worklist.
Add to the section text.
Add up these numbers to specify needed rights.
Adding an attribute and leaving one off
Additional attributes will also be contained in the resulting array dependant on the value of type.
Additional required extensions
Additionally it is possible to iterate over the current iterator entry.
Additionally, a warning will be issued.
Additionally, not all platforms support negative timestamps, so your date range may be limited to no earlier than the Unix epoch.
Additionally, one or more flags can be specified to modify the behaviour of the function.
Additionally, the port will contain the port of the remote host in the case of an unconnected AF_INET or AF_INET6 socket.
Adds a SOAP header to be returned with the response to the current request.
Adds a pattern to the generator.
Adds an element to this Set and returns itself.
Adds an entry to a log file that's written when server crashes.
Adds new attribute node attr to element.
Adds one extra argument.
Adds one or more attributes to the specified dn.
Adds setting to the server environment.
Adds the key/value Pairs produced by the specified Iterable to this Map.
Adds the keys of the specified KeyedContainer to the end of this Vector using the next available integer keys.
Adds the keys of the specified KeyedContainer to this Set.
Adds the keys of the specified container to this Set and returns the Set.
Adds the keys of the specified container to this Vector and returns the Vector.
Adds the specified key/value Pair to this Map.
Adds the specified value to the end of this Vector using the next available integer key.
Adds the specified value to this Set.
Adds the values produced by the specified Iterable to the end of this Vector using the next available integer keys.
Adds the values produced by the specified Iterable to this Set.
Adds this constraint to the constraint graph
Adds this constraint to the constraint graph.
Adjust ODBC settings
Advance the iterator to the next row.
Advance this iterator forward one position.
Advance to the first valid element contained in a child iterator
Advantage mysqlnd - see above
Advantage mysqlnd - see above...
After a timeout period, we do return as normal.
After being split, this node will contain all the content up to the offset.
After enabling SKIP_PASV_IP flag, the following output will be seen..
After processing a request, any semaphores acquired by the process but not explicitly released will be released automatically and a warning will be generated.
After remaining idle on the server for some amount of time, cursors, by default, "die." This is generally the behavior one wants.
After removing the semaphore, it is no more accessible.
Again, I'd like to see an error message
Alias for __construct
Alias for real_escape_string
Alias of getmxrr
Alias of mysqli_options
Alias of mysqli_real_escape_string
Alias of odbc_exec
Alias of odbc_field_len
All  write and create with write modes 2.
All Rights Reserved.
All bindings remain intact after reset.
All classes and interfaces are referred to by their corresponding namespaces.
All constructors should be registered as such
All data will be destroyed.
All instances created with the same persistent_id will share the same connection.
All iterators share a token that becomes invalidated the minute the container is mutated.
All methods are the same as the base `AsyncMysqlException`.
All numerical array keys will be modified to start counting from zero while literal keys won't be touched.
All of the following columns are "too hot" - too server dependent
All of the functions/methods  provided are static.
All of the functions/methods provided are static.
All of these periods are equivalent.
All of these should throw.
All other vales will return null and throw undefined property notice.
All other vales will throw undefined property notice and ignore value.
All read and append modes 2.
All resources are read-only.
All result memory will be automatically freed when the script terminates.
All rights reserved.
All string data must be UTF-8 encoded.
All strings are the same when displayed in their respective encodings
All strings going into the database should be UTF8.
All strings sent to the database must be UTF-8.
All tests complete.
All the standard formats including offsets
All these settings will also go into the environment for tests that are directly executed, so you can also set things like PHPRC here to force an executable to use a specific php.ini file.
All typing from Foo is lost.
All values are treated as PDO::PARAM_STR.
All values come back as `string`s.
All variable-types are supported.
All we can do is make a few dummy calls to ensure that all codes gets executed which checks the flag.
Allocate with function entry/exit
Allocate without function entry/exit
Allow T_POW
Allow delayed implementation for abstract classes
Allow for either Win32 or Unix.
Allow the Tany from a missing return type
Allow the Tany from an untemplated array
Allow the garbage collector to reclaim the memory used by the splay tree no matter how we exit the tear down function.
Allows detailed specification of the modifications to perform.
Allows you to disable an already defined stream wrapper.
Allows you to disable standard libxml errors and enable user error handling.
Almost everything that is not a CRUD operation can be done with a database command.
Alpha channel is not supported by all browsers, if you have problem with your browser, try to load your script with an alpha channel compliant browser, e.g. latest Mozilla.
Also also works on objects.
Also assume that tests will be found by reflecting over the framework.
Also check that foreign arrays work for indirect calls
Also fine because the attributes aren't required and don't have defaults
Also note that PHP internally stores integer values as signed values of a machine-dependent size.
Also note that string positions start at 0, and not 1.
Also returns FALSE on failure.
Also verifies that everything is where it is supposed to be.
Also, JP2 files may contain multiple JPEG 2000 codestreams.
Also, ZipArchive::FL_UNCHANGED may be ORed to it to request information about the original file in the archive, ignoring any changes made.
Also, if the first character in a range has a higher ASCII value than the second character in the range, no range will be constructed.
Also, in practice, once you've unset a property in hhbbc's current type system, it will end up at TCell, so we can't really see this.
Also, the beginning of a year varied from one culture to another - not all accepted January as the first month.
Also, this function requires root privileges.
Also, you may want to read the section on variables from external sources.
Alternate between English and French meals
Alternation 3.
Alternatively one might chose to entirely override a method like the garbage collection callback gc.
Alternatively, a DSN-less connection string can be used.
Alternatively, a file extension may be specified with the second parameter.
Alternatively, the debug member can be set to a non-FALSE value to turn debug on.
Alternatively, the debug property can be set to a FALSE value to turn debug off.
Alternatively, the sslChecks member can be set to FALSE to turn SSL checks off.
Alternatively, the sslChecks member can be set to a non-FALSE value to turn SSL checks off.
Although this function can handle dates all the way back to 4713 B.C., such use may not be meaningful.
Although this function can handle dates all the way back to 4714 B.C., such use may not be meaningful.
Although this function is only documented as having a single parameter, you may pass additional arguments to this function.
Although we have changed the value, the property was declared in the class.
Always use the generated libtool - Mac OSX uses 'glibtool'
Ambiguous, but mostly PHP compat since PHP version lacks distinct setters
An ImagickPixel object or a string representing the target color.
An SplFileOjbect does not have children
An UID is a unique identifier that will not change over time while a message sequence number may change whenever the content of the mailbox changes.
An XHP attribute annoted as "string" can contain Stringish values for now
An `AsyncMysqlConnectResult` provides information about the timing for creating the current connection.
An `AsyncMysqlErrorResult` can occur due to `'TimedOut'`, representing a timeout, or `'Failed'`, representing the server rejecting the connection or query.
An abstract method shouldn't contain code
An active connection to a MySQL instance.
An additional grant of patent rights can be found in the PATENTS file in the same directory.
An alias for gettext.
An append item format is a pattern used to append a field if there is no good match.
An array may be used to designate multiple needles.
An array may be used to designate multiple replacements.
An array of filenames
An array of files
An array of names, which will be passed as a dir name
An array of prefixes
An array value will be FALSE if the filter fails, or NULL if the variable is not set.
An asynchronous MySQL client.
An asynchronous MySQL connection pool.
An edit constraint is then added to the opposite end and the time is measured for adding and removing this constraint, and extracting and executing a constraint satisfaction plan.
An empty string if no error occurred.
An error will be raised if the search parameter is not an array.
An event can include a connection, an error condition, a query, etc.
An example:    Get next batch send errors  Code: 1  Could not send the query to the database.
An exception object will be passed to the function
An idle task doesn't do any work itself but cycles control between the two device tasks.
An immutable ordered collection where values are keyed using integers 0 thru n-1 in order.
An immutable ordered dictionary-style collection.
An immutable ordered set-style collection.
An input constraint is one that depends on external state, such as the mouse, the keybord, a clock, or some arbitraty piece of imperative code.
An invalid address likely to crash PHP due to stack exhaustion if it goes to the validation regex.
An invalid category name also causes a warning message.
An invalid json string which will cause an syntax error, in this case we used ' instead of " for quotation
An iterator implementation for iterating over a Map.
An iterator implementation for iterating over a Set.
An iterator implementation for iterating over a Vector/ImmVector.
An object that can be used to store or retrieve binary data from the database.
An optional alignment specifier that says if the result should be left-justified or right-justified.
An optional padding specifier that says what character will be used for padding the results to the right string size.
An optional query string may be used to specify extra options.
An ordered collection where values are keyed using integers 0 thru n-1 in order.
An ordered dictionary-style collection.
An ordered set-style collection.
An out-of-band data transmission mechanism may be supported.
An unprivileged process may only set its soft limit to a value from 0 to the hard limit, and irreversibly lower its hard limit.
An unsuccessful call returns null.
And all results are packaged back in a single batch.
And as of PHP 5.4.0, call-time pass-by-reference was removed, so using it will raise a fatal error."
And better support for folding.
And here, we need to make sure, that the traits behave the same
And now a good one that will work
And now allow the evil to do his work
And now native PS
And now the collection-y type settings
And now without parameters...
And return the sorted array.
And so should the combination of both
And that's: no connection.
And the main source directory 'PHPUnit' was changed to 'src'.
And you can turn off wordwrap by passing in 0.
And, if that happens, we will always be redownloading the framework since the SHA is different than what we expect.
Anonymous shape parameter type hint
Anonymous shape return type
Another HPHP extension, implicit fields.
Another PHP comment
Another variation of the theme
Another wrapper function, this one should be used any time a particular test passes or fails
Answer a collection of unsatisfied constraints sorted in order of decreasing strength.
Answer the constraint that this constraint overrides, if there is one, or nil, if there isn't.
Answer true if this constraint is satisfied in the current solution.
Any additional characters beyond 1024 bytes will be truncated.
Any combination of ReflectionMethod::IS_STATIC, ReflectionMethod::IS_PUBLIC, ReflectionMethod::IS_PROTECTED, ReflectionMethod::IS_PRIVATE, ReflectionMethod::IS_ABSTRACT, ReflectionMethod::IS_FINAL.
Any expression which do not return nodes will return an empty DOMNodeList.
Any failed MCRouter action will throw an instance of MCRouterException
Any of those shall fail - see also bugs.php.net/43568
Any return value is fine.
Any selection of N outside this range will be truncated to the nearest limit.
Any special environment settings  these may overwrite the test defaults...
Any special ini settings  these may overwrite the test defaults...
Any special ini settings these may overwrite the test defaults...
Any strings that are not set will simply be skipped.
Any system resources used by the child are freed.
Any test names after that line are probably detailed error information.
Any whitespace in the format string matches any whitespace in the input stream.
Any whitespace in the format string matches any whitespace in the input string.
Any whitespace in the format string matches any whitespace in the line from the file.
Anything goes in XHP
Anyway, the typehint is currently only for optimization purposes at this point in time.
Apparently, all iterators that store other iterators are forced to do this layer of caching.
Append a copy of a value to the end of the Vector, assigning the next available integer key.
Append a value to the hash, with the next-highest available numeric key.
Append the string data to the end of the character data of the node.
Appending to a vector-like array makes it unsafe to return it as original generic type.
Appends raw XML data to a DOMDocumentFragment.
Applies a convolution matrix on the image, using the given coefficient and offset.
Applies gamma correction to the given gd image given an input and an output gamma.
Applies the user-defined function funcname to each element of the input array.
Arbitrary - must not be UTC, and better if it's not where you are, or where tests are run
Argument is not a shape
Arguments greater than maximum no.of ags
Arguments less than minimum no.of args
Arguments more than expected
Array Access
Array indices can be accessed as properties in read/write
Array keys correspond to host:port of server and values contain the individual server statistics.
Array keys correspond to stats parameters and values to parameter's values.
Array keys: "sec" - seconds since the Unix Epoch "usec" - microseconds "minuteswest" - minutes west of Greenwich "dsttime" - type of dst correction
Array of Regexes
Array of available fruits
Array of locations in Europe
Array of options
Array representing a possible record set returned from a database
Array to be sorted
Array with data for sorting.
Array with data for testing
Array with default and assigned keys
Array with duplicate string and integer keys
Array with duplicate string and integer keys and values
ArrayAccess
ArrayObject::__construct hasn't run
Arrays and objects are explored recursively with values indented to show structure.
Arrays that have been referenced to each other
Arrays with regular values
As a convenience, this class also implements the Iterator interface, allowing the collection of values to be navigated using the methods defined in that interface.
As a result, gd automatically blends the existing color at that point with the drawing color, and stores the result in the image.
As a rule of thumb your code should always be able to work correctly if assertion checking is not activated.
As an example, if you want to edit the global config.json file.
As error levels are added, the range of integers increases, so older integer-based error levels will not always behave as expected.
As it is, even with invariants and various ifs to guarantee the type, HHHBC is not able to infer the property type.
As of PHP 5.1.0
As of PHP 5.3.0, PHP contains its own implementation and will use that if the system lacks of support for one or more of the algorithms.
As soon as HHVM is changed to "normal" Zend behavior, these tests need to be edited/removed
As such, this test had to be slightly modified.
As we can't fix it, we document how it has behaved from the first day on.
As with all functionality that modifies the contents of a phar, the phar.readonly INI variable must be off in order to succeed if the file is within a Phar archive.
Ask phabricator to display it on the diff UI
Ask the user to provide an email address, so that QA team can contact the user
Assert false
Assert false and bail
Assert not active
Assertions should be used as a debugging feature only.
Assertions should not be used for normal runtime operations like input parameter checks.
Assign in case it's a DateTimeImmutable
Assign to var
Assignment to array makes it unsafe to return it as original generic type
Associative array with numeric keys
Associative array with string keys
Associative arrays
Assume that it is satisfied.
Assume this constraint is satisfied.
Assume user code will contain the elements for file and line.
Assume: I am not already satisfied.
Assume: c is satisfied.
Assume: sources are all satisfied.
Assuming this is from GNU Tar
Astronomically low chance of a false positive here, and making sure we don't accidentally return a constant value is worth it.
At least IIS can be configured to do this.
At most two GridFSFile chunks will be loaded in memory.
At that point, this function will return the chosen secondary.
At the end of the request the environment is restored to its original state.
At the time of this test's creation, this sequence of code generated redundant loads from the property for the CGetM and the SetM.
At the time this test was added, this function could sink increfs into conditional exits of a region, which tests jcc service requests that have the jcc and the stub in the same code block.
Attach metadata to the caller's stack frame.
Attempt to find a way to enforce this constraint.
Attempt to satisfy the given constraint and, if successful, incrementally update the dataflow graph.
Attempting to assign to a property of type 'this' will fail if they are not the same expression dependent type.
Attempts to change the group of the file filename to group.
Attempts to change the group of the symlink filename to group.
Attempts to change the mode of the specified file to that given in mode.
Attempts to change the owner of the file filename to user user.
Attempts to change the owner of the symlink filename to user user.
Attempts to create the directory specified by pathname.
Attempts to load an SQLite extension library.
Attempts to remove the directory named by dirname.
Attempts to rename oldname to newname.
Attempts to set the access and modification times of the file named in the filename parameter to the value given in time.
Attribute 'att1' for element 'tag1'
Attributes include the image width, height, size, and others.
Autocommit was off - by definition.
Autoincrementing does not work well with a sharded database, as it is impossible to find what the next number should be quickly.
Automatically convert results to numbers.
Available address/protocol families Domain Description AF_INET IPv4 Internet based protocols.
Available flags Flag Description FILE_USE_INCLUDE_PATH Search for filename in the include directory.
Available since PHP 4.3.10 and PHP 5.0.3.
Available since PHP 5.1.0 and Libxml 2.6.7.
Available socket types Type Description SOCK_STREAM Provides sequenced, reliable, full-duplex, connection-based byte streams.
Average delay between when a callback is scheduled in the MySQL client and when it's actually ran, in microseconds.
Average loop time of the MySQL client event, in microseconds.
Avoid actually writing anything to disk, Just make sure the calling semantics work
B B   input-charset string  Specifies the character set in which the first parameter field_name and the second parameter field_value are presented.
B always changes 'static'
BEGIN MANUAL SECTION
BELOW THIS ISN'T PART OF THE ZEND API.
BIG5 950 Traditional Chinese, mainly used in Taiwan.
BIG5-HKSCS  Big5 with Hong Kong extensions, Traditional Chinese.
BIG5-HKSCS Big5 with Hong Kong extensions, Traditional Chinese.
BSD's answer to this one.
BSON document: end
BSON document: length
BUG FIX NEEDED: Due to some recent updates to Reflection, this default method for finding tests in frameworks is failing for certain frameworks.
BUG: there's no call to parent::__construct
Backtracing while having cycle
Bad DN value
Bad DN value with attributes
Bad DN value without attributes
Bad format strings are usually the cause of the latter.
Bad function.
Bad param name.
Bad param type.
Bad parameter
Base comment block
Based on MediaWiki's ApiFormatWddxTest The omitted data in the "b" variable previously caused a fatal error
Based on ext/zlib/tests/zlib_wrapper_flock_basic.php except that locking actually works in HHVM, where it fails in PHP
Based on the internal implementations or the files in the examples subdirectory there are also some .php files to experiment with.
Basic Xenon test.
Basic test case for a PHP function
Basic test for preg_replace_callback
Basically, if you see a call to spl_dual_it_fetch in the PHP source, it's very likely that you should call this.
Basically, it defines two collections: files, for file metadata, and chunks, for file content.
Baz::f is inconsistent with Foo:f, but we don't detect this error because we only check the direct parent of a class for consistency.
Be aware that all executable phar archives must contain .phar in their filename.
Be aware that no non-executable archives cannot contain .phar in their filename.
Be careful if you choose to escape characters 0, a, b, f, n, r, t and v.
Be warned, be careful.
Because a `Pair` is immutable by default, this just returns the current object.
Because of eccentricities in the performance of libresolv between platforms, DNS_ANY will not always return every record, the slower DNS_ALL will collect all records more reliably.
Because of the MessageFormatter class, the program does not need to know the order of the fragments.
Because of the way splay trees work, the engine also has to deal with a lot of changes to the large tree object graph.
Because of this, it may be best to reserve this function for servers which explicitly require preallocation.
Because the SessionHandler wraps the current internal save handler methods, the above example of encryption can be applied to any internal save handler without having to know the internals of the handlers.
Because these archives do not contain a stub and cannot be executed by the phar extension, it is possible to create and manipulate regular zip and tar files using the PharData class even if phar.readonly php.ini setting is 1.
Before 5.3.6, the only values recognized are TRUE or FALSE, which are the same as setting or not setting the DEBUG_BACKTRACE_PROVIDE_OBJECT option respectively.
Before displaying a customized PHP page, one may call this function to clear previously written content, so to replay what will be displayed.
Begin an async connection to a MySQL instance.
Begin running a query on the MySQL database client.
Begin running a query with multiple statements.
Behave like a builtin function so that we pass Zend's tests
Below is a list of interfaces/classes already availabel natively through the SPL extension grouped by category.
Benchmark results hold the benchmark and the measured time used to run the benchmark.
Besides carrying data, packets form linked lists and are hence used both as data and worklists.
Besides the blank character this also includes tab, vertical tab, line feed, carriage return and form feed characters.
Beware: this benchmark is written in a grotesque style where the constraint model is built by side-effects from constructors.
Beyond the allowable limit for an e-mail address.
Beyond the install root, git info, test roots, etc., the other properties are optional and may or may not be set
Binary Data Test
Binary safe case-insensitive string comparison.
Binary type variations
Bind and connect sockets to localhost
Binds a PHP variable to a corresponding named or question mark placeholder in the SQL statement that was use to prepare the statement.
Binds a parameter to a statement variable.
Binds a value to a corresponding named or question mark placeholder in the SQL statement that was use to prepare the statement.
Binds and calls the closure.
Binds the name given in address to the socket described by socket.
Binds the value of a parameter to a statement variable.
Binds to the LDAP directory with specified RDN and password.
Bitwise Operators
Blending mode is not available when drawing on palette images.
Block and wait for xbox task's result.
Block and wait until pagelet task finishes or times out.
Block on one or more asynchronous operations, or until the specified timeout has occurred.
Block the currently executing task and return the next task control block to run.
Blue if we go from something "faily" to something "faily" e.g., E to I or F
Body parts are not decoded by this function.
Boolean Operators
Boolean Values
Boolean data
Boolean keys
Both data and keys are compared by using user-supplied callbacks.
Both dn and extraattribs are associative arrays whose keys are converted to OIDs and applied to the relevant part of the request.
Both frombase and tobase have to be between 2 and 36, inclusive.
Both invalid arguments
Both portions of the string are returned in units of seconds.
Both should return filesize in bytes.
Both the data and the indexes are compared by using separate callback functions.
Bounds checking
Break out each type into an array
Break recursion
Breaks this node into two nodes at the specified offset, keeping both in the tree as siblings.
Briefly, an SQLSTATE consists of a two characters class value followed by a three characters subclass value.
Broken pipe, tear down so future requests might succeed
Buffering not started yet, should return false
Build a large blob that's hard to compress
Build array:
Build chain of n equality constraints
Build compilation database.
Build ini data
Builds a new ImmVector by concatenating the elements of this ImmSet with the elements of the specified Iterable.
Builds a new ImmVector by concatenating the elements of this ImmVector with the elements of the specified Iterable.
Builds a new ImmVector by concatenating the values of this ImmMap with the elements of the specified Iterable.
Builds a new Vector by concatenating the elements of this Set with the elements of the specified Iterable.
Builds a new Vector by concatenating the elements of this Vector with the elements of the specified Iterable.
Builds a new Vector by concatenating the values of this Map with the elements of the specified Iterable.
Built-in function, relaxed check
BuiltinEnum contains the utility methods provided by enums.
Bump the version if you're making changes that will affect that scores, e.g. if you add a new benchmark or change an existing one.
But does not generate a graphical output.
But just keep executing anyway and use the previous value...
But reads should always fail
But the MySQL 5.1 manual states: Truncation operations do not return the number of deleted rows.
But the above assignment causes a new expression id to be made
But the expression id is still stable
But the namespace declaration start handler is called before the start tag handler for each namespace declared in that start tag.
By default RAND_MAX is 32768 although no constant is defined for it for user space apps
By default it will replace, but if you pass in FALSE as the second argument you can force multiple headers of the same type.
By default the actual locale is returned.
By default the parser is lenient.
By default, MYSQLI_STORE_RESULT is used.
By default, NumberFormatter::TYPE_DOUBLE is used.
By default, an empty element will be created.
By default, fetches as both.
By default, fs.files and fs.chunks are the collection names used.
By default, only the - sign is used on a number if it's negative.
By default, runs the all tests but SINGLE_SCRIPT
By default, the PHP driver always uses type 2: a byte array.
By default, the current connection is reusable by the pool.
By default, the queries are relative to the root element.
By default, the returned document does not include the modifications made on the update.
By default, this class will wrap whatever internal save handler is set as as defined by the session.save_handler configuration directive which is usually files by default.
By default, this is null.
By default, this method will not overwrite existing files, the third parameter can be set to true to enable overwriting of files.
By doing it this way you have all information for the call in one place and do not clutter the function namespace with a callback function's name not used anywhere else.
By doing it this way you have all the information for the call in one place and do not clutter the function namespace with a callback function's name not used anywhere else.
By invoking the methods provided by the NumberFormatter class, you can format numbers, currencies, and percentages according to the specified or default locale.
By printing out a notice that we are actively stating the file then subsequently performing multiple stat operations on it we effectively test the stat cache mechanism
By setting the Content-type to image/gif and then calling a pbmplus program to output a gif, you can create PHP scripts that output images directly.
By using MYSQL_BOTH, you'll get an array with both associative and number indices.
C must always be initialized, independently of whether it's optional
C should not have constant bar
C should not have method bar
C should not have property bar
C's doc comment
C1 is the parent
CHILDREN / PARENTS
CLIENT_MULTI_STATEMENTS - should be disabled silently
CNAME  target: FQDN of location in DNS namespace to which the record is aliased.
CREATE INDEX, DROP INDEX
CREATE LOGFILE GROUP Syntax 11.1.9.
CREATE LOGFILE GROUP Syntax 13.1.10.
CREATE MULTIPLE CURL HANDLE
CREATE SERVER Syntax 11.1.11.
CREATE SERVER, ALTER SERVER, DROP SERVER We don't really try to use federated, we just want to see if the syntax works
CREATE TABLE, DROP TABLE
CREATE TABLESPACE Syntax 11.1.14.
CREATE TABLESPACE Syntax 13.1.15.
CREATE, ALTER, RENAME, DROP DATABASE
CREATE, DROP, CALL SP and SF
CRYPT_EXT_DES - Extended DES-based hash.
CURLFile can be used to upload a file with CURLOPT_POSTFIELDS.
CURL_MULTI_GETCONTENT TEST CREATE RESOURCES
CURRENTLY UNSUPPORTED IN HHVM.
Cache BadClass
Cache a variable in the data store.
Caches a variable in the data store, only if it's not already stored.
Calculate the walkabout strength, the stay flag, and, if it is 'stay', the value for the current output of this constraint.
Calculates the MD5 hash of str using the RSA Data Security, Inc.
Calculates the MD5 hash of the file specified by the filename parameter using the RSA Data Security, Inc.
Calculates the group access list for the user specified in name.
Calculates the metaphone key of str.
Calculates the soundex key of str.
Calendar information is returned as an array containing the elements calname, calsymbol, month, abbrevmonth and maxdaysinmonth.
Calendar modes Mode Meaning Values 0 Gregorian - abbreviated Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec 1 Gregorian January, February, March, April, May, June, July, August, September, October, November, December 2 Julian - abbreviated Jan, Feb, Mar, Apr, May, Jun, Jul, Aug, Sep, Oct, Nov, Dec 3 Julian January, February, March, April, May, June, July, August, September, October, November, December 4 Jewish Tishri, Heshvan, Kislev, Tevet, Shevat, AdarI, AdarII, Nisan, Iyyar, Sivan, Tammuz, Av, Elul 5 French Republican Vendemiaire, Brumaire, Frimaire, Nivose, Pluviose, Ventose, Germinal, Floreal, Prairial, Messidor, Thermidor, Fructidor, Extra
Call a function.
Call at your own peril as non-hoisted classes might cause fatal.
Call back function
Call destructors
Call the static function and move into the ErrorCodes scope
Call this when one of your `invariant`s has been violated.
Call this when one of your invariants has been violated.
Callback function
Callback function which returns always false
Callback function which returns always true
Called during conversion from internal UChar to destination encoding
Called during conversion from source encoding to internal UChar representation
Called for each element to test whether it has children.
Called when end recursing one level.
Called when the next element is available.
Calling this function will implicitly start output buffering if it is not active already.
Calls a function for every element in an iterator.
Calls back on every edge.
Calls back on every node.
Calls back on every root.
Calls invariant_exception if multiple constants have the same value.
Can also be an array of key-value pairs to insert into the cache.
Can be any type except a resource.
Can be either a string, an array or a stream resource.
Can be given as 0 for no compression up to 9 for maximum compression.
Can be integer or float, other values will be converted to a numeric value.
Can be overridden by individual resource records.
Can be removed once we support ParamCoerceMode in PHP
Can be used to check if the autoloader uses the include path to check for classes.
Can have custom class named ImmSet.
Can have custom class named ImmVector.
Can have custom class named Map.
Can have custom class named Pair.
Can have custom class named Set.
Can return a string or an integer depending on the mode.
Can't add since it isn't more specific
Can't run all the framework tests and "all but" at the same time
Can't run framework tests both by file and single test
Can't wait for soapaction to be fully deprecated
Cancel Awaitable, if it's still pending.
Cannot access parent:: when current class scope has no parent
Cannot be used with persistent PDO instances.
Cannot manually set to not be accessible.
Cannot use a scalar value as an array
Canonical decomposition followed by canonical composition.
Canonical decomposition.
Carriage returns are the devil
Cartesian x-coordinate
Cartesian y-coordinate
Case 1: CDATA Sections
Case 2: replace some characters so that we get comments instead
Case 3: replace even more characters so that only textual data is left
Case that should throw an error
Case-insensitive constants are stored as lower-case.
Casts a given value to a string.
Catch recoverable error with handler
Catchable fatal error
Category/locale names can be found in  RFC 1766 and  ISO 639.
Caused by a query timing out.
Caused by accessing a cursor incorrectly or a error receiving a reply.
Causes a store to add the specified flag to the flags set for the messages in the specified sequence.
Caution  Remember, the current calendar system being used worldwide is the Gregorian calendar.
Certain characters have special significance in HTML, and should be represented by HTML entities if they are to preserve their meanings.
Change each element and dump result.
Change existing dependencies to the wanted tag
Changes PHP's current directory to directory.
Changes the current directory to the specified one.
Changes the root directory of the current process to directory.
Changes to the parent directory.
Changing the name of the parameter
Changing the static variable
Characters before and after the formatting string will be returned unchanged.
Characters we know not to be numbers.
Chararter type variations
Check a non-Latin language.
Check alternate vararg schemes first
Check and make sure that the server is always online, and old server exits after a finite amount of time.
Check content of buffer after flush - if flush failed it should still contain the string above.
Check determining failure error codes.
Check effects of changing misc collattion options.
Check for a peculiar translator interaction with IssetM, where a dirty, variant local in the same BB as IssetM could cause the local to morph into a cell.
Check for close operation on the file handle
Check for empty strings
Check for mappings
Check for read operation
Check for sequences
Check for size of existing data file after opening the file in "w" mode again, expected: 0 bytes
Check for size of existing data file after opening the file in "wb" mode again, expected: 0 bytes
Check for size of existing data file after opening the file in "wt" mode again, expected: 0 bytes
Check for size of existing data file before opening the file in "w" mode again, expected: size of content
Check for size of existing data file before opening the file in "wb" mode again, expected: size of content
Check for size of existing data file before opening the file in "wt" mode again, expected: size of content
Check for strings
Check for the content of handle
Check for the existence of file
Check for the type of resource
Check getting error string by integer error code.
Check getting global error code.
Check getting global error message.
Check heap integrity
Check if C has constant foo
Check if C has private method privateFoo
Check if C has private property privateFoo
Check if C has protected method protectedFoo
Check if C has protected property protectedFoo
Check if C has public method publicFoo
Check if C has public property publicFoo
Check if C has static method staticFoo
Check if C has static property staticFoo
Check if a code point has the Alphabetic Unicode property.
Check if a code point has the Lowercase Unicode property.
Check if a code point has the Uppercase Unicode property.
Check if a code point has the White_Space Unicode property.
Check if a persitent connection to memcache is being used.
Check if database exists and is exhaustive.
Check if error code equals to expected one.
Check if iterator is at a valid `AsyncMysqlRow`.
Check if specialized handler is defined
Check if test should be skipped.
Check if the new value has been set.
Check if the pattern has been changed.
Check if the platform has the performance.now high resolution timer.
Check if the second copy remains unsorted.
Check if we are already disabled first
Check if we are being given a mime.types file or if we should use the default URL.
Check if we have hit the stream timeout
Check that ImmSet is a ConstSet.
Check that all keys get deleted
Check that all keys were stored
Check that an explicit null gets coerced to NullObject, not stdClass
Check that either a method or a function is specified
Check that every instance gets their own copy of the collection literal.
Check that extra function arguments aren't leaked when variable variables are used in the same function.
Check that literal syntax works for ImmSet.
Check that the class name is valid
Check that the function alias exists.
Check that the function name is valid
Check that the method name is valid
Check that the right operand of 'instanceof' is not an enum
Check that the translator correctly adapts to callsites with variable argument reffiness.
Check that there is no third value
Check that we correctly handle static method lookups on abstract types constrained by Tvars
Check the MySQL C API reference manual for details.
Check the actual serialized output.
Check the debug info
Check the line
Check the position of the internal array pointer after calling the function
Check the specified UTF-8 string for possible security or spoofing issues.
Check the whether two specified UTF-8 strings are visually confusable.
Check this out later.
Check to see if composer dependencies are necessary to run the test
Check to see if this node is a text node.
Check whether a detailed log is wanted.
Check whether a junit log is wanted.
Check whether an option exists
Check whether resource is lost after close operation
Check whether the given Awaitable has finished.
Check whether the given error code indicates failure.
Check whether user test dirs are requested.
Checking OBJECTS type
Checking case sensitiveness
Checking for Class and Objects
Checking for internal array pointer beint reset when shift is called
Checking for return value and the new array formed from push operation
Checking if all lines are still usable
Checking on OBJECTS type
Checking on RESOURCE type
Checking on resource types
Checking that the initialization of constructors is properly detected
Checking warning messages
Checking with block in file
Checking with current file
Checkout out our baseline test code via SHA or branch
Checks an OAuth request.
Checks an xbox task's status.
Checks current value of a server stats.
Checks each key to see whether it has a valid variable name.
Checks finish status of a pagelet task.
Checks if a transaction is currently active within the driver.
Checks if multiple results are available
Checks if one ore more APC keys exist.
Checks if the asked feature is supported for the specified version.
Checks if the data inside `AsyncMysqlConnection` object is valid.
Checks if the encoding match succeeded.
Checks if the key is present in the map.
Checks if the parameter is variadic.
Checks if the provided string is already in the specified normalization form.
Checks if the specified byte stream is valid for the specified encoding.
Checks information about the current mailbox.
Checks the current mailbox status on the server.
Checks the validity of the date formed by the arguments.
Checks whether a file or directory exists.
Checks whether a provided key exists in the current `Pair`.
Checks whether the child process exited because of a signal which was not caught.
Checks whether the child status code represents a normal exit.
Checks whether the client disconnected.
Checks whether the given constant exists and is defined.
Checks whether the given key is the private key that corresponds to cert.
Checks whether val is a legal finite on this platform.
Checksum calculated as if the checksum field was spaces
Checksum in the middle...
Child class extending abstract class
Child classes may just override the protected property without implementing a constructor or calling parent one.
Children are inserted in the correct order.
Choice formats can be used in conjunction with MessageFormatter to handle plurals, match numbers, and select from an array of items.
Chunks an array into size large chunks.
Class X is related to neither ParentClass nor ChildClass.
Class alias of undefined class:
Class definition
Class definition for object variable
Class for all test cases
Class for basic test case construction
Class for basic test case construction for class methods
Class for extended variations.
Class for simple errors - one too many args and one too few
Class for variation tests for a PHP function
Class for variation tests for a PHP method
Class is now a Tvar of Tunresolved.
Class reperesents a single PHP function.
Class to get object variable
Class values other than '01', except for the class 'IM', indicate an error.
Class with static member
Class with two singleton instances.
Class without any member
ClassConstant
Clean the temporary file
Clean up the user arc config we are using
Cleanup any left-over tmp files from last run.
Cleanup previous runs.
Clear OS byte before encode
Clear out the reference to destruct the array
Clears all current bound parameters.
Clears any output contents that have not been flushed to networked.
Clears the libxml error buffer.
Clears the user/system cache.
Close all ODBC connections
Close handle
Close the current connection.
Closes the database connection.
Closes the directory stream indicated by dir_handle.
Closes the imap stream.
Closes the prepared statement.
Closes the result set.
Closing the resource handles
Closure in variable
Closure object is empty
Coerce a string into a native type Reference: http://yaml.org/type/bool.html TODO: Use only words from the YAML spec.
Coerce all the values in a traversable.
Coerce to a valid value or null.
Coerce to valid value or throw UnexpectedValueException This is useful for typing deserialized enum values.
Collation keys can be compared directly instead of strings.
Collator class.
Collect existing system locales and set one among them, Check the currency settings in the new locale
Collection names can use any character in the ASCII set.
Collections
Collections tests from HHJsonDecodeTest.php
Colors present only in the palette are not resolved.
Comment about the frameworks:  - Have a 'git_commit' field to ensure consistency across test runs as we may have different download times for people, as well as redownloads.
Comment for class A
Commented out as it's HHVM-only.
Commit was not issued.
Common cases
Common constants
Common protocols Name Description icmp The Internet Control Message Protocol is used primarily by gateways and hosts to report errors in datagram communication.
Compare each to each.
Compare string pairs in the given array using specified locale.
Compare strings using en_US locale.
Compare strings using lt_LT locale.
Compare strings using ru_RU locale.
Compare strings.
Compare two strings.
Compare value of attribute with value of same attribute in an LDAP directory entry.
Compare various string pairs using various locales.
Compares array1 against array2 and returns the difference.
Compares container1 against container2 and returns the difference.
Compares the keys from array1 against the keys from array2 and returns the difference.
Compares the keys from container1 against the keys from container2 and returns the difference.
Compares two strings in case-insensitive manner
Compares two strings in case-sensitive manner
Comparison function
Compatibility decomposition followed by canonical composition.
Compatibility decomposition.
Compile only test.
Complex types are returned as ResourceBundle object.
Compressing a smaller string
Compute stats
Computes digest hash value for given data using given method, returns raw or binhex encoded string.
Computes the difference of arrays by using a callback function for data comparison.
Computes the difference of arrays with additional index check, compares data and indexes by a callback function.
Computes the difference of arrays with additional index check, compares data by a callback function.
Computes the geometric mean of a set of numbers.
Computes the geometric mean of a set of rms measurements.
Computes the geometric mean of a set of throughput time measurements.
Computes the intersection of arrays with additional index check, compares data by a callback function.
Computes the intersection of arrays, compares data by a callback function.
Concat two matrices.
Concatenate result strings.
Concatenate the sorted array and function result with output string.
Confidence in results
Configuration overrides configargs key type openssl.conf equivalent description digest_alg string default_md Selects which digest method to use x509_extensions string x509_extensions Selects which extensions should be used when creating an x509 certificate req_extensions string req_extensions Selects which extensions should be used when creating a CSR private_key_bits integer default_bits Specifies how many bits should be used to generate a private key private_key_type integer none Specifies the type of private key to create.
Configuration.
Confirm file pointer moves correctly
Connect and send request 1
Connect and send request 2
Connect to destination address
Connect to it
Connect to mysql to determine the current charset so we can diffinate it
Connection seems fine
Connections on which no query has been send - 1
Connections on which no query has been send - 3 Difference: pass two connections
Consider using prepared statements instead.
ConstIndexAccess
Constant name in key, constant value in value.
Constants may only evaluate to scalar values
Constrains two variables to have the same value.
Constraints that do no computation, such as stay and edit constraints, are not included in the plan.
Construct a directory iterator from a path-string.
Construct a new Collator instance
Construct a new array iterator from anything that has a hash table.
Construct test case header
Construct the argument list to pass to the function being tested
Construct the argument list to pass to the method being tested
Construct the argument lists to pass to the function being tested
Construct the steps in the order of execution
Construct the test case as an array of strings
Constructs  the test case as a array of strings
Constructs a Splay tree node.
Constructs a Splay tree.
Constructs a new ReflectionTypeAlias.
Constructs a new ReflectionTypeConstant.
Constructs the test case as a array of strings
Contain referenced variables 2.
Container for all possible variation test cases
Container for all possible variation test cases for a method
Container for all possible variation test cases of functions
Contains some reusable utilities for command line php scripts.
Contains the information about results for query statements that ran before a MySQL error.
Content from file is from libiconv testkit.
Contents of the returned array    Key: Value:     msg The CURLMSG_DONE constant.
Continue asynchronous iteration
Continues retrieving/sending a file non-blocking.
Convert a string to a double, then back to a string again.
Convert all or part of a YAML document stream read from a URL to a PHP variable.
Convert all or part of a YAML document stream read from a file to a PHP variable.
Convert all or part of a YAML document stream to a PHP variable.
Convert extension names to lowercase
Convert it to a high quality png file
Convert numeric string reference of string str in a specified block to character.
Convert the well-formed XML document in the given file to an object.
Convert valid DN
Converted to EUC-JP
Converted to EUC-JP Test for object
Converted to EUC-JP Test for scaler, array and object
Converts Julian Day Count to a string containing the Gregorian date in the format of "month/day/year".
Converts Julian Day Count to a string containing the Julian Calendar Date in the format of "month/day/year".
Converts a JPEG file into a WBMP file.
Converts a Julian Day Count to the French Republican Calendar.
Converts a Julian Day Count to the Jewish Calendar.
Converts a PNG file into a WBMP file.
Converts a date from the French Republican Calendar to a Julian Day Count.
Converts a score value to a string with at least three significant digits.
Converts a string to an array.
Converts character encoding of variables vars in encoding from_encoding to encoding to_encoding.
Converts comparison result to a character.
Converts from one Cyrillic character set to another.
Converts logical Hebrew text to visual text.
Converts specified character codes in string str from HTML numeric character reference to character code.
Converts the character encoding of string str to to_encoding from optionally from_encoding.
Converts the given mime_encoded_text to UTF-8.
Copies mail messages specified by msglist to specified mailbox.
Copy a part of src_im onto dst_im starting at the x,y coordinates src_x, src_y with a width of src_w and a height of src_h.
Copy the elements of an iterator into an array.
Copy the line as is
Copyright 1996 John Maloney and Mario Wolczko.
Copyright 2004-2015 Facebook.
Copyright 2004-present Facebook.
Copyright 2006-2008 the V8 project authors.
Copyright 2008 the V8 project authors.
Copyright 2009 the V8 project authors.
Copyright 2013 the V8 project authors.
Copyright 2014 the V8 project authors.
Copyright 2015-present Facebook.
Could also be an include of a file containing similar
Count of elements to follow
Count the elements in an iterator.
Count the number of UTF-8 code points in string or byte count if it's not valid UTF-8.
Counts all elements in an array, or properties in an object.
Counts the number of times the needle substring occurs in the haystack string.
Counts the number of words inside string.
Counts the total number of registered benchmarks.
Craete a date object
Create Collator with the current locale.
Create Phar with the filenames above
Create Recursive Type Var
Create ReflectionClasses
Create ReflectionObjects
Create a 200x100 image
Create a 300x100 image
Create a 55x30 image
Create a DateTime object
Create a DateTime object from format
Create a DateTime object..
Create a DateTimeZone object
Create a DateTimeZone object..
Create a MIME mail resource.
Create a blank image and add some text
Create a collator  Creates a new instance of Collator.
Create a connection to the FastCGI application
Create a date object
Create a date object to modify
Create a deate object
Create a dummy node.
Create a fixed array
Create a hash which maps string keys to string values.
Create a image
Create a new Doubly Linked List
Create a new async connection from a synchronous MySQL instance.
Create a new image from GD file or URL.
Create a new image from GD2 file or URL.
Create a new image from a given part of GD2 file or URL.
Create a new image instance
Create a new interval timer.
Create a number formatter  Creates a number formatter from locale and pattern.
Create a pair of unrelated types
Create a pool of connections to access a MySQL client.
Create a resource
Create a table of function designators
Create a temporary file for the test
Create a temporary file to read the data from
Create an array containing a range of elements.
Create an array with a TestCloneable object in it.
Create an image instance
Create an instance of each pre-condition and run their check methods
Create an instance of the Reflection_Method class
Create an iterator to be limited
Create collator.
Create empty image
Create instance of class in the test case
Create nested Tunresolved that can occur as a result of anonymous function call, and check that subsequent unification of those types works correctly.
Create new xmlwriter using memory for string output.
Create results for the framework that just ran.
Create some data buckets proportional to the number of threads
Create some more holes to give the memory allocator something to work with.
Create table here
Create the brush image
Create the client and send/receive the data
Create the main image, 100x100
Create the server side
Create two DateTime objects that will contain the same Unix timestamp, but have different timezones attached to them.
Create two copies of the given array.
Create two temporary files.
Creates a DOMDocument object of the specified type with its document element.
Creates a copy of the node.
Creates a file with a unique filename, with access permission set to 0600, in the specified directory.
Creates a filtered iterator using the callback to determine which items are accepted or rejected.
Creates a flexible generator according to the data for a given locale.
Creates a new 32-bit number with the given value.
Creates a new 64-bit number with the given value.
Creates a new OAuth object
Creates a new XMLWriter using memory for string output.
Creates a new XMLWriter using uri for the output.
Creates a new XSLTProcessor object.
Creates a new binary data object.
Creates a new date.
Creates a new mailbox specified by mailbox.
Creates a new regular expression.
Creates a new timestamp.
Creates a rectangle filled with color in the given image starting at point 1 and ending at point 2.
Creates a special or ordinary file.
Creates a spoof checker that checks for visually confusing characters in a string.
Creates a stream or datagram socket on the specified local_socket.
Creates a timer that will send a SIGALRM signal to the process after the given number of seconds.
Creates an HTML document from the DOM representation.
Creates an XML document from the DOM representation.
Creates an array by using the values from the keys array as keys and the values from the values array as the corresponding values.
Creates an array containing variables and their values.
Creates an empty DOMDocumentType object.
Creates an encoding detector.
Creates and returns a socket resource, also referred to as an endpoint of communication.
Creates and returns a stream context with any options supplied in options preset.
Creates the specified directory on the FTP server.
Creating a data file
Creating a dir resource
Creating a file resource
Creating a soft link
Creating a temporary file file
Creating an empty file
Creating an hard link
Creating dir resource
Creating file and inserting data into it
Creating number of unique files by passing a file name as prefix
Crop an image automatically using one of the available modes.
Crop an image using the given coordinates and size, x, y, width and height.
Curly braces are special because they can potentially indicate interpolation, so we backtrack when we realize that they are just plain characters.
Currency parsing.
Currently it's the minimum required number of zeros If you remove one, it won't crash
Currently only LIBXML_NOEMPTYTAG is supported.
Currently only matches functions, so won't match classes/methods.
Currently our behavior during return when a local dtor throws a fatal is to swallow it, then keep rethrowing it from the enter hook for each destructor.
Currently running test, and the results of each test.
Currently untyped for convenience.
Currently, all of the available tests live in the code itself.
Currently, mode is ignored and is always "rb".
Currently, snapshot mode may not be used with sorting or explicit hints.
Cursor for database file results.
Custom prefix test
Cuts a portion of str specified by the start and length parameters.
D stands for decimal number.
DDL will issue an implicit commit
DEBUG_BACKTRACE_IGNORE_ARGS  Whether or not to omit the "args" index, and thus all the function/method arguments, to save memory.
DELETE EXPRS
DELETE STMTS
DELETE should be rolled back
DELETE should have been rolled back.
DIRECTORY_SEPARATOR .
DN not found
DO NOT MODIFY IT.
DO Syntax 13.2.3.
DOMAttr represents an attribute in the DOMElement object.
DOMCDataSection
DOMCharacterData using DOMComment
DROP LOGFILE GROUP Syntax 11.1.15.
DROP LOGFILE GROUP Syntax 13.1.16.
DROP SERVER Syntax 11.1.17.
DROP TABLESPACE Syntax
DST not in effect
Data Definition Statements 13.1.3.
Data Manipulation Statements 13.2.2.
Data has been fetched   FALSE Error occurred   NULL No more rows/data exists or data truncation occurred
Data inside the query should be properly escaped.
Data is compared by using an user-supplied callback.
Data should be more than the size of a link.
Datatype of a field
Date Formatter class - locale-dependent formatting/parsing of dates using pattern strings and/or canned patterns.
Date Formatter is a concrete class that enables locale-dependent formatting/parsing of dates using pattern strings and/or canned patterns.
Date at which Sun is up all day at North Pole
Date at which Sun is up all day at South Pole
DateTime and DateTimeImmutable both throw exceptions when they fail but date_create and date_create_immutable should both simply return false
DateTimeInterface
Deactivates the circular reference collector.
Decides if this constraint can be satisfied and records that decision.
Decides if this constraint can be satisfied and which way it should flow based on the relative strength of the variables related, and record that decision.
Decimal integera data
Decimal size value
Decimal values
Declared Instance Properties
Declares the attribute name to be of type ID.
Declares the attribute specified by attr to be of type ID.
Declares the attribute specified by localName and namespaceURI to be of type ID.
Decodes encoded-word string str in MIME header.
Decodes the given BASE-64 encoded text.
Decreases a stored integer value.
Decrypts the S/MIME encrypted message contained in the file specified by infilename using the certificate and its associated private key specified by recipcert and recipkey.
Default Mongo exception.
Default ini settings
Default is 0, local stream.
Default is FALSE.
Default is October 15, 1582.
Default is TRUE.
Default port for TCP connections
Default to 0666.
Default to TRUE, meaning the server should be considered online.
Default to TRUE.
Default to an empty array.
Default value 0 means that the function is called only in the end, other special value 1 sets chunk_size to 4096.
Default value is an empty password.
Default value is defined by mysql.default_password.
Default value is defined by mysql.default_user.
Default value is the name of the user that owns the server process.
Defaults to -1 which means that first found time zone corresponding to abbr is returned.
Defaults to -1, which means that whether the time zone has daylight saving or not is not taken into consideration when searching.
Defaults to 1 MiB.
Defaults to 1.0.
Defaults to FALSE.
Defaults to no filtering.
Defaults to null for the case where an array of key-value pairs is passed.
Defaults to the ReadWriteTimeout value set.
Defeat any conceivable constant-folding smarts
Define a bunch of objects all of which will use standard compare object handler
Define a couple of arrays.
Define error handler
Defined in array_reduce.hhas
Defined now
Defines a named constant at runtime.
Defines global benchsuite running mode that overrides benchmark suite behavior.
Defining __construct and filter makes filter a normal method
Defining resource
Defualt flag value 2.
Delays program execution for the given number of micro seconds.
Delays program execution for the given number of seconds and nanoseconds.
Delete file having default permission but its dir having readonly permission Delete file having readonly permission but dir having default permission
Delete link files - soft and hard links
Delete some security related environment variables
Delete the existing directory
Deletes a particular entry in LDAP directory.
Deletes count characters starting from position offset.
Deletes filename.
Deletes the specified mailbox.
Deleting the file
Deleting the temporary file
Deleting the temporary files and directory used in the testcase
Deleting unexisting data
Dependencies could not have been gotten
Depending on how the file is compressed, the bzip2 or zlib extensions must be enabled to take advantage of this feature.
Depending on the environment, Unix domain sockets may not be available.
Depending on the session handler, not all characters are allowed within the session id.
Depending on your PHP and GD versions this function is defined or not.
Depending on your version, the MySQL server migit not support this
Deprecated since 2002 or the like but documented to be deprecated since 5.3.
Derived::__destruct is being called not Base::__destruct
Deserialize the handles in the reverse order, so they lay over each other's memory.
Details: Cycles are detected when a marked variable is encountered downstream of the given constraint.
Details: If satifying the constraint is successful, it may override a weaker constraint on its output.
Details: Retracting the given constraint may allow some currently unsatisfiable downstream constraint to be satisfied.
Details: The outputs of a constraint are marked when it is added to the plan under construction.
Detect character encoding with current detect_order
Detects character encoding in string str.
Determine if a debugger is attached to the current thread, and return information about where it is connected from.
Determine if the password hash needs to be rehashed according to the options provided  If the answer is true, after validating the password using password_verify, rehash it.
Determine if the specified code point is a space character according to Java.
Determine the tests to be run.
Determine through a poor man's method whether a proxy will be required to get out to the internet.
Determines if the current SSL Context Provider is valid.
Determines if the file descriptor fd refers to a valid terminal type device.
Determines if the specified character is a space character or not.
Determines if the specified character is permissible as the first character in a Java identifier.
Determines if the specified character is permissible in a Java identifier.
Determines if the specified character is permissible in an identifier according to Java.
Determines if the specified character should be regarded as an ignorable character in an identifier, according to Java.
Determines if the specified code point is a whitespace character according to Java/ICU.
Determines whether the code point has the Bidi_Mirrored property.
Determines whether the script timed out.
Determines whether the specified code point is "defined", which usually means that it is assigned a character.
Determines whether the specified code point is a "blank" or "horizontal space", a character that visibly separates words on a line.
Determines whether the specified code point is a base character.
Determines whether the specified code point is a digit character according to Java.
Determines whether the specified code point is a hexadecimal digit.
Determines whether the specified code point is a letter character.
Determines whether the specified code point is a printable character.
Determines whether the specified code point is a punctuation character.
Determines whether the specified code point is a titlecase letter.
Determines whether the specified code point is an ISO control code.
Deterministic tests.
Difference between nested and local-var shape-like arrays
Difference between nested and local-var tuple-like arrays
Different heredoc strings
Different heredoc strings passed as argument to arrays
Different heredoc strings to be sorted
Different systems have different naming schemes for locales.
Different versions of ICU will give us slightly different formats for the DatePatternGenerator.
Digits in numbers with a base higher than 10 will be represented with the letters a-z, with a meaning 10, b meaning 11 and z meaning 35.
Direct: relative from CWD path.
Directory iterators don't work so well on them :p
Directory, ignore
Disable redirects from being followed automatically, thus allowing the request to be manually redirected.
Disable showing stack traces on error conditions.
Disable/enable the ability to load external entities.
Disabled target, skip
Disables and returns code coverage.
Disabling specialization
Display current detection order
Display current setting
Displaying various variable through the array captured by the get_defined_vars function call
Displays fatal errors with this PHP document.
Do not call this directly.
Do not change this test it is a README.TESTING example.
Do not use in prod, use cachearchiver instead.
Do nothing to mimic Zend
Do nothing, the iterator always points to the top element
Do so a couple times, so we exercise both directions of each branch through multiple executions.
Do some crap, to block inlining
Do some guesswork as to the key and the value
Doc comment on a function generator
Doc comment on a method generator
Docs say bool, but Zend's default implementation returns null
Docs says to pass null, but Zend completely ignores the argument
Documentation on filters can be found in the Filters appendix.
Does not clear the stored stacks.
Does not work with memory streams or user streams.
Does some caching to hopefully be pretty cheap to call, especially when there are no errors and the code isn't changing.
Does some filtering to remove the all the function that we generally don't care about.
Does some more stuff.
Does some stuff.
Don't add signals that would cause the process to abort, the output will depend on whether it dumps its core.
Don't add to .gitattributes file if it already exists in there
Don't call EndIteration
Don't do anything if wordwrap is set to 0
Don't ever guess at the PHP executable location.
Don't expect a unicode value from the database, you'll get binary string
Don't follow
Don't handle methods yet, so function can't be indented
Don't override if we have an ini file already
Don't print out any of the PHPUnit Patterns to the errors file.
Don't rely on PCNTL extension being around
Don't touch it.
Don't try to lint deleted files or changed directories.
Don't want to parse any more test names after the Time line in the results.
Done with the original connection, create a second link to test the character set being defined
Double quoted strings
Double remove it
Draw a couple of brushes, each overlaying each
Draw a rectangle
Draw a red rectangle
Draw a text string on the image
Draw a white ellipse
Draw an ellipse to fill with a black border
Draw the rectangle
Draws a line between the two given points.
Draws a partial arc centered at the specified coordinate in the given image.
Draws a string at the given coordinates.
Draws a string vertically at the given coordinates.
Draws an ellipse centered at the specified coordinate on the given image.
Draws an ellipse centered at the specified coordinates.
Draws the character c vertically at the specified coordinate on the given image.
Drop first letter
Dropping a non-existent table with IF EXISTS generates a warning.
Dropping an existing table generates no warnings.
Drops this collection and deletes its indices.
Due a limitation in the current Zend Engine it is not possible to pass a constant modifier like NULL directly as a parameter to a function which expects this parameter to be passed by reference.
Due to an API flaw this shall not connect
Due to inheriting from an interface, this code fatals in HHVM.
Due to these aspects, UDP requires a minimum amount of protocol overhead.
Dump PHP array to YAML  The dump method, when supplied with an array, will do its best to convert the array into friendly YAML.
Dump YAML from PHP array statically  The dump method, when supplied with an array, will do its best to convert the array into friendly YAML.
Dumps a string representation of an internal zend value to output.
Dumps all variables in global state, including global variables, static variables, class statics and others.
Dumps array to YAML.
Dumps information about a variable  This function displays structured information about one or more expressions that includes its type and value.
Dumps the information contained by a prepared statement directly on the output.
Dumps to some very clean YAML.
Duplicate entry
During backward branches
During function exit
Dynamic Instance Properties
Dynamic array
Dynamic methods
DynamicFunctionCall
E.g, deadlocks  Future enhancements:  - Integrate the testing with our current "test/run" style infrastructure for official pass/fail statistics when we have diffs.
END MANUAL SECTION
ENT_NOQUOTES Will leave both double and single quotes unconverted.
ENT_QUOTES Will convert both double and single quotes.
EUC-JP - No encoding parameter
EUC-JP - No offset and encoding parameter
EUC-JP - With encoding parameter
EUC-JP string
EUC-JP strings
EUC-JP: control codes that are virtually lead bytes
EXPECTF is used here since the error format may change but ut  should always contain 'Division by zero'.
EXTR_PREFIX_ALL called twice with same prefix string
EXTR_REFS as second Argument
Each DOMDocument has a doctype attribute whose value is either NULL or a DOMDocumentType object.
Each PHPUnit process gets its' own tempdir to avoid race conditions between multiple runs
Each Phar archive has the API version hard-coded into its manifest.
Each array contains equal strings that differ only in their length.
Each associative array contains at minimum the following keys: Basic DNS attributes    Attribute Meaning     host  The record in the DNS namespace to which the rest of the associated data refers.
Each callback that will be called will be passed an array of matched elements in the subject string.
Each document in the chunks collection contains a chunk of binary data, a files_id field that matches its file's _id, and the position of this chunk in the overall file.
Each document in the files collection contains the filename, upload date, and md5 hash.
Each element can be: An array describing the pipe to pass to the process.
Each element in the array is a wait handle, or null which represents crossing a context boundary.
Each element of the array corresponds to a line in the file, with the newline still attached.
Each element should be read as  1st element is delimiter, 2nd element is enclosure  and 3rd element is csv fields
Each element should be read as  1st element is delimiter, 2nd element is enclosure and 3rd element is csv fields
Each failed connection struct has its own timeout and before it has expired the struct will be skipped when selecting backends to serve a request.
Each key of the return value represents an individual field name and the corresponding element represents a field value.
Each limit has a soft and a hard limit.
Each parameter can be either a string containing the name of the variable, or an array of variable names.
Each part is known as Relative Distinguished Name, or RDN.
Each recipient must receive both the sealed data and the envelope key that was encrypted with the recipient's public key.
Each resource has an associated soft and hard limit.
Each result column is stored in an array offset, starting at offset 0.
Each rowset can have a different set of columns from the preceding rowset.
Echo back the response to the user if it isn't a stream.
Echo it again.
Echo out the first four bytes 'this' without applying filter Remainder will get sucked into the read buffer though.
Edit constraints do nothing
Edits indicate that a variable is to be changed by imperative code.
Eexepcted numerical equivalent of above non-numerics
Either IntlDateFormatter::TRADITIONAL or IntlDateFormatter::GREGORIAN.
Either IteratorAggregate or Iterator must be used instead.
Either a RecursiveIterator or IteratorAggregate.
Either the new process is initializing too slowly, or the old server is stuck after takeover.
Either these methods are implemented to actually locally account for differences in these implementations, or is entirely common.
Either v1 or v2 may be changed to maintain this relationship but the scale factor and offset are considered read-only.
Either way, don't print anything out for those cases.
Either way, workaround it.
Elements 0 and key contain the key name of the array element, and 1 and value contain the data.
Elements are compared by user supplied function.
Elements will be arranged from highest to lowest when this function has completed.
Elements will be arranged from lowest to highest when this function has completed.
Else the option is set and TRUE is returned.
Else the option's value is returned.
Else, for unconnected sockets, name is the IP address of, the remote host, or NULL if the socket is connection-oriented.
Embeds binary IPTC data into a JPEG image.
Emit a 0 for an internal node and a 1 for each leaf.
Emit array of labels of opcode handlers and code for zend_opcode_handlers initialization
Emit code that dispatches to opcode handler
Emit code that initializes zend_opcode_handlers array
Emit executor code
Emit how big each leaf symbol is.
Emit labels for specialized executor For each opcode in opcode number order
Emit labels for unspecialized executor For each opcode in opcode number order
Emit local variables those are used for helpers' parameters
Emit pointer to handler of undefined opcode
Emit pointer to specialized handler
Emit pointer to unspecialized handler
Empty Array as argument
Empty array
Empty array for abstract and concrete classes.
Empty dir will have .
Empty prefix
Empty string
Empty string expected
Empty strings
Empty, fail.
Emulated PS
Emulated PS first
Emulates PS first
Enable interlancing
Enable showing stack traces on error conditions.
Enable use of Spyc from command line The syntax is the following: php Spyc.php spyc.yaml
EnableNetworkIOStatus has to be turned on.
Enabled by default.
Enables code coverage.
Enabling debugging using original zend_vm_def.h
Encode the tree first.
Encodes a URI to RFC 3986.
Encodes a given string str by the MIME header encoding scheme.
Encoding and decoding are done by the same function, passing an encoded string as argument will return the original version.
Encoding order may be specified by array or comma separated list string.
End of list, simply push it
End the current xml element.
Ends and reports xhprof network I/O profiling result.
Ends and reports xhprof profiling result.
Ends sampling based xhprof profiling.
Ends the DTD of the document.
Ends the current CDATA section.
Ends the current DTD attribute list.
Ends the current DTD element.
Ends the current DTD entity.
Ends the current attribute.
Ends the current comment.
Ends the current document.
Ends the current element.
Ends the current processing instruction.
Enforce this constraint.
English with Japanese characters
Ensure argument passing works
Ensure consistency in future.
Ensure correct unmangling of private property names for anonymous class instances
Ensure counter is advanced during loop
Ensure that PATH makes it through too
Ensure that an invariant is satisfied.
Ensure we can still unserialize the old style.
Ensure you can define a constant named type
Ensures that this Map contains only keys/values for which the specified callback returns true when passed the key and the value.
Ensures that this Map contains only keys/values for which the specified callback returns true when passed the value.
Ensures that this Set contains only keys/values for which the specified callback returns true when passed the key and the value.
Ensures that this Set contains only values for which the specified callback returns true.
Ensuring that inconsistent constructor use results in an error to avoid problems creeping in.
Ensuring that the collision still occurs as expected.
Entity Decl Tests
Entity declarations and notations are not made available.
Entity errors are reported at the end of the data thus only if is_final is set and TRUE.
Entity reference expansions and default attribute additions do not occur.
Entry point for retracting a constraint.
Error -tests test compact with zero arguments.
Error Conditions
Error cases
Error conditions
Error handling.
Error messages are stacked, so this function should be called multiple times to collect all of the information.
Error on all four, duplicates
Error test case for a PHP function
Error test case for a PHP method
Error, new types don't create new value constructors
Error: s declares only 'x', but at runtime it can also have a 'z' that we don't know anything about.
Errors related to timestamp/nonce are thrown to this callback.
Escape a string for use in an LDAP filter or DN.
Escape a string to be safe to include in a query.
Establishes a connection to a LDAP server on a specified hostname and port.
Europe/Lisbon
Eval.CodeCoverageOutputFile allows you to specify an output file to store results at end of a script run from command line.
Even an InfiniteIterator stops if its inner Iterator is empty.
Even if it succeeds, the subsequent calls should not crash which is what this test is trying to verify.
Even if there are three lines of prologue, this will keep continuing before we call analyzeTest
Even if there is another comment inbetween.
Even if we are found out to alreay be installed, still ensure that appropriate tests are disabled.
Even if we have vendor/, try and grab composer in case we're missing we're running a framework that isn't already installed.
Even the browser may buffer its input before displaying it.
Every array has an internal pointer to its "current" element, which is initialized to the first element inserted into the array.
Every subsequent call to strtok only needs the token to use, as it keeps track of where it is in the current string.
Every such reference will be replaced by the text captured by the n'th parenthesized pattern.
Everything else will cause bzopen to return FALSE.
Exact errors are in italics, errors where the message can vary are described in obliques.
Example: given an input pattern of "d-M H:m", and a skeleton of "MMMMddhhmm", the output pattern will be "dd-MMMM hh:mm".
Exception here -- if this is in a closure, then it will return false PHP fatals on closures and getting default values, we will just return false.
Exception test cases with fault funclets and nested FPI regions of various complexity.
Exception thrown here
Execute a query with placeholders and parameters.
Execute a request to the FastCGI application asyncronously  This sends request to application and returns the assigned ID for that request.
Execute the command in the root directory.
Execute the prepared statement.
Execute the tasks managed by this scheduler.
Executes a prepared statement and returns a result set object.
Executes a query and returns a single result.
Executes a result-less query against a given database.
Executes an SQL query, returning an SQLite3Result object if the query returns results.
Executes the given XPath expression and returns a typed result if possible.
Executes the given XPath expression.
Executes the program with the given arguments.
Executor is defined as a set of functions
Exercise aliasing across re-entry.
Existent column
Exits process on failure.
Expect warnings about INF.
Expected to fail -- untrusted server cert and no CA File present
Expected: false
Expected: true
Expecting 0
Explicit override of simple prop.
Explicit override of the native magic prop.
Explicit test as Composer depends on it
Explicit value-less return also results in a NULL generator return value and there is no interference with type hints
Explicitly cast from whatever is passed.
Explicitly construct an `AsyncMysqlException`.
Explode with attributes
Explode without attributes
Export handlers and helpers
Exports all methods from specified class.
Expression Display Ids should be reset within method bo
Extended commentary
Extended language subtags
Extension point for subclasses to execute code after Composer.
Extension point for subclasses to execute code before Composer.
Extra args are ignored.
Extra argument
Extra arguments are ignored
Extra information on how these read preferences work is available as well through the read preferences documentation page.
Extra parameters are not stored in the statement, and not displayed.
Extract a plan for resatisfaction starting from the given source constraints, usually a set of input constraints.
Extract a plan for resatisfying starting from the output of the given constraints, usually a set of input constraints.
Extract as many whole grapheme clusters as will fit into the given number of bytes:
Extract tests from a specified file, returns an array of tested function tokens
Extract the given number of whole grapheme clusters from the string:
Extract whole grapheme clusters up to a maximum number of UTF-8 characters:
Extracted files and directories preserve permissions as stored in the archive.
Extracting Global Variables
Extracts the pid from the Mongo ID
Extracts/decodes a message section from the supplied filename.
F - file name
F, g, G and b are not supported.
FALLTHROUGH
FALSE as key becomes key 0
FALSE if an error occurred.
FALSE is returned if incorrect parameters were passed.
FALSE is returned if split_length is less than 1.
FALSE outputs lowercase hexits.
FILEINFO_PRESERVE_ATIME - if possible preserve the original access time FILEINFO_SYMLINK - follow symlinks FILEINFO_DEVICES - look at the contents of blocks or character special devices FILEINFO_COMPRESS - decompress compressed files
FILE_APPEND If file filename already exists, append the data to the file instead of overwriting it.
FIPS-180 Vectors
FIRST CAPTURE
FIXME: HHVM doesn't support extension info
FIXME: HHVM doesn't support the disable_functions directive.
FIXME: HHVM doesn't support this
FIXME: Implicit public
FIXME: ReflectionParameter sh/could have native data pointing to the relevant Func::ParamInfo data structure
FNM_CASEFOLD Caseless match.
FNM_PATHNAME Slash in string only matches slash in the given pattern.
FNM_PERIOD Leading period in string must be exactly matched by period in the given pattern.
FPushClsMethod
FPushClsMethodD
FPushClsMethodF
FPushObjMethod
FPushObjMethodD
FS with strings
FTP this script to a server
Failing to prepare is OK
Failover may occur at any stage in any of the methods, as long as other servers are available the request the user won't notice.
Failure can only happen due to invalid parameters.
Failure can only occur is invalid arguments are provided.
Fake URL to trigger an error
Fake framework, eg 'hhvmquickinterp'
Fallback php script provides php REPL experience from debugger console window.
Fallback to token based test finding
Falls back to "B" if not given.
False by default.
False if the key doesn't exist and no initial_value was provided.
False if the key doesn't exist.
False to fail if the key does not exist.
Falsey inputs
Fatal error
Fatal error, script execution will end
Feel free to save the returned string as nothing.yaml and pass it around.
Feel free to save the returned string as tasteful.yaml and pass it around.
Fetch a request token, secret and any additional response parameters from the service provider.
Fetch a resource.
Fetch a result object, if available, containing some rows of the nonblocking query.
Fetch a result row as an object
Fetch a row
Fetch an access token, secret and any additional response parameters from the service provider.
Fetch element to insert before
Fetch of a particular section of the body of the specified messages.
Fetch one result row into array
Fetch the transliterator's ID
Fetch times from cache and from the stamp file.
Fetches a result row as an associative or numerically indexed array or both.
Fetches a row from a result set associated with a PDOStatement object.
Fetches all the structured information for a given message.
Fetches the next row and returns it as an object.
Fetchs a stored variable from the cache.
Field not listed in declared shape - error to access it
Fields are specified by "fieldname" : bool.
Figure out the algorithm the implementations use for negative and too-large shift counts
Figure out what handler to use
Figures out the best way of encoding the content read from the given file pointer.
File containing forcibly corrupted bmp image
File containing text string
File having no data
File names containing numerics, strings
File names containing whitespaces
File pointer position after read operation, expected at the beginning of the file
File pointer position after read operation, expected at the end of the file
File pointer position after write operation, expected at the end of the file
File testing corner cases for initialization of class members
File which doesn't exist
Files as stored across two collections, the first containing file meta information, the second containing chunks of the actual file.
Files within PharData archives do not have this restriction.
Fill border
Fill memory for test
Fills an array with num entries of the value of the value parameter, keys starting at the start_index parameter.
Fills an array with the value of the value parameter, using the values of the keys array as keys.
FilterIterator which uses a callback for each element
Find first occurrence closest to root Works on files or directories.
Find position of last occurrence of a case-insensitive string in a string.
Finds out the DN of an entry in the result.
Finds out whether the extension is loaded.
Finds position of the first occurrence of a string in a string.
Finds the path to the file where the class is defined.
Finds the type of the passed value, returns the value as the new type.
Finds whether the given variable is NULL.
Finds whether the given variable is a boolean.
Finds whether the given variable is a resource.
Finds whether the given variable is a scalar.
Finds whether the given variable is an array.
Finds whether the given variable is an object.
Finds whether the given variable is numeric.
Finds whether the type given variable is string.
Finds whether the type of the given variable is float.
Finds whether the type of the given variable is integer.
First a / as starting delimiter, then then pattern, another / and finally a string containing flags.
First character's position is 0.
First introduced in MySQL 6.0, backported to MySQL 5.5
First is valid callback, second is valid array.
First pass through, "learn" that these calls go to C1::__call.
First we need to set the MYSQLI_STMT_ATTR_UPDATE_MAX_LENGTH attribute in some cases.
Flag values for msg_receive MSG_IPC_NOWAIT If there are no messages of the desiredmsgtype, return immediately and do not wait.
Float array
Float operations
Float type variations
Flushes the current buffer.
Follow and sign redirects automatically, which is enabled by default.
Follow the interface hierarchy up
Following character sets are supported in PHP 4.3.0 and later.
Following class definition should fail, but cannot test
Foo can be used as int, but not the reverse
For 3.7 and below
For GET/POST/PUT tests, check if cgi sapi is available and if it is, use it.
For Oracle map NULL to empty string so the test doesn't diff
For UDP sockets, you must use STREAM_SERVER_BIND as the flags parameter.
For UTF-16, UTF-32, UCS2 and UCS4, encoding detection will fail always.
For Unix domain sockets, the target portion should point to the socket file on the filesystem.
For Windows systems, a complete overview of supported conversion specifiers can be found at MSDN.
For Zip-based archives, this method compresses all files in the archive using the specified compression.
For Zip-based archives, this method fails with an exception.
For a complete list of other status variables, you have to use the SHOW STATUS SQL command.
For a description of contexts, refer to Stream Functions.
For a final class, they are the same
For a given i/p string ensure that all combinations are generated given a reasonable sample of calls
For a prepared statement using named placeholders, this will be a parameter name of the form :name.
For a prepared statement using question mark placeholders, this will be the 1-indexed position of the parameter.
For additional information see: RFC 2782    NAPTR  order and pref: Equivalent to pri and weight above.
For aliased columns, you cannot access the contents with the original column name.
For animated GIFs there are 100 ticks per second, so a value of 20 would be 20/100 of a second aka 1/5th of a second.
For archives in tar or zip file format, this method converts the archive to a non-executable archive.
For backward transitions, must create objects with zone type 2 where specifying Daylight or Standard time is required then converting them to zone type 3.
For backwards compatibility, it also defaults the "w" option of its constructor argument to 0, which does not require write operations to be acknowledged by the server.
For binding assignment expressions, the RHS will be passed by reference via FPassV
For currencies you can use currency format type to create a formatter that returns a string with the formatted number and the appropriate currency sign.
For data that is smaller than 16MB, you may find it easier to embed it within the document using MongoBinData.
For decompressing, the default file extensions are .phar and .phar.tar.
For details on how to use this function, please refer to http://mirror.facebook.net/facebook/xhprof/doc.html.
For details on the Snappy compression algorithm go to http://code.google.com/p/snappy/.
For determining number of processes
For each op1.op_type except ANY
For each op2.op_type except ANY
For each op_data.op_type except ANY
For example "RGB".
For example, ": foo" will not be recognized as an XHP name by the parser.
For example, "MMMdd" and "mmhh" are skeletons.
For example, 200 for success and 500 for server error.
For example, 4.1.0 is returned as 40100.
For example, Britain converted in 1752, The USSR in 1918 and Greece in 1923.
For example, MessageFormatter enables you to print the phrase "Finished printing x out of y files..." in a manner that still allows for flexibility in translation.
For example, both "MMM-dd" and "dd/MMM" produce the skeleton "MMMdd".
For example, during a timeout in a query, the MySQL connection gets closed.
For example, if there is no occurrence of pattern, an array with only one element will be returned.
For example, if you set the limit to 2, and you try a third connection on the same pool, an `AsyncMysqlConnectException` exception will be thrown.
For example, if you're simply outputting data straight from an HTML form.
For example, it may allow protected and private methods to be invoked.
For example, it may allow protected and private properties to be accessed.
For example, it seems that on Linux when connecting to MySQL 5.1, the server always manages to send a full a reply.
For example, libenchant.dll loads libenchant_myspell.dll or libenchant_ispell.dll
For example, logged-on user's ID.
For example, on Linux, reiserfs may provide better performance than ext2fs.
For example, set fuzz to 10 and the color red at intensities of 100 and 102 respectively are now interpreted as the same color for the purposes of the floodfill.
For example, sqlite will wait for up to this time value before giving up on obtaining an writable lock, but other drivers may interpret this as a connect or a read timeout interval.
For example, suppose that the input pattern is "hhmmssSSSS", and the best matching pattern internally is "H:mm:ss", and the decimal string is ",".
For example, suppose that the input skeleton is "GyyyyMMMd", and there is no matching pattern internally, but there is a pattern matching "yyyyMMMd", say "d-MM-yyyy".
For example, the files document is something like:  and the chunks documents look like:  Of course, the default chunk size is thousands of bytes, but that makes an unwieldy example.
For example, the number 12345.67 is "12,345.67" in the US, "12 345,67" in France and "12.345,67" in Germany.
For example, this can be used to set the envelope sender address when using sendmail with the -f sendmail option.
For example, this returns "foo":    However, these return NULL:    To avoid surprising behavior, it is best not to depend on MongoDB to decide what to return, but to explicitly state a return value.
For example, to embed an image in a document, one could write:    This class contains a type field, which currently gives no additional functionality in the driver or the database.
For example, to insert the name O'reilly into a database, you will need to escape it.
For example, to profile all queries that take longer than one second, run:    Profiled queries will appear in the system.profile collection of this database.
For example, to retrieve options at the socket level, a level parameter of SOL_SOCKET would be used.
For example, use the WHERE and SORT BY clauses in SQL to restrict results before retrieving and processing them with PHP.
For example, what tests caused the regression.
For frameworks running in serial, just the framework name will be printed right now.
For instance, adding a sort causes the query to become a subfield of a bigger query object, like: This method is for adding a top-level field to a query.
For instance, if the same file is being checked multiple times within a single script, and that file is in danger of being removed or changed during that script's operation, you may elect to clear the status cache.
For instance, in the default "C" locale characters such as umlaut-a will not be converted.
For instance, in the string 'abcdef', the character at position 0 is 'a', the character at position 2 is 'c', and so forth.
For instance, this will not work:  This does not query for a user named "joe" with an age of 20.
For iterators that return SplFileInfo objects, the second parameter is required.
For list assignment expressions, if the RHS is a simple variable then it will be passed by reference via FPassH
For more complex formatting, like spelled-out numbers, the rule-based number formatters are used.
For more information about magic_quotes, see this security section.
For more information see: Martin Pool's  Natural Order String Comparison page.
For non-async connections, this returns ASYNC_OP_INVALID.
For non-null defaults, see param_tostring_hh.php
For now this will emit a warning just like if zend was compiled withot zlib
For now, as this is the one difference only between 0.9.x and 1.x, it's handled with placeholders to not to duplicate the test.
For now, remove any logging and code coverage settings from the configuration file.
For now, suppress the PHP error so as to match the missing HPHP one.
For now, we don't do IMemoizeParam type checks on generics.
For now, we don't grow tuple-like arrays - appending to them just downgrades them to vector-like arrays
For phpdbg tests, check if phpdbg sapi is available and if it is, use it.
For reach we check a plain value, a reference value with integer key and a reference value with a string key.
For reflection in finding tests Since PHPUnit 3.8, Autoload.php has gone away.
For reliability and performance reasons, the TCP implementation itself decides the appropriate octet boundaries of the underlying datagram communication layer.
For sendmail users, this file is /etc/mail/trusted-users.
For simple cases, see php5_pcntl_003.php
For some of the tests below the VM produces different output than Zend.
For static methods, pass null to this parameter.
For tar-based phar archives, the default extensions are .phar.tar, .phar.tar.gz, and .phar.tar.bz2.
For test reliability, we always want this to be set
For that fatal case, we handle that a bit differently.
For the below strings: 'English' is ASCII only, 'Japanese' has no ASCII characters and 'Greek' is mixed.
For the name of just the operating system, consider using the PHP_OS constant, but keep in mind this constant will contain the operating system PHP was built on.
For the purpose of this function, 'word' is defined as a locale dependent string containing alphabetic characters, which also may contain, but not start with "'" and "-" characters.
For the stream wrapper to stat a file.
For this function to work, you will need either to set some ID attributes with DOMElement::setIdAttribute or a DTD which defines an attribute to be of type ID.
For this reason the test is parametrized so there is no hardcoded timezone data.
For zip archives, this method fails with an exception.
For zip-based archives, the default extension is .zip.
For zip-based phar archives, the default extension is .phar.zip.
Force Typing_subtype.sub_string to run
Force a new tracelet
Force all the types to be in so these don't get constant folded.
Force bytea escaping and retry
Force integration of local variables
Force to be Tvar/Tunresolved
Force to write and empty the buffer
Forces collection of any existing garbage cycles.
Foreach over a FV with both key and value.
Foreach over a FV.
Form a cycle: await parent
Format a number according to current formatting rules.
Format a number using misc currencies/locales.
Format a number using misc locales/patterns.
Format argument as type Array
Format argument as type Object
Format argument as type String
Format can be forced regardless of file extension using format: prefix, for example "jpg:test.png".
Format number as currency.
Format support depends on the ImageMagick installation.
Format the number using the new value.
Format the number using the original attribute value.
Format the time and/or date according to locale settings.
Format with 14 positions of width, 8 digits of left precision, 2 of right precision using national  format for en_US
Format: YYYYMMDDHHMMSS
Formats the given dbgp response for output.
Four arguments, greater than expected no.
Frame 1 is within pseudo-main
Free resources associated with a result
Free up memory
Freeman-Benson and John Maloney January 1990 Communications of the ACM, also available as University of Washington TR 89-08-06.
Frees a MIME resource.
Frees the given XML parser.
Frees up the memory allocated internally to store the result.
From 4.0.5 on it's also possible to do parallel searches.
From Docs: Construct a new array iterator from anything that has a hash table.
From PHP 7 testing sources, with minor modification
From http://bugs.php.net/19865
From https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/2337
From php.net/foreach: "Unless the array is referenced, foreach operates on a copy of the specified array."
From task 10355299
From the manifest
From the mysql_change_user documentation: This command resets the state as if one had done a new connect.
Full parsing
Function arguments are counted starting from zero.
Function cmp_function should accept two parameters which will be filled by pairs of array keys.
Function cmp_function should accept two parameters which will be filled by pairs of entry keys.
Function is tested by passing associative array as well as array with default keys.
Function to extract a sequence of default grapheme clusters from a text buffer, which must be encoded in UTF-8.
G::G::f a bit weird
G::f exists
GB2312 936 Simplified Chinese, national standard character set.
GMT is zero for the timezone
Gather all of the stack traces this request thread has captured by now.
Gathers the statistics of the file named by filename.
Gathers the statistics of the file opened by the file pointer handle.
Gathers the statistics of the file or symbolic link named by filename.
Generate OAuth header string signature based on the final HTTP method, URL and a string/array of parameters
Generate a YAML representation of the provided data in the filename.
Generate a YAML representation of the provided data.
Generate a prologue for thrower:
Generate a signature based on the final HTTP method, URL and a string/array of parameters.
Generate and save the PEM file
Generate array of pixels.
Generate handler code
Generate handler for undefined opcodes
Generate helper code
Generate helper's code
Generate helper's entry point according to selected threading model
Generate opcode handler's code
Generate opcode handler's entry point according to selected threading model
Generate our own database.
Generate specialized executor
Generate the Node, and a pretty name for it
Generate the certificate
Generate zend_vm_execute.h
Generated by memcache.
Generates a Signature Base String according to pecl/oauth.
Generates a storable representation of a value  This is useful for storing or passing PHP values around without losing their type and structure.
Generates a string of pseudo-random bytes, with the number of bytes determined by the length parameter.
Generates a string of pseudo-random bytes.
Generates a string which is the pathname for the current controlling terminal for the process.
Generates code for opcode handler or helper
Generates cryptographically secure pseudo-random bytes that are suitable for use in cryptography when generating salts, keys and initialization vectors.
Generates helper
Generates localized date and/or time format pattern strings suitable for use in IntlDateFormatter.
Generates opcode handler
Generates specialized offsets
Generates the cyclic redundancy checksum polynomial of 32-bit lengths of the str.
Generator has been aborted as a result of an exception
Generator hasn't reached the "return" yet
Generic FVs are covariant
Generic type remains generic if it was not modified.
Get HTTP information about the last response.
Get a MIME charset string for a specific encoding.
Get a certain row in the current row block.
Get a command from the user and send it.
Get a hash item
Get a resource
Get a text message
Get aliases of a known encoding type.
Get all the test functions in the class
Get an image
Get an unset variable
Get attribute value back.
Get bundle's last error code.
Get bundle's last error message.
Get children of the current element.
Get collation attribute value.
Get collator's last error code.
Get current branch/hash information
Get current collation strength.
Get currently running wait handle in a context specified by its index.
Get currently running wait handle, or null if there is none.
Get cursorname
Get default attribute's value
Get default patten.
Get description of the last error.
Get encoding
Get error message from last internationalization function called.
Get formatter's last error code.
Get formatter's last error message.
Get framework information and set all needed properties.
Get headers for last response.
Get index of the current scheduler context, or 0 if there is none.
Get info from php
Get information about the password hash.
Get locale.
Get new dimensions
Get original symbol value.
Get original value of the attribute.
Get output and generate md5 hash
Get pattern used by the formatter.
Get resource variable
Get result data
Get result of an already finished Awaitable.
Get rid of any old data, except the expect file and test info, of course.
Get rid of any test file and test information.
Get security preferences.
Get some locals.
Get sort keys using various locales
Get stats on flushing the last data chunk from server.
Get symbolic name for a given error code.
Get text for collator's last error code.
Get the "age" of the code point.
Get the FC_NFKC_Closure property string for a character.
Get the TypeStructure that contains the full type information of the assigned type.
Get the TypeStructure with type information resolved.
Get the assigned type as a string.
Get the available paths in the current compilation database.
Get the color index for the background
Get the columnname
Get the constants of the given class.
Get the current class name
Get the current depth of the recursive iteration.
Get the current flags
Get the current row.
Get the details of an entry defined by its index.
Get the details of an entry defined by its name.
Get the error code from last operation  Returns error code from the last number formatting operation.
Get the error text from the last operation.
Get the file name of the PHP script in which C is defined
Get the index of the color which has the hue, white and blackness nearest the given color.
Get the iterator for the rows in the block.
Get the iterator over the fields in the current row.
Get the last error code.
Get the line number at the end of the definition of class C
Get the line number at the start of the definition of class C
Get the list of procedures stored in a specific data source
Get the list of table names stored in a specific data source
Get the locale for which the formatter was created.
Get the locale name of the collator.
Get the name of the type alias.
Get the name of the type constant.
Get the names of all the const values, indexed by value.
Get the names of function arguments and initialise mandatory and optional argument arrays
Get the namespace the class is in, if any
Get the new flags
Get the new iterator classname
Get the next line for the expected status for that test
Get the numeric value for a Unicode codepoint.
Get the original comment
Get the parameters
Get the paths that we know how to lint.
Get the pattern corresponding to a given skeleton.
Get the raw response of the most recent request.
Get the requested, valid and actual locales.
Get the scale of a field
Get the source from GitHub
Get the symbol value back.
Get the value of the global
Get the values of the public consts defined on this class, indexed by the string name of those consts.
Get/set pattern.
Get/set symbol.
Get/set text attribute.
Get/set various number formatting attributes.
Gets a character from the given file pointer.
Gets a line from file pointer.
Gets a line from the given handle.
Gets a list of all the collections in the database and returns them as an array of MongoCollection objects.
Gets a list of available cipher methods.
Gets a list of available digest methods.
Gets a prefixed unique identifier based on the current time in microseconds.
Gets all configuration options
Gets an attribute of the statement.
Gets an option value from an XML parser.
Gets current state of the formatter as a pattern.
Gets current thread's ID.
Gets increased when inited
Gets information about a group provided its id.
Gets information about a group provided its name.
Gets information about a link.
Gets information about the current CPU usage.
Gets information about the given message number by reading its headers.
Gets information about the system.
Gets information about the version and capabilities of the installed GD library.
Gets line number for where the node is defined.
Gets number of processors.
Gets options on the given cURL session handle.
Gets permissions for the given file.
Gets processor model.
Gets resolution of system clock.
Gets status information about the given mailbox.
Gets the Gregorian Calendar change date.
Gets the Unicode version information.
Gets the XML parser error code.
Gets the XML parser error string associated with the given code.
Gets the absolute pathname of the script's current working directory.
Gets the class for the reflected type constant.
Gets the color for a specified index.
Gets the connection status bitfield.
Gets the contents of the output buffer without clearing it.
Gets the current PHP process ID.
Gets the current active sub iterator.
Gets the current buffer contents and delete current output buffer.
Gets the current byte index of the given XML parser.
Gets the current column number of the given XML parser.
Gets the current line number for the given XML parser.
Gets the current working directory.
Gets the declaring class for the reflected type constant.
Gets the file group.
Gets the file inode.
Gets the file owner.
Gets the first attribute in the given entry.
Gets the float value of var.
Gets the full text of the last IMAP error message that occurred on the current page.
Gets the group set of the current process.
Gets the inode change time of a file.
Gets the inode of the current script.
Gets the kernel thread id of the current running thread.
Gets the length of a string.
Gets the list of implemented interfaces/inherited classes needed to implement an interface / use a trait.
Gets the maximum allowable depth.
Gets the namespace URI of the node based on the prefix.
Gets the namespace prefix of the node based on the namespace URI.
Gets the number of messages in the current mailbox.
Gets the number of recent messages in the current mailbox.
Gets the primary keys for a table
Gets the size for the given file.
Gets the time of the last modification of the current page.
Gets the value of a PHP configuration option.
Gets the value of the attribute in namespace namespaceURI with local name localName for the current node.
Gets the value of the attribute with name name for the current node.
Gets time of a system clock.
Getting equivelent ASCII value for the character in binary form
Getting inode of created file
Getting inode of current file
Getting inode of directories
Give the return value of the command back to the caller.
Give the server a second to really kill the other thread...
Give the server think-time to kill the pthread
Given a file name instead of a directory, the behaviour of the function is unspecified and may differ between operating systems and PHP versions.
Given a set of words, perform the appropriate translations on them to match the YAML 1.1 specification for type coercing.
Given a string containing a directory, this function will return the number of bytes available on the corresponding filesystem or disk partition.
Given a string containing a directory, this function will return the total number of bytes on the corresponding filesystem or disk partition.
Given a string containing a path to a file, this function will return the base name of the file.
Given a string containing a path to a file, this function will return the name of the directory.
Given the number of iterations in the loop, if we're wasting memory here, we should have megs and megs of extra allocations.
Giving a normal string
Global variable holding the current planner.
Good old magic stuff
Greater number of args than expected
Greek string in lower case UTF-8
Greek string in mixed case UTF-8 with multiple needles
Green if we go from something else to pass
GridFS is a storage specification all supported drivers implement.
Guesses the encoding of an array of bytes in an unknown encoding.
H::f3 exists, but not G::f3
HANDLER Syntax 13.2.5.
HHVM Warning: Case insensitive constant names are not supported in HipHop
HHVM doesn't support unpacking into empty
HHVM doesn't support unpacking into isset
HHVM doesn't support unpacking into unset
HHVM provides a native implementation for this class.
HINFO  cpu: IANA number designating the CPU of the machine referenced by this record.
HNI ParamCoerceModeFalse
HNI ParamCoerceModeNull
HPHP has has many version of these functions over time Faceobok has impelemtnation differences
HPHP, unlike PHP, truncates overflowing ints
HTML 5 has many more named entities.
HTML comments and PHP tags are also stripped.
HTML tags should not be counted as literal blocks.
HTML_TABLES_H
Hack assumes that this loop might or might not run.
Hack should not allow this
Hack treats method dispatch in a different way from PHP.
Handle persistent key at front of save_path
Handle them gracefully by displaying the class name.
Handling of LONG columns
Handling of binary column data
Handling of errors occurred in static methods when there's no object to get error code/message from.
Handy for debugging - should match.
Has less args then the implementing function
Has mixed types
Has no explicit return, but implicitly return NULL at the end
Have been referenced to each other
Have to find some small strings to truly reproduce  the problem, this example being not a problem
Having located a specific entry in the directory, you can find out what information is held for that entry by using this call.
Having multiple elements with the same value in a Heap is not recommended.
Having the PHP directive magic_quotes_sybase set to on will mean ' is instead escaped with another '.
Helper for getMethods: correctly ordered Set of the methods declared on this class and its parents
Helper function to build testing arrays
Helper to try to read an argument for an option.
Helper with parameter
Helper without parameters
Helps application inserting an artificial frame in xhprof's reporting.
Helps trigger bug.
Hence the keys for the input array can be variant0, variant1, ...,variant14.
Here are the keys for that array, and all values are `int`, except for `expiration_policy`, which is a `string`:  - `per_key_connection_limit`: The maximum number of connections allowed in the pool for a single combination of hostname, port, db and username.
Here comes Late Static Bindings
Here is an example:
Here two different outputs, which depends on the rounding value  before converting to string.
Here two different outputs, which depends on the rounding value before converting to string.
Here we create a new unit test "jenkins_async_test" and promise we'll update the results later.
Here, the traits conflicts are overridden by local definitions, and the two constructor definitions do not directly collide in that case.
Heredoc String
Heredoc string with blank line
Heredoc strings
Hexadecimal NUL
Hexadecimal Output for Empty file as input
Hexadecimal array
Hexadecimal string
Hexadecimal type variations
Hexadecimal values
Hexidecimal
Hhbbc better not remove any of the parameter locals just because they aren't used.
Hide a bool in APC so static analysis can't see it.
HipHop explicitly lists this in the inconsistencies doc.
Horizontal line
Host names are comma-separated and the constructor will return successfully if it connected to at least one host.
How the connection is made to the MySQL database is determined by the host parameter.
However these files still can be included if they are located in safe_mode_include_dir.
However when the method is invoked we generate an expression dependent type to ensure that the 'this' type between two instance refer to exactly the same type.
However, P8 does not invoke 'destructors' when refcount is decremented to 0.
However, any useful data that describes a file, but should not be contained inside of it may be stored.
However, doing so will result an in E_STRICT error being generated.
However, if a signal is caught or the remote host disconnects, the function may return less data.
However, if you really want, you can set mongo.allow_empty_keys to true in your php.ini file to override this sanity check.
However, if you were expecting a response, this means the database didn't give one.
However, if, for example, the query represented something that exceeded some network parameter, the result could come back in multiple blocks.
However, in certain cases, you may want to clear the cached information.
However, in many cases two colors may differ by a small amount.
However, it seems to only correctly handle exactly 1 file.
However, some elements might not be placed correctly and it may hence break the heap-property.
However, some require that we use php tokens or are found via phpt files.
However, there are some formatting codes that are missing such as Perl's "u" format code.
However, they cannot contain " ", "." or be the empty string.
However, this behaviour is not guaranteed for all databases and should not be relied on for portable applications.
However, this can be unnecessary when simply creating a new Phar archive, when it would make more sense to write the entire archive out at once.
I can set the var
I don't have a doc comment....
I don't think this timezone can be generated without a DateTime object
I think both p8 and php are wrong on the messages here p8 generates different messages to php, php is probably wrong php has either "File Exists" or "Permission Denied".
I think this is testing line 1297 of spl_iterators.c
I would expect to get an error message, but this is not what happens.
I'm trying to make this work, but get:
I's doc comment
I've kept it this way to avoid deviating too much from the original implementation.
I.e., if it's integer then INT32 would be chosen on 32-bit, INT64 on 64-bit, if it's double, DOUBLE would be chosen.
ICU resource bundle can hold simple resources and complex resources.
ICU resource mechanism allows to define sets of resources that the application can load on locale basis, while accessing them in unified locale-independent fashion.
ICU treats this as as two code points.
ICU treats this three-byte sequence as one invalid two-byte code point followed by a valid ASCII character.
ID column, binary charset
IDL ParamCoerceModeNull
ILlegal since Foo::class means something else.
INSERT a single row
INT and integer work well together
IPv6 explicit port.
IPv6 with override port.
IPv6 with port.
IV MUST exist in CFB, CBC, STREAM, nOFB and OFB modes.
IV is ignored in ECB.
Ideally we would be able to detect the impossibility of this comparison succeeding.
Identity function.
Ids are chosen randomly rather than seqentially to guard against false-positives when using persistent sockets.
If 'sz' is greater than the current size of this Vector, this Vector is extended by appending as many copies of 'value' as needed to reach a size of 'sz' elements.
If 'sz' is less than or equal to the current capacity of this MapLike, does nothing.
If 'sz' is less than or equal to the current capacity of this VectorLike, does nothing.
If 'sz' is smaller than the current size of this Vector, elements are removed from the end of this Vector.
If -1 is used, the default compression of the zlib library is used which is 6.
If 0 is passed, the entire output of the supplied algorithm is used.
If 0, then the entire entry is read.
If ENT_QUOTES is set, both single and double quotes are translated and if ENT_NOQUOTES is set neither single nor double quotes are translated.
If FALSE or not set, only the top level output buffer is returned.
If FALSE, no information will be sent.
If FALSE, ns will be regarded as a namespace URL.
If I construct a Exception, the passed-in or default "" gets used.
If I subclass Exception, whether I define a constructor for that class or not, the base class constructor appears to be called anyway, and overwrites the supposed unknown.
If INI_SCANNER_RAW is supplied, then option values will not be parsed.
If NULL is provided, any previously registered class extending baseclass will be removed.
If NULL or the empty string, the default time zone for the runtime is used.
If NumberFormatter::PATTERN_DECIMAL or NumberFormatter::PATTERN_RULEBASED is passed then the number format is opened using the given pattern, which must conform to the syntax described in ICU DecimalFormat documentation or ICU RuleBasedNumberFormat documentation, respectively.
If OnOff is set, this function returns TRUE on success and FALSE on failure.
If PHP is compiled against GD library 2.0 or higher and the image is a truecolor image, this function returns the RGB value of that pixel as integer.
If PHP is not properly recognizing the line endings when reading files either on or created by a Macintosh computer, enabling the auto_detect_line_endings run-time configuration option may help resolve the problem.
If Standard PHP Library is installed,  it will return the properties of an object.
If Standard PHP library is  installed, it will return the properties of an object.
If Standard PHP library is installed,  it will return the properties of an object.
If Standard PHP library is installed, it will return the properties of an object.
If `0`, that means no activity occurred.
If a DateTime or an IntlCalendar object is passed, its timezone is not considered.
If a connection request arrives with the queue full the client may receive an error with an indication of ECONNREFUSED, or, if the underlying protocol supports retransmission, the request may be ignored so that retries may succeed.
If a cycle is detected, remove the given constraint and answer false.
If a function call, nothing is returned.
If a key from the first array exists in the second array, its value will be replaced by the value from the second array.
If a key of a different type is used, an exception will be thrown.
If a key only exists in the first array, it will be left as is.
If a non-integer key is used, an exception will be thrown.
If a non-numeric value is used for timestamp, FALSE is returned and an E_WARNING level error is emitted.
If a property has not been assigned a value, it will be returned with a NULL value.
If a socket resource is passed to this function, the last error which occurred on this particular socket is returned.
If a static method call, "::" is returned.
If a string is not UTF-8, a MongoException will be thrown.
If a string is passed as the needle, then only the first character of that string will be used.
If a string is passed, any exception that occurs inside the DateTime constructor is propagated.
If a value has several occurrences, the latest key will be used as its values, and all others will be lost.
If a value of a different type is used, an exception will be thrown.
If abbr doesn't exist then the time zone is searched solely by the gmtOffset and isdst.
If absent, default or current connection will be applied to.
If all goes according to plan, on second time we should get PNG
If all of the arrays contain only numeric keys, the resulting array is given incrementing keys starting from zero.
If an IV was used during encryption, it is returned via iv.
If an array is passed then each element is checked.
If an array is passed then each element is fetched and returned.
If an element with the same key is already present, an exception is thrown.
If an error occurs a warning will be displayed accordingly.
If an error occurs, if the connection is reset, or if no data is available, buf will be set to NULL.
If an error occurs, like the user lacks permission to change the priority, an error of level E_WARNING is also generated.
If an error occurs, returns FALSE.
If an interface parameter is defined in terms of a type constant then we require implementers to provide a type hint
If an is_null flag is in use, only that flag is required to be initialized
If an object is inserted into the database without an _id field, an _id field will be added to it with a MongoId instance as its value.
If an option could not be successfully set, FALSE is immediately returned, ignoring any future options in the options array.
If analyzeTest returns false, then we have most likely hit a fatal.
If any of the necessary mysqli properties come in as null, then we can use our default ini options.
If any of these functions is called from within a phar archive with a relative path, the call is modified to access a file within the phar archive.
If any packet is somehow lost during communication, TCP will automatically retransmit the packet until the destination host acknowledges that packet.
If array is passed in, then an array is returned that contains all existing keys, or an empty array if none exist.
If bind_rdn and bind_password are not specified, an anonymous bind is attempted.
If both pattern and replacement parameters are arrays, each pattern will be replaced by the replacement counterpart.
If browser_name is omitted or null, HTTP_USER_AGENT is used.
If buffer is 0 then write operations are unbuffered.
If cacert is NULL, the generated certificate will be a self-signed certificate.
If cache_type is "filehits", information about which files have been served from the bytecode cache for the current request will be returned.
If callbackfunc is set to NULL, returns the extracted section as a string.
If called statically, returns a DOMDocument and issues E_STRICT warning.
If called with two arguments, it sets the value of note note_name to note_value and returns the previous value of note note_name.
If called without parameter outside object, this function returns FALSE.
If config doesn't provide a test suffix, assume the default
If converting to a phar-based archive, the default extensions are .phar, .phar.gz, or .phar.bz2 depending on the specified compression.
If converting to a tar-based phar archive, the default extensions are .tar, .tar.gz, and .tar.bz2 depending on specified compression.
If data is a stream resource, the remaining buffer of that stream will be copied to the specified file.
If data is null, we're done with this benchmark.
If db is not specified, "admin" will be used.
If delimiter contains a value that is not contained in string and a negative limit is used, then an empty arraywill be returned, otherwise an array containing string will be returned.
If desired, the NULL value may be passed resulting in only changing the user and not selecting a database.
If desiredmsgtype is greater than 0, then the first message of that type is returned.
If desiredmsgtype is less than 0, the first message on the queue with the lowest type less than or equal to the absolute value of desiredmsgtype will be read.
If dest is a URL, the copy operation may fail if the wrapper does not support overwriting of existing files.
If directory is not a directory, then boolean FALSE is returned, and an error of level E_WARNING is generated.
If divisor is 0, a DivisionByZeroError exception is thrown.
If e is specified, replacement string will be evaluated as PHP expression.
If empty string is passed, the parser attempts to identify which encoding the document is encoded in by looking at the heading 3 or 4 bytes.
If empty, all functions will be intercepted by the specified handler and registered individual handlers will be replaced.
If encoding is omitted, then the current character encoding name is returned.
If encoding_list is omitted, detect_order is used.
If entire_row is TRUE, then it returns an array of the entire first row.
If everything is OK, the CURLE_OK will be the result.
If exceptions is not set then SOAP call will throw an exception on error.
If filename does not exist, the file is created.
If filename is a relative filename, it will be checked relative to the current working directory.
If filename is a symbolic link, statistics are from the file itself, not the symlink.
If filename is a symbolic or hard link then the link will be resolved and checked.
If filter accepts options, flags can be provided in "flags" field of array.
If from and to are different lengths, the extra characters in the longer of the two are ignored.
If from_encoding is not specified, the internal encoding will be used.
If funcname needs to be working with the actual values of the array, specify the first parameter of funcname as a reference.
If i is specified for this parameter, the case will be ignored.
If it could not connect to any of the hosts, it will throw a MongoConnectionException.
If it fails, it calls `invariant_violation`  This function provides a way to have a variable type checked as a more specific type than it is currently declared.
If it fails, it calls invariant_violation
If it is negative, it represents the number of characters from the end of string at which to stop replacing.
If it is not specified, 0 is used.
If it is not specified, the previous one will be used.
If it is omitted, internal character encoding is used.
If it is omitted, the internal character encoding value will be used.
If it is omitted, then the sequence will have everything from offset up until the end of the array.
If it is omitted, this function checks all the input from the beginning of the request.
If it returns false, then something else bad happened.
If it throws an exception, catch it and return the exception object.
If it works for one, it should work for all.
If it's equal to zero, the item will be deleted right away whereas if you set it to 30, the item will be deleted in 30 seconds.
If it's equal to zero, the item will never expire.
If item specified by key was not numeric and cannot be converted to a number, it will change its value to value.
If larger than 1D, we have no mapping.
If latency is set to 0 then there is no latency score for this benchmark.
If length is given and is 0, FALSE or NULL an empty string will be returned.
If length is given and is negative then the sequence will stop that many elements from the end of the array.
If length is given and is non-negative, then subject will be examined for length characters after the starting position.
If length is omitted, the substring starting from start until the end of the string will be returned.
If length is specified and is negative then the end of the removed portion will be that many elements from the end of the array.
If length is specified and is positive, then that many elements will be removed.
If lengthis given and is negative, then subject will be examined from the starting position up to length characters from the end of subject.
If limit is set, the returned array will contain a maximum of limit  elements with the last element containing the rest of string.
If link_identifier is invalid, NULL is returned.
If locale is "0", the locale setting is not affected, only the current setting is returned
If locale is "0", the locale setting is not affected, only the current setting is returned.
If locale is NULL, the locale names will be set from the values of environment variables with the same names as the above ENV settings
If locale is an array or followed by additional parameters then each array element or parameter is tried to be set as new locale until success.
If locale is empty string "", the locale names will be set from the values of environment variables with the same names as from ENV
If m is specified, match will be executed in multiline mode and line break will be included in '.'.
If magic_quotes_sybase is on, no backslashes are stripped off but two apostrophes are replaced by one instead.
If matches are found, the new subject will be returned, otherwise subject will be returned unchanged or NULL if an error occurred.
If max_memory is negative, only memory will be used.
If max_memory is zero, no memory will be used.
If maxlength is not specified, all remaining content in source will be copied.
If more_entropy is TRUE, it will be 23 characters.
If multiple output callback functions are active, output is being filtered sequentially through each of them in nesting order.
If multiple values can be considered of the same size, the one that is listed first will be returned.
If name is empty, all previously registered handlers, including those that are set by individual function names, will be removed.
If name is specified, the name of the current session is changed to its value.
If namespaceURI, qualifiedName, and doctype are null, the returned DOMDocument is empty with no document element
If needle is a string, the comparison is done in a case-sensitive manner.
If needle is found in haystack more than once, the first matching key is returned.
If needle is not a string, it is converted to an integer and applied as the ordinal value of a character.
If needle is not found, FALSE is returned.
If needle is not found, it returns FALSE.
If needle is not found, returns FALSE.
If negative, it starts counting from the end of the string.
If negative, then there was a select failure.
If new work is added to the suspended task it will be made runnable.
If no Iterator is attached, we always return false.
If no arguments are specified then the link identifier of the already opened link will be returned.
If no changes are specified, this method throws a BadMethodCallException if the archive is in phar file format.
If no changes are specified, this method throws a BadMethodCallException.
If no classes are defined, an empty array is returned.
If no config files were given at the command line, use a default
If no connection is found or established, an E_WARNING level error is generated.
If no database is given, the current database is used.
If no drivers are available, it returns an empty array.
If no element matches the search value, this function returns -1.
If no errors exist, 0 is returned.
If no filename is given, then the trace file will be placed in the directory as configured by the xdebug.trace_output_dir setting.
If no function are defined, an empty array is returned.
If no function is registered the return value will be an empty array.
If no language is set previously, it then returns FALSE.
If no length is specified, it will keep reading from the stream until it reaches the end of the line.
If no matches are found in string, then it will be returned unchanged.
If no matches are found or an error happens, FALSE will be returned.
If no matches are found or an error occurred, an empty array is returned when subject is an array or NULL otherwise.
If no messages match the criteria, your script will wait until a suitable message arrives on the queue.
If no node has the given key, the last node on the search path is moved to the top of the tree.
If no order flag is given, PREG_PATTERN_ORDER is assumed.
If no parameters are given, the current time is used and the increment is automatically provided.
If no parameters are given, the current time is used.
If no previous handler was defined, NULL is also returned.
If no year is specified, the current year is assumed.
If not given just return the current list.
If not given, the default compression level will be the default compression level of the zlib library.
If not given, the length will be limited to 76 characters.
If not provided, default to the sysvshm.init_mem in the php.ini, otherwise 10000 bytes.
If not provided, the behaviour is defined by the algorithm implementation and can lead to unexpected results.
If not specified it will default to 0.
If not specified, a stdClass object is returned.
If not specified, default for the type.
If not specified, step will default to 1.
If not specified, the MAGIC environment variable is used.
If not specified, the contents will be sent to "stdout".
If not specified, the value of the mcrypt.algorithms_dir directive is used.
If not specified, the value of the mcrypt.modes_dir directive is used.
If not supplied, newnode is appended to the children.
If not, then all is good.
If not, this function will only return the previous setting without changing it.
If not, throw exception and quit.
If not, thumbs down because there was a difference between what we ran and what we expected.
If nothing was read, it must return an empty string.
If null, we are done.
If object is omitted when inside a class, the name of that class is returned.
If offset and length are such that nothing is removed, then the elements from the replacement array are inserted in the place specified by the offset.
If offset is negative then it starts that far from the end of the input array.
If offset is negative, the sequence will start that far from the end of the array.
If omitted, iconv.internal_encoding will be used.
If omitted, the default value for this argument is ISO-8859-1 in versions of PHP prior to 5.4.0, and UTF-8 from PHP 5.4.0 onwards.
If options is omitted, it returns the string that describes the current options.
If options is used, this function will return a string if not all elements are requested.
If output buffering isn't active then FALSE is returned.
If output_callback returns FALSE original input is sent to the browser.
If p is specified, match will be executed in POSIX mode, line break will be considered as normal character.
If pad_size is positive then the array is padded on the right, if it's negative then on the left.
If pad_type is not specified it is assumed to be STR_PAD_RIGHT.
If parameter timeout is specified, the item will expire after timeout seconds.
If parameters given assume they represent selected tests to run.
If pattern is not specified, the previous one is used.
If replace has fewer values than search, then an empty  string is used for the rest of replacement values
If replace has fewer values than search, then an empty string is used for the rest of replacement values.
If return_float is set, then a float is returned.
If returned `int` is positive, that represents the number of handles on which there was activity.
If search is an array and replace is a string, then this replacement string is used for every value of search.
If search or replace are arrays, their elements are processed first to last.
If seconds is zero, no new alarm is created.
If set to 0 both attributes types and attribute values are fetched which is the default behaviour.
If set to 0, the current process is assumed.
If set to 0, then the string "Success" is returned.
If set to NULL, the existing file format will be preserved.
If set to TRUE, details of errors in a SoapServer application will be sent to the clients.
If set to TRUE, it returns all of haystack from the beginning to the first occurrence of needle.
If set to TRUE, it returns all of haystack from the beginning to the last occurrence of needle.
If setlocale is global, the pagelet thread will have changed this output line to Dutch
If several arrays are passed for replacement, they will be processed in order, the later array overwriting the previous values.
If several arrays are passed for replacement, they will be processed in order, the later arrays overwriting the previous values.
If size is greater than the current array size, the array will be padded with NULL values.
If size is larger than the file it is extended with null bytes.
If size is larger than the file then the file is extended with null bytes.
If size is less than the current array size, any values after the new size will be discarded.
If size is smaller than the file then the file is truncated to that size.
If size is smaller than the file, the extra data will be lost.
If so, it will be documented.
If so, techniques should be provided to prevent misuse, otherwise expect exceptions or fatal errors.
If some opcode numbers are not used then fill hole with pointers to handler of undefined opcode
If specified, the path to which data is saved will be changed.
If split_length is  specified, break the string down into chunks each  split_length characters long.
If stack is TRUE, images are stacked top-to-bottom.
If start and length are omitted, then all of subject will be examined.
If start denotes a position beyond this truncation, an empty string will be returned.
If start is negative, the replacing will begin at the start'th character from the end of string.
If start is negative, the returned string will start at the start'th character from the  end of string.
If start is negative, the returned string will start at the start'th character from the end of string.
If start position is multi-byte character's second byte or larger, it starts from first byte of multi-byte character.
If status is SKIP, then we just move on and don't count either way.
If str is shorter than offset characters long, FALSE will be returned.
If str is shorter than start characters long, the empty string will be returned.
If stream_select returns 0, then there is no more data or we have timed out.
If string is an array then array is returned.
If string is less than or equal to start characters long, FALSE  will be returned.
If string is less than or equal to start characters long, FALSE will be returned.
If subject is an array, then the search and replace is performed on every entry of subject, and the return value is an array as well.
If subject is an array, then the search and replace is performed with every entry of subject, and the return value is an array as well.
If substchar is not set, it returns the Unicode value, or "none" or "long".
If successful the sealed data is returned in sealed_data, and the envelope keys in env_keys.
If successful, record the solution, perhaps modifying the current dataflow graph.
If successful, the method creates a new archive on disk and returns a PharData object.
If that flag is not set we return true on the first valid sub iterator found.
If that would be the case, the test would be broken.
If the IV is ignored in the specified cipher/mode combination zero is returned.
If the SQLSTATE error code is not set or there is no driver-specific error, the elements following element 0 will be set to NULL.
If the SplFileObject::READ_CSV flag is set, this method returns an array containing the current line parsed as CSV data.
If the absolute value of pad_size is less than or equal to the length of the input then no padding takes place.
If the array you wish to sort needs to be sorted by some non-trivial criteria, you should use this function.
If the attribute does not exist, it will be created.
If the autoload stack is not activated then the return value is FALSE.
If the build includes encryption, then it will attempt to use the key.
If the built-in error handler is used NULL is returned.
If the call fails, it will return FALSE
If the callback function has two parameters, the second parameter is filled with a bit-field consisting of PHP_OUTPUT_HANDLER_START, PHP_OUTPUT_HANDLER_CONT and PHP_OUTPUT_HANDLER_END.
If the caller is a super user, this will also set the effective group id.
If the class is defined in the PHP core or in a PHP extension, FALSE is returned.
If the collator was instantiated from rules or an error occurred, returns boolean FALSE.
If the collator was instantiated from rules or an error occurred, returns false.
If the column from which you are retrieving the value is not an integral type, then an `Exception` is thrown.
If the column from which you are retrieving the value is not an numeric type, then an `Exception` is thrown.
If the component parameter is omitted, an associative array is returned.
If the database was set to autocommit mode, this function will restore autocommit mode after it has rolled back the transaction.
If the delay was interrupted by a signal, an associative array will be returned with the components: seconds - number of seconds remaining in the delay nanoseconds - number of nanoseconds remaining in the delay
If the desired protocol is TCP, or UDP the corresponding constants SOL_TCP, and SOL_UDP can also be used.
If the document have no DTD attached, this method will return FALSE.
If the environment variable isn't set, then PHP's bundled magic database will be used.
If the error has been caused by a PHP internal function then the "message" begins with its name.
If the error message is not listed above, it is probably an error from the C socket, and you can search the web for its usual cause.
If the field offset is not specified, the next field that was not yet retrieved by this function is retrieved.
If the file does not exist it will look for composer.json and do the same.
If the file does not exist, it will be created.
If the file is large, it will automatically be split into smaller chunks and each chunk will be saved as a document in the chunks collection.
If the file is valid, it will be moved to the filename given by destination.
If the filename ends in suffix this will also be cut off.
If the first baseline run, make both the same.
If the flag FILTER_NULL_ON_FAILURE is used, it returns FALSE if the variable is not set and NULL if the filter fails.
If the framework does not exist in your local repo, it gets downloaded to your dev box.
If the function returns FALSE then the normal error handler continues.
If the hostname is invalid, data-related operations will set Memcached::RES_HOST_LOOKUP_FAILURE result code.
If the input arrays have the same string keys, then the later value for that key will overwrite the previous one.
If the input arrays have the same string keys, then the values for these keys are merged together into an array, and this is done recursively, so that if one of the values is an array itself, the function will merge it with a corresponding entry in another array too.
If the interlace bit is set and the image is used as a JPEG image, the image is created as a progressive JPEG.
If the key exists in the second array, and not the first, it will be created in the first array.
If the key is not found, an exception is thrown.
If the key is not present, `null` is returned.
If the key is not present, an exception is thrown.
If the key is not present, null is returned.
If the last SQL statement executed by the associated PDOStatement was a SELECT statement, some databases may return the number of rows returned by that statement.
If the last query was a DELETE query with no WHERE clause, all of the records will have been deleted from the table but this function will return zero with MySQL versions prior to 4.1.2.
If the length arquement is given,writing will stop after length bytes have been written or the end of string reached, whichever comes first.
If the limit parameter is negative, all components except the last -limit are returned.
If the limit parameter is zero, then this is treated as 1.
If the localesList is empty, no restrictions will be placed on the allowed characters.
If the majority of the lines in the file are all larger than 8KB, it is more resource efficient for your script to specify the maximum line length.
If the message queue already exists, the perms will be ignored.
If the multiplier is set to 0, the function  will return an empty string.
If the multiplier is set to 0, the function will return an empty string.
If the new node is already a child it will not be added a second time.
If the newChild is already in the tree, it is first removed.
If the note cannot be retrieved, FALSE is returned.
If the number of affected rows is greater than maximal PHP int value, the number of affected rows will be returned as a string value.
If the number of elements of the current `Pair` are not equal to the number of elements in the `Traversable`, then only the combined elements up to and including the final element of the one with the least number of elements is included.
If the number of rows is greater than PHP_INT_MAX, the number will be returned as a string.
If the numerator is PHP_INT_MIN and the divisor is -1, then an ArithmeticError exception is thrown.
If the object does not have a parent or the class given does not exist FALSE will be returned.
If the object is from the database, update the existing database object, otherwise insert this object.
If the old style handler also fails to register the class then the object becomes an incomplete class instance.
If the open fails, the function returns FALSE.
If the optional argument pad_string is not supplied, the input is padded with spaces, otherwise it is padded with characters from pad_string up to the limit.
If the optional format is not specified, then the return value will be an integer representing the number of words found.
If the optional parameter regs was not passed or the length of the matched string is 0, this function returns 1.
If the optional regs parameter was specified, the function returns the byte length of matched part, and the array regs will contain the substring of matched string.
If the optional search_value is specified, then only the keys for that value are returned.
If the optional sorting_order is set to non-zero, then the sort order is alphabetical in descending order.
If the original node had a parent node, the new node is inserted as the next sibling of the original node.
If the output_callback is not a callable function, this function will return FALSE.
If the parameter doesn't exist in the stylesheet it will be ignored.
If the parameter is not optional a ReflectionException will be thrown.
If the pattern has the same skeleton as an existing pattern, and the override parameter is set, then the previous value is overridden.
If the power cannot be computed FALSE will be returned instead.
If the previous error handler was a class method, this function will return an indexed array with the class and the method name.
If the property is static this parameter is left out and only value needs to be provided.
If the replacement succeeds the old node is returned.
If the requested component doesn't exist within the given URL, NULL will be returned.
If the result can be represented as integer it will be returned as type integer, else it will be returned as type float.
If the skeleton contains fractional seconds, then this is used with the fractional seconds.
If the socket is connection-oriented, name is NULL.
If the socket is connection-oriented, port will be NULL.
If the socket is non-blocking then this function returns FALSE with an error Operation now in progress.
If the socket is not connection-oriented, name will be set to the internet protocol address of the remote host or the path to the UNIX socket.
If the socket resource is omitted, the error code of the last failed socket function is returned.
If the source and destination coordinates and width and heights differ, appropriate stretching or shrinking of the image fragment will be performed.
If the stack is activated and empty after unregistering the given function then it will be deactivated.
If the stack is not yet activated it will be activated.
If the sum of offset and count exceeds the length, then all 16-bit units to the end of the data are returned.
If the sum of offset and count exceeds the length, then all characters to the end of the data are deleted.
If the sum of offset and count exceeds the length, then all characters to the end of the data are replaced.
If the target is elsewhere in the map, __call's state will be reset to use the new map element.
If the temporary file exceeds this size, it will be moved to a file in the system's temp directory.
If the test that is coming in to this function is an individual test, as opposed to a file, then we can use the --filter option to make the run string have even more specificity.
If the value is an array, valid keys are filter which specifies the filter type, flags which specifies any flags that apply to the filter, and options which specifies any options that apply to the filter.
If the value is inserted, it becomes the root of the tree.
If the value is not an array of valid items, an UnexpectedValueException is thrown
If there are fewer elements in the replacement array than in the pattern array, any extra patterns will be replaced by an empty string.
If there are multiple connections queued on the socket, the first will be used.
If there are no more entries in the result then it returns FALSE.
If there are some matches, the first element will have the matched sub-string, the second element will have the first part grouped with brackets, the third element will have the second part grouped with brackets, and so on.
If there is a default value, then there has to be defaultText If the defaultText is a class constant, then classname will be associated with the text, so you can use defined for that as well.
If there is an invalid byte sequence for the following encodings, encoding detection will fail.
If there is more than one regex back to back, just don't end the first
If there is no content in the directories under vendor, then we did not get the dependencies.
If there is no debugger that's attached, it will not do anything.
If there were any successful queries before receiving the error, this will let you know how many of those there were.
If there's an issue from now on, its a failure
If this argument is omitted, the request is assumed to be in the raw POST data of the HTTP request.
If this connections isn't SSL, `false` will be returned as well.
If this handler returns FALSE, code will continue with original function.
If this is available, a configuration file is being used.
If this is not used, TEST_WEB_BASE_URL should be the base url pointing to TEST_PHP_SRCDIR, which should then be accessible via an http server.
If this is reached, the script returns a fatal error.
If this length is greater than the buffer length, it is silently truncated to the length of the buffer.
If this means to another Iterator then it rewinds that Iterator.
If this occurs, the server will indicate that it has only returned a partial results set.
If this parameter is a string and the pattern parameter is an array, all patterns will be replaced by that string.
If this parameter is negative, then the SQL aggregate may take any number of arguments.
If this parameter is negative, then the SQL function may take any number of arguments.
If this parameter is not provided, wait will be used for the system call.
If this part is not set for a recipient, this key will hold the same value as address.
If this test fails ask the developers of run-test.php
If time is not supplied, the current system time is used.
If timeout is not provided or evaluates to -1, the current timeout value of timeout_type is returned as an integer.
If timezone is not set, use UTC.
If trimmarker is set, trimmarker is appended to the return value.
If true and if the server doesn't support pagination, the search will return no result.
If two members compare as equal, their order in the sorted array is undefined.
If two or more columns of the result have the same field names, the last column will take precedence.
If type is omitted, it returns the last input type processed.
If type is specified as "http_output", "http_input", "internal_encoding", "func_overload", the specified setting parameter will be returned.
If undefined, the first field is retrieved.
If unserialize is FALSE, the message will be returned as a binary-safe string.
If use has requested a class check that method is specified
If using the column name, be aware that the name should match the case of the column, as returned by the driver.
If var is not an array or an object with implemented Countable interface, 1 will be returned.
If wait3 is not available, providing a value for options will have no effect.
If we actually have something in cache, and the times match, use it.
If we already read the response during an earlier call for different id, just return it
If we are at the end of the data, block for a while rather than returning no data.
If we are using --latest or --latest-record, we checkout from a branch above, then get an updated commit hash to put in our frameworks.json file
If we cannot open the stats file, return Fatal
If we failed to prepare we need to move the error messages that are on the mysqli_stmt object to the mysqli object otherwise the user will never be able to get them.
If we get false back, then a header is required.
If we get headers back, then a proxy is not required.
If we have "No tests executed", assume a skip Otherwise, print the final stats.
If we have a connection going, then send it a break command.
If we have a large result set, we can iterate through it, loading a few megabytes of results into memory at a time.
If we have finished the tests, then we are just printing any error info and getting the final stats
If we have no final stats, assume some sort of fatal for this test.
If we haven't helper with specified spicialized operands then using unspecialized helper
If we hit a fatal or something, we will stop the overall test running for this particular test sequence
If we hit what we think is the final stats based on the pattern of the line, make sure this is the case.
If we pull/merge, the HEAD SHA changes.
If we really need that functionality, we can do something like this instead: https://phabricator.fb.com/P20754288
If we've run too few iterations, we continue for another second.
If whence is not specified, it is assumed to be SEEK_SET.
If x is specified, white space will be ignored.
If y is non-zero, r has the same sign as x and a magnitude less than the magnitude of y.
If you append the string //IGNORE, characters that cannot be represented in the target charset are silently discarded.
If you append the string //TRANSLIT to out_charset transliteration is activated.
If you are using this function, you might consider just creating a connection pool via `AsyncMysqlConnectionPool` since you presumably have all the connection details anyway.
If you are writing sharding tools, read on.
If you authenticate on connection and the connection drops and reconnects during your session, you'll be reauthenticated.
If you call them from callback function, the behavior is undefined.
If you cause the output to change, inspect the results carefully to ensure we have a balanced enter/exit for every call.
If you change the name here, also make sure to change the name in Jenkins script that updates the test result -- they have to be the same.
If you connect directly to a secondary in a replica set, you still need to call this function, which basically tells the database that you are aware that you might be getting older data and you're okay with that.
If you create the file, it will return TRUE even if you then delete the file.
If you created the image from a file, only colors used in the image are resolved.
If you do not call this, you'll get "not master" errors when you try to query.
If you do not want to use it you should set it to zeros, but this is not recommended.
If you do, then adjust NUM_GP_ARGS/NUM_SIMD_ARGS as needed and pipe the output of this script to runtime/vm/native-func-caller.h  I solemnly swear that I am up to no good.
If you don't need to use a custom context, you can skip this parameter by NULL.
If you don't understand how NativeFuncCaller works, don't use this script.
If you don't want the same base DN and the same filter for all the searches, you can also use an array of base DNs and/or an array of filters.
If you give it an unsigned integer value too large to be stored that way it is converted to a float which often yields an undesired result.
If you have a direct query that requires no placeholders, then you can use this method.
If you have enabled safe mode, or open_basedir further restrictions may apply.
If you have exhasted the cursor, it will not reset it.
If you have started iterating through results, it will not move the current position of the cursor.
If you have this set, it probably points to hhvm objects, not OSS objects.
If you have those, we are just double setting variables to true.
If you manually authenticated using this method and the connection drops, you'll have to call this method again once you're reconnected.
If you need to execute the standard constructor you may do so in the method.
If you override this, it is highly recommended that you set error checking to strict to avoid string interpolation errors.
If you plan to do further modifications on the appended child you must use the returned node.
If you put it on STDOUT instead, 'All tests passed.'
If you specified a username and password, you may specify a database to authenticate with.
If you specify 0, it will return all the elements in the `Pair`.
If you want to split on any of the characters which are considered special by regular expressions, you'll need to escape them first.
If you want to stick to the standards, you will have to create a temporary DOMDocument with a dummy root and then loop through the child nodes of the root of your XML data to append them.
If you wish to retrieve the information for the file my/file.php from the phar boo.phar, the entry should be phar://boo.phar/my/file.php.
If you would like to get whatever results mongos can provide and no exception, you can use this method.
If you would like to profile queries that take longer than another time period, use the database command and pass it a second option, the number of milliseconds.
If you're a Facebook employee, take a look at the JsonTestRunner class for the format specification.
If you're ignoring the previous paragraph and want to call it directly you can do so:    But don't.
If you're not looking to write sharding tools, what you probably want is MongoDate.
If your code has an existing __autoload function then this function must be explicitly registered on the __autoload stack.
If your database driver suffers from this limitation, the problem may manifest itself in an out-of-sequence error.
If, for some reason, you need a cursor to hang around for a long time, you can prevent the database from cleaning it up by using this method.
If, however, the arrays contain numeric keys, the later value will not overwrite the original value, but will be appended.
If, however, the arrays have the same numeric key, the later value will not overwrite the original value, but will be appended.
Ignore Microsecconds
Illegal values for key will be converted to string.
Imagick::CHANNEL_ALL.
Imagick::IMGTYPE_UNDEFINED     Imagick::IMGTYPE_BILEVEL    Imagick::IMGTYPE_GRAYSCALE     Imagick::IMGTYPE_GRAYSCALEMATTE    Imagick::IMGTYPE_PALETTE     Imagick::IMGTYPE_PALETTEMATTE    Imagick::IMGTYPE_TRUECOLOR     Imagick::IMGTYPE_TRUECOLORMATTE    Imagick::IMGTYPE_COLORSEPARATION    Imagick::IMGTYPE_COLORSEPARATIONMATTE     Imagick::IMGTYPE_OPTIMIZE
ImmMap is an immutable Map.
ImmSet is an immutable Set.
ImmVector is an immutable Vector.
Impl-level.
Implementaiton-level
Implementation detail for zlib.inflate stream filter.
Implementation of __toString
Import all attributes from :bar
Import all attributes from :baz
Import the pixels into image.
Import this wait handle to the current scheduler context
Import variables from an array into the current symbol table.
Imports GET/POST/Cookie variables into the global scope.
Imports a zend extension into HHVM
In 'input' array argument, values are expected to be valid keys i.e. string/integer here testing for all different valid string and integer values
In , this parameter is ignored and empty password is used.
In , this parameter is ignored and the name of the user that owns the server process is used.
In , this parameter is ignored and value 'localhost:3306' is always used.
In , this parameter is ignored.
In 5.3.99 the warning will always be thrown, independent of the mysql.trace_mode setting.
In HHVM, you can call the constructor directly, but you have to have an instance of ReflectionParameter or ReflectionFunctionAbstract.
In January 2008 , level 7.18.0 of the curl lib, many of the messages changed.
In PHP 4, the default output encoding is the same as the input charset.
In PHP 5 must be UTF-8 encoded.
In PHP 5 we first evaluate static class  properties and then do the function call.
In PHP 5, the second argument of str_repeat becomes null, which is then cast into an int.
In PHP 5.0.0 and 5.0.1, the default output charset is ISO-8859-1, while in PHP 5.0.2 and upper is UTF-8.
In PHP 5.4.0 and later, FORCE_DEFLATE generates RFC 1950 compliant output, consisting of a zlib header, the deflated data, and an Adler checksum.
In PHP 7 you can call the public constructor from user code and then you fatal on the first method call to the instance.
In SQL safe mode, this parameter is ignored and empty password is used.
In SQL safe mode, this parameter is ignored and the name of the user that owns the server process is used.
In SQL safe mode, this parameter is ignored and value 'localhost:3306' is always used.
In Safe Mode, the user may only alter environment variables whose names begin with the prefixes supplied by this directive.
In a query result, the sum total of all the row blocks is the full result of the query.
In addition to its value, it maintain the structure of the constraint graph, the current dataflow graph, and various parameters of interest to the DeltaBlue incremental constraint solver.
In addition, if any files are already compressed using bzip2/zlib compression, the respective extension must be enabled in order to decompress the files prior to re-compressing.
In addition, if the file is already compressed, the respective extension must be enabled in order to decompress the file.
In addition, it is slow too, as it involves string comparison.
In addition, this method automatically renames the archive, appending .gz, .bz2 or removing the extension if passed Phar::NONE to remove compression.
In addition, this method automatically renames the file extension of the archive, .tar by default.
In all cases, FALSE is returned on failure.
In all other cases, the method should be used.
In array order, each callback is called for the pattern in question, and the return value is then used as the subject for the next pattern/callback pair.
In case 1, the added constraint is stronger than the stay constraint and values must propagate down the entire length of the chain.
In case 2, the added constraint is weaker than the stay constraint so it cannot be accommodated.
In case a file name is given as first parameter, the name is relative to the current working directory.
In case of an error, it returns FALSE.
In case of an error, it returns NULL.
In case of an error, it returns TRUE.
In case of multiple values for an attribute, they are indexed using integers starting with 0.
In case of static methods, you can pass null to this parameter.
In case offset is also negative, the start position is calculated beforehand according to the rule explained above.
In case start is also negative, the start position is calculated beforehand according to the rule explained above.
In case the PDO_MYSQL_TEST_CHARSET interferes with any defaults we do another test to verify that the charset has been set.
In fact, sometimes the standard DES-based algorithm is replaced by an MD5-based algorithm.
In fact, there is discussion about deprecating `AsyncMysqlClient` all together to avoid having this choice.
In fact, there is discussion about deprecating the `AsyncMysqlClient` class all together.
In its simplest form the function will take only the two strings as parameter and will calculate just the number of insert, replace and delete operations needed to transform str1 into str2.
In level 2, this can be either 2.0 or 1.0.
In lieu of 'format', a mapping may specify 'vararg' for variadic methods.
In many applications you will be searching for a specific attribute such as an email address or a surname, and won't care what other data is held.
In mode MIT_NEED_ALL we expect all sub iterators to be valid and return false on the first non valid one.
In non-blending mode, the drawing color is copied literally with its alpha channel information, replacing the destination pixel.
In non-pagelet mode, expecting Italian date and decimal point format: 3,142 and venerdi 22 dicembre 1978.
In order for it to be safe you need to invoke a static method on the instance.
In order for this test to run on both linux and windows, the subject will have to be ascii only.
In order to allow the JIT to make more aggressive optimizations, we have an option that disables dynamic calls to these functions---to make that work, non-dynamic calls are rewritten to call these __SystemLib versions, which are still allowed to modify the caller variable environment when the option is enabled.
In other words, errcontext will contain an array of every variable that existed in the scope the error was triggered in.
In particular, this is useful for passing passphrases to programs like PGP, GPG and openssl in a more secure manner.
In passive mode, data connections are initiated by the client, rather than by the server.
In practice, we aren't implementing this correctly in hhvm right now, so it doesn't really matter.
In that case it is possible that a delayed response to a request made by a previous script  invocation comes back on this socket and is mistaken for response to request made with same ID during this request.
In the case of "INSERT ...
In the event it is not, print a nice error message indicating that this script will not run without it.
In the event the format is specified, the return value will be an array, content of which is dependent on the format.
In the examples above, we can change them to:    Now the first statement will return "foo" and the second statement will return a count of the "foo" collection.
In the returned locale id, the subtag is ordered by suffix resulting in variant0 followed by variant1 followed by variant2 and so on.
In this case it doesn't so the file should be written in the current dir.
In this case we should not override it from the param.
In this case, the return value is FALSE but width and height are set.
In this case, the value for "bits" is the highest bit depth encountered.
In this way, the archive will be up-to-date with the activity performed on it.
In words: when the string representation is the same.
IncDecProp: use __get
IncDecProp: use __set and __get
Include Circle.inc to get at the Circle class type, which in turn uses the Point type
Include a file that has a return statement with a return value
Include a file that has a return statement without a return value
Include a file that has no return statement
Include all PHP files in a directory
Include an existing file
Include an existing file that has its own namespace
Include an existing file.
Include another existing file that has its own namespace
Include microbenchmark code
Incorrect capitalization is intentional
Incorrect flag
Increase memory_limit if it is lower than 512M
Increases a stored number.
Increment count for this combination
Incrementally parse data into the supplied mime mail resource.
Indent's default is 2 spaces, wordwrap's default is 40 characters.
Indicates whether attribute in namespace namespaceURI named localName exists as a member of the element.
Indicates whether attribute named name exists as a member of the element.
Indicates whether the `Awaitable` associated with this wrapper exited abnormally via an exception of somoe sort.
Indicates whether the `Awaitable` associated with this wrapper exited normally.
Indicates whether this text node contains whitespace.
Individual values are accessed by integer index in the array.
Inexistent table
Information provided includes the number of pool connections that were created and destroyed, how many connections were requested, and how many times the pool was hit or missed when creating the connection.
Inheritance test.
Init optional values to default values
Initial file pointer position, expected at the beginning of the file
Initial letter exceptions
Initial position of file pointer
Initial preparation
Initial stat values
Initial value is U_ZERO_ERROR.
Initialise all required variables
Initialise all required variables Initialising different format strings
Initialise all required variables set up mailbox with one message
Initialise arguments
Initialise function argument
Initialise function arguments
Initialise function arguments not being substituted
Initialise function arguments not being substituted Some of the parameters actually passed to charset will request to use a default charset determined by the platform.
Initialise function arguments not being substituted get an unset variable
Initialise required variables
Initialise the 'input' and 'num_req' variables
Initialise the additional argument
Initialise the array
Initialise the array with integers
Initialise the array with strings
Initialise the arrays
Initialise the associative array
Initialise the variables
Initialise variables
Initialised session_id behaviour.
Initialising different format strings
Initialising variables
Initialize 'array_arg'
Initialize a cURL session using a pooled curl handle.
Initialize all required variables
Initialize array
Initialize classes
Initialize key_comp_func of type callback
Initialize required variables
Initialize variables
Initializing required variables
Initializing required variables heredoc string as str
Initializing required variables heredoc string for 'str' argument
Initializing the 2-d arrays
Initializing variables
Initiate a nonblocking query on a given connection.
Initiates a new OAuthProvider object.
Initiates a stream or datagram connection to the destination specified by remote_socket.
Inline Mapping Take out strings sequences and mappings
Inlining something which calls a function inside a generator doesn't work.
Inner Iterators
Insert additional methods here
Insert binary to DB
Insert fails, LAST_INSERT_ID shall not change, API shall return 0
Insert header
Insert new node with a unique key.
Insert the original right child as the right child of the new root.
Insert using named parameters
Insert using question mark placeholders
Insert via string to make sure the real floating number gets to the DB
Inserts a node into the tree with the specified key and value if the tree does not already contain a node with the specified key.
Inserts string data at position offset.
Inside a case the id is still stable
Inside a function
Install if not already installed using the properties set above.
Install phpunit from composer.json located in __DIR__
Instance Methods
Instances of the MongoId class fulfill the role that autoincrementing does in a relational database: to provide a unique key if the data does not natually have one.
Instances of this class are used to interact with a database.
Instantiate a `WrappedException`.
Instantiate a `WrappedResult`.
Instead get the default
Instead it must be implemented by either IteratorAggregate or Iterator.
Instead of hashing on the actual key for the item, we hash on the server key when deciding which memcached server to talk to.
Instead of using this function to set the default timezone in your script, you can also use the INI setting date.timezone to set the default timezone.
Instead, it will always use the class of the object as its scope.
Instead, you need to actually understand the problem and determine the most appropriate solution.
Instructs this Map to grow its capacity to accommodate the given number of elements.
Instructs this Set to grow its capacity to accommodate the given number of elements.
Instructs this Vector to grow its capacity to accommodate the given number of elements.
Int array with default keys
Int, string, etc
Int-like strings end up with numerical array keys.
Integer Operations
Integer data
Integer is handles as an octal representation, so nothing to match
Integer type variations
Intended to be set by the benchmark driver.
Intentional difference to PHP5: PHP5 just creates an empty file.
Intentionally kill internet access
Intercept __call
Intercept a function
Intercept non-static method
Intercept static method
Interface cannot contain a type constant that is partially abstract
Interface doc comment
Internal data structures should be the same in both cases.
Internal macro MYSQL_REPORT_ERROR
Internal macro MYSQL_REPORT_STMT_ERROR
Internal only: Creates an encoding match.
Internal use constants for var arg parsing
Invalid Argument  This can be caused by attempting to connect to a machine that is up but that the database isn't actually running on.
Invalid DN syntax
Invalid Number of Arguments
Invalid Number of arguments
Invalid Parameter
Invalid Parameters
Invalid arg for multiplier
Invalid args
Invalid arguments
Invalid array of locales
Invalid attribute
Invalid attributes
Invalid because T can be overridden to accept only int,.
Invalid class method
Invalid class name
Invalid construction: shape field names may not be empty
Invalid construction: shape field names may not start with numbers
Invalid data lengths
Invalid declaration: shape key names may not be empty.
Invalid declaration: shape key names may not start with numbers
Invalid directory
Invalid dirnames
Invalid filenames
Invalid mode Argument
Invalid multi-byte character - invalid first byte
Invalid multi-byte character - missing first byte
Invalid multi-byte character - missing last byte
Invalid multi-byte character - surrogate pair code point
Invalid name
Invalid no.of arguments
Invalid number of args
Invalid object method
Invalid options
Invalid parameter count
Invalid parameters
Invalid password
Invalid sequence
Invalid string data
Invalid types
Invalid user
Invalid valid format character does not raise warnings.
Invalid word sizes
Invokes a user handler upon calling a function or a class method.
Invoking __toString explicitly covers different code.
Isn't this much nicer:
It accepts either a single entry name or an array of names.
It acts as though the request's globals should be snapshotted now.
It advances the internal array pointer one place forward before returning the element value.
It allows to display number according to the localized format or given pattern or set of rules, and to parse strings into numbers according to the above patterns.
It allows users to display dates in a localized format or to parse strings  into PHP date values using pattern strings and/or canned patterns.
It allows users to display dates in a localized format or to parse strings into PHP date values using pattern strings and/or canned patterns.
It also checks for collisions with existing variables in the symbol table.
It also contains a unique _id field, which can be used to query the chunks collection for the file's content.
It also doesn't affect PHP's userspace output buffering mechanism.
It also indicates if a cryptographically strong algorithm was used to produce the pseudo-random bytes, and does this via the optional crypto_strong parameter.
It became optional in PHP 5.
It calls the function you registered with invariant_callback_register and then throws an InvariantException
It can also be NULL, in which case ICU's default date type will be used.
It can also be NULL, in which case ICU's default time type will be used.
It can also include a port number.
It can be also used to store secure data in database.
It can be either a string or an array with strings.
It can be one of MB_CASE_UPPER, MB_CASE_LOWER, or MB_CASE_TITLE.
It composes from PATHINFO_DIRNAME, PATHINFO_BASENAME, PATHINFO_EXTENSION and PATHINFO_FILENAME.
It converts special HTML entities back to characters.
It currently supports a very limited subsection of the YAML spec.
It defaults to return all elements.
It does not matter if a value has leading white space or not.
It does not mean that the key of the first related value from the unsorted array will be kept.
It does not move the pointer in any way.
It does not require a token.
It does not return position of latter string.
It does not support alpha components.
It does not.
It doesn't have children.
It effectively creates a queue of autoload functions, and runs through each of them in the order they are defined.
It forces a database error to occur.
It gets data returned from the system call.
It had to do with variable renaming, and this test doesn't exercise much beyond that
It has been removed in the meantime, but should be added back in when HHVM adds support for this feature.
It has children.
It inserts end every chunklen characters.
It is OK if both servers are working at the same time.
It is a read-only method: it does not change anything about the internal state of the object.
It is also used if an invalid sort_flag value has been specified.
It is also useful for reading status information provided by those programs on auxiliary file descriptors.
It is an error to call this method if no transaction is active.
It is being run like this, for example, from the test root directory:
It is better not to use ASCII strings for keys.
It is called automatically by the driver and should not need to be used.
It is either an array, or a comma separated enumerated list.
It is equivalent to running:
It is equivalent to the function:
It is guaranteed to have all of the fields in the skeleton.
It is identical to the function:
It is important to note that just because the mail was accepted for delivery, it does NOT mean the mail will actually reach the intended destination.
It is important to understand that most classes that do not implement Iterators have reasons as most likely they do not allow the full Iterator feature set.
It is invoked with 2 params when used as an OB callback.
It is merely the "largest" thing that can be inserted into the database.
It is merely the "smallest" thing that can be inserted into the database.
It is mostly deprecated.
It is much better to specify a timeout value of a few seconds, although if you need to be checking and running other code concurrently, using a timeout value of at least 200000 microseconds will help reduce the CPU usage of your script.
It is not consistent with the normal constructor handling, but here we have a chance to be more strict for the new traits.
It is not necessarily a bug if API and SQL function return different values.
It is ok to make this a string, since this clause is terminal
It is only checked under certain circumstances.
It is only useful if you're doing something weird, such as writing your own driver on top of the PHP driver.
It is possible to add most 1048576 elements at a time.
It is possible to define resource constants, however it is not recommended and may cause unpredictable behavior.
It is possible to format 64-bit number on 32-bit machine by passing it as double and using TYPE_INT64.
It is recommended to use the mhash functions to create a key from a string.
It is stable.
It is undefined if the server replies to the query and how.
It is used in a binary safe mode.
It is used with the -c option on server-tests.php.
It is useful if you disabled register_globals, but would like to see some variables in the global scope.
It is useful to prevent so-called "Invalid Encoding Attack".
It is useful when setting the correct Return-Path header when using sendmail.
It is usually best to simply produce a truecolor output image instead, which guarantees the highest output quality.
It makes life easier for differential and phabricator.
It may be needed if the client is behind firewall.
It must be a valid UTF-8 string.
It must be url encoded....
It must consist of a single SQL statement.
It must return an integer less than, equal to, or greater than zero if the first argument is considered to be respectively less than, equal to, or greater than the second.
It must return an integer less than, equal to, or greater than zero if the first key is considered to be respectively less than, equal to, or greater than the second.
It only works with the E_USER family of constants, and will default to E_USER_NOTICE.
It outputs a warning if the offset plus the length is greater than the haystack length.
It parses URL encoded data, detects encoding, converts coding to internal encoding and set values to the result array or global variables.
It performs the modification at the attribute level as opposed to the object level.
It returns FALSE if you call it before calling mysqli_fetch_row/array/object or after retrieving all rows in the result.
It returns FALSE on error.
It returns an array of two elements, the first being a boolean specifying whether or not the function was invoked, the latter being the return value, or null if it was not invoked.
It returns an associative array containing the data returned from the system call.
It returns exactly what the system setlocale function returns.
It returns field definition as array.
It returns the resulting array.
It returns the status of all of the hosts in the set.
It returns true if the element is even number else returns false
It seems the second argument passing is not being correclty checked.
It shall prevent any further error messages.
It should also not be automatically converted to a non-static instance when attempting to bind one
It shows what would happen if  the fatal error would have been a warning.
It subtracts string from str that is shorter than length AND character that is not part of multi-byte string or not being middle of shift sequence.
It takes a raw string query that will be executed as-is.
It takes on either a bitmask, or named constants.
It takes on one of three constants with the default being ENT_COMPAT: Available quote_style constants Constant Name Description ENT_COMPAT Will convert double-quotes and leave single-quotes alone.
It tests session support.
It throws an exception upon access.
It was created as a simpler approach for appending an XML DocumentFragment in a DOMDocument.
It will give a warning closure call time.
It will not be executed after foreach loops.
It will only reject simple variables that are not strings, or an array that does not have a valid structure to be used as a callback.
It will probably stop testing that if we start running weaken_decrefs before load elimination.
It will remove any corrupt data and compact and large stretches of free space it finds.
It will remove any existing keys that may have been assigned, rather than just reordering the keys.
It will return the previous value.
It will use memory mapping techniques if supported by your OS to enhance performance.
It works by making use of an integer index which is incremented within the range 0 - containersize.
It works only with truecolor images.
It works using a direct blend operation.
It wouldn't be if C directly implemented A
It's a bit weird
It's a constant and can take the following values: MYSQL_ASSOC, MYSQL_NUM, and MYSQL_BOTH.
It's a deprecated function, but we have not announce the removal so far, therefore we need to check for it
It's a key/value pair most likely If the key is in double quotes pull it out
It's a sequence
It's a weak check but unless it gets bad it's a useful thing to check.
It's configured using the ReflectionProperty constants, and defaults to all property types.
It's critical the read on the stream returns the input but doesn't set EOF flag the first time.
It's impossible to preserve the previous scope when doing so would break the invariants that, for non-static closures, having a scope is equivalent to having a bound instance.
It's in manpage format, so you'll want to do something along the lines of man /usr/local/src/regex/regex.7 in order to read it.
It's limited to 1024 bytes in length.
It's possible to iterate over shape-like array and it behaves as map-like array - usage that should report errors.
It's possible to iterate over shape-like array and it behaves as map-like array - usage with no errors.
It's possible to iterate over tuple-like array and it behaves as vec-like array - usage that should report errors.
It's possible to iterate over tuple-like array and it behaves as vec-like array - usage with no errors.
It's rare for this to be FALSE, but some systems may be broken or old.
It's server field will show which server the query was sent to.
It's unusual and should be reported to maintainers with any system information and steps to reproduce that you can provide.
It's used when the message_type parameter is set to 1.
Items from this parameter are returned unmodified as the result set of actionable entries.
Iterate over different date and time
Iterate over recent msgs to find the one we sent above
Iterates over the edges in the heap graph.
Iterates over the nodes in the heap graph.
Iterates over the roots in the heap graph.
Iteratively call a handler function with blocks of contiguous character types.
Its meaning depends on the message_type parameter as described above.
Its not an int like documented but a string - maybe for BC reasons...
JIS Note: either convert_encoding or strlen has problem
JIS Using Detect Order
JIS Using Encoding List Array
Japanese characters only - should not be any conversion
Japanese name with mixed kanji and hiragana
Japanese regex in UTF-8
Japanese string encoded in UTF-8
Japanese string in UTF-8
Japanese string in UTF-8 with repeated needles
Jenkins updates the results using `arc call-conduit differential.updateunitresults` call.
Join container elements with a glue string.
Just print out pertinent error information.
Just skip over the test names or test file.
KOI8-R koi8-ru, koi8r Russian.
Keep track of all declared benchmark suites.
Key 12 is unaccessible
Key features:  - Autodownload of frameworks, so we don't have to add 3 GB of frameworks to our official repo.
Keys and elements are compared by user supplied functions.
Keys are cache-unique, so storing a second value with the same key will overwrite the original value.
Keys are compared by user supplied function.
Keys are used to do more restrictive check  Source code: ext/standard/array.c
Keys are used to do more restrictive check Source code: ext/standard/array.c
Keys are used to do more restrictive check.
Keys must not be numeric or start with integers.
Kill the persistent connection - don't use mysqli_kill, mysqlnd will catch that...
Killing connection - 1
Killing connection - 2
Killing connection - 3
KindOfUninit should not pass type hint.
L - line numbers
LAST_INSERT_ID should be reset
LDAP_DEREF_ALWAYS - aliases should be dereferenced always.
LDAP_DEREF_FINDING - aliases should be dereferenced when locating the base object but not during the search.
LDAP_DEREF_SEARCHING - aliases should be dereferenced during the search but not when locating the base object of the search.
LDAP_SCOPE_ONELEVEL means that the search should only return information that is at the level immediately below the base_dn given in the call.
LOAD DATA INFILE Syntax
LOADING FUNCTIONS
LOCKS should be removed
LOCK_EX Acquire an exclusive lock on the file while proceeding to the writing.
Label column, result set charset.
Labels are defined in the executor itself, so we call it with execute_data NULL and it sets zend_opcode_handlers array
Language and its setting is ISO-2022-JP/Base64 for Japanese, UTF-8/Base64 for uni, ISO-8859-1/quoted printable for English.
Language-Region-Variant
Language-Region:
Language-Script-Region
Language-Script-Region-Variant
Language-Variant
Last time a successful activity was made in the current connection, in seconds since epoch.
Last, as it should fatal
Lastly, test the newly added format parameter
Launches a new instance of scheduler to drive asynchronous execution until the provided Awaitable is finished.
Leading whitespace should be ignored
Leap years are taken into consideration.
Leave explicit unix:// socket as is
Length should be 1
Less number of arguments than expected
Less than expected arguments
Less than expected number of arguments
Less than the expected number of arguments
Let it go Confirm that we can't deserialize one of these as well.
Let the process pid join the process group pgid.
Let's assume that is not going to be an issue in the real world, and make it a simple check and throw instead.
Let's do a PEAR-less pear setup
Let's just really make sure the dependencies didn't get installed by checking the vendor directories to see if they are empty.
Let's see if we have privileges for CREATE DATABASE
Let's try some terrible locales to ensure they fail
Let's try with just one element in the array
Lets accept also int if it follows the rules from the original MYSQL C API
Lets pass a dead connection
Lets try again, setting the filename rather than format This should cause PNG image to be written
Like all objects in PHP, Maps have reference-like semantics.
Like all objects in PHP, Sets have reference-like semantics.
Like all objects in PHP, Vectors have reference-like semantics.
Like all objects in PHP, `Pair`s have reference-like semantics.
Like an actual test name, do nothing.
Like any "latent cursor", the cursor may become invalid at some point -- for example if that final object it references were deleted.
Likewise, writes will always appear to succeed
Limit characters that are acceptable in identifiers being checked to those normally used with the languages associated with the specified locales.
Limit the server to 1 thread only to ensure that both requests are served by the same thread
Line below should throw a warning as no args are expected
Lines should not be larger than 70 characters.
Link right.
List of possible limits returned Limit name Limit description core The maximum size of the core file.
List of preconditions.
List syntax
Lists all output handlers in use.
Lists columns and associated privileges for the given table
Lists only leaves in iteration.
Lists tables and the privileges associated with each table
Lists the column names in specified tables
LlNV test 32-bit ints specifically
Load APP info from jpeg
Load a string of YAML into a PHP array statically  The load method, when supplied with a YAML string, will do its best to convert YAML in a string into a PHP array.
Load a valid YAML file to Spyc.
Load a valid YAML string to Spyc.
Load definition file
Load from file
Load results.
Load skeleton file
Load the sections of the test file.
Loads an XML document from a file.
Loads an XML document from a string.
Loads the PHP extension given by the parameter library.
Loads the given class or interface.
Locale-related constants.
Locales cannot be instantiated as objects.
Localized patterns are not currently supported.
Localized software products often require sets of data that are to be customized depending on current locale, e.g.: messages, labels, formatting patterns.
Location for overloaded data.
Logging can be used to get detailed information about what the driver is doing.
Logging is turned off, by default.
Logs in to the given FTP stream.
Long-style arguments.
Longer test case from http://www.schneier.com/code/vectors.txt
Look for globally installed cpplint.py
Look for method '' in class 'Foo'
Look for method 'method' in class 'Foo'
Looks up a message in the current domain.
Loop from third fruit until the end Note: offset starts from zero for apple
Loop over first three fruits only
Loop through each element of values for 'str'
Loop through file content array
Loop through to test each element in the above array
Loop to test normal functionality with different arrays inputs
Loop until we read all the bytes we expected or we hit an error.
LooseModeCollections from HHJsonDecodeTest.phpi Single-quoted strings
Lots of nesting here.
Lower case columns
Lower numbers indicate greater priority.
Lowercase, convert namespace separators to path separators
Luckily, I was able to move those tests to use TestFindModes::TOKEN.
MD5 Message-Digest Algorithm, and returns that hash.
MSG_DONTROUTE Bypass routing, use direct interface.
MSG_DONTWAIT With this flag set, the function returns even if it would normally have blocked.
MSG_EOF Close the sender side of the socket and include an appropriate notification of this at the end of the sent data.
MSG_EOR Indicate a record mark.
MSG_EXCEPT Using this flag in combination with a desiredmsgtype greater than 0 will cause the function to receive the first message that is not equal to desiredmsgtype.
MSG_NOERROR If the message is longer than maxsize, setting this flag will truncate the message to maxsize and will not signal an error.
MSG_PEEK Receive data from the beginning of the receive queue without removing it from the queue.
MSG_WAITALL Block until at least len are received.
MX  pri: Priority of mail exchanger.
MYSQLI_BINCMP_FLAG
MYSQLI_SERVER_PUBLIC_KEY  RSA public key file used with the SHA-256 based authentication.
MYSQLI_STMT_ATTR_PREFETCH_ROWS
MYSQLI_STMT_ATTR_PREFETCH_ROWS Number of rows to fetch from server at a time when using a cursor.
MYSQLI_STMT_ATTR_UPDATE_MAX_LENGTH
Machine-Dependent
Main code for test case generation
Make a reasonable-sized test string
Make a string's first character uppercase
Make new wait handles with valid values.
Make sure all valid ascii chars round trip
Make sure array to container fast-paths properly account for refs in the arrays.
Make sure it doesn't change the shared value.
Make sure that attribute names with colons work fine
Make sure that client, connection and result charsets are all the same.
Make sure that the function alias exists
Make sure that we can tell which class was called for intercepted static methods
Make sure that we don't attempt to set the current character set to make this case useful
Make sure that we find a fixed point on the FPIKind correctly.
Make sure that you've started the database server before connecting.
Make sure the database is still up and the network is okay.
Make sure the hash is destroyed automatically when the request ends.
Make sure the next line triggers COW
Make sure the weird trait importation syntax works when interleaved with normal XHP attribute declarations
Make sure things cleanup when curl_multi_await is abandoned
Make sure this backtracking handles line numbers correctly.
Make sure this function shows up in a backtrace
Make sure we don't just return '/tmp' or other easily-guessable location.
Make sure we got clone right
Make sure we raise a type error for the nonexistent method access in the lambda below
Make sure we're tolerant of code that swallows typehint failures.
Make sure you are aware of PHP's string syntax to know exactly how the interpreted string will look.
Make sure you consider this before running a long script.
Make the background transparent
Make the background white
Make the current process a session leader.
Make the output pretty with DOMDocument
Make them equal for the check
Makes a copy of the file source to dest.
Makes all function names reserved words.
Makes the colors of the palette version of an image more closely match the true color version.
Makes the script sleep until the specified timestamp.
Manages an OAuth provider class.
Manually checkout release appropriate system branch See: https://github.com/kohana/kohana/wiki/developers
Many FTP servers do not support this command.
Map is an ordered dictionary-style collection.
Maps checks from HHJsonDecodeTest.php
Maps do not have "copy-on-write" semantics.
Maps do not support iterating while new keys are being added or elements are being removed.
Maps do not support taking elements by reference.
Maps only support integer keys and string keys.
Maps preserve insertion order of key/value pairs.
Maps the specified character to a "mirror-image" character.
Maps the specified character to its paired bracket character.
Mark the input variable with the given mark.
Marks messages listed in msg_number for deletion.
Match expected
Match the beginning of a section.
Matches: E .
Maximum 100 items allowed.
May be any one of the following: DNS_A, DNS_CNAME, DNS_HINFO, DNS_MX, DNS_NS, DNS_PTR, DNS_SOA, DNS_TXT, DNS_AAAA, DNS_SRV, DNS_NAPTR, DNS_A6, DNS_ALL or DNS_ANY.
May be one of file, link, or dir
May have this if we reached the end of the file or if something wasn't printed out in optimized mode that may have been printed out in debug mode
Maybe we are in OSS land trying this script
Maybe we've provoked an index message, maybe not.
Meanwhile do not rely on it.
Measures and reports on the relative cost of basic HHVM operations.
Mediawiki and others are clowntown when it comes to autoloading stuff for reflection.
Memory info
Memory leak
Merges the elements of one or more arrays together so that the values of one are appended to the end of the previous one.
Message Format provides for runtime formatting of messages in a manner somewhat similar to sprintf.
Message formatter class.
MessageFormatter is a concrete class that enables users to produce concatenated, language-neutral messages.
MessageFormatter takes a set of objects, formats them, and then inserts the formatted strings into the pattern at the appropriate places.
Meta-data can be any PHP variable that can be serialized.
Meta-data can significantly slow down the performance of loading a phar archive if the data is large, or if there are many files containing meta-data.
Method call on non-object using FPushObjMethod
Method call on non-object using FPushObjMethodD
Method names are case insensitive
Methods that cane be implemented across all containers in one place.
Methods that cane be implemented across all mutable containers in one place.
Might have been sent a Ctrl-c while waiting for the response.
Minimum and maximum PHP values
Miscellaneous input
Miscellenous input check
Misses here seem to be a huge slowdown, causing problems with fbmake timeouts.
Missing parameter
Mixed float array
Mixed keys - numeric/string
Mixed string
Mixed types
Mixed values
Mixed, explicit override.
Mixing constant strings and class constants, or class constants from different classes doesn't produce shape-like arrays.
Mockery tries stubbing out part of Mongo, which we have in Zend compat, but it's not at a usable state yet.'
Modeled after :x:composable-element
Modification and access time
Modified to test a mix of integers and strings as keys.
Modified to test empty string values.
Modified to test numbers with exponents without a decimal point.
Modified to test unescaped UNICODE as keys and values.
Modify the existing entries in the LDAP directory.
Modify the local copy of an element's value
Modify the the actual element itself
Mofification time only
Mongo has a feature known as tailable cursors which are similar to the Unix "tail -f" command.
MongoCode objects are composed of two parts: a string of code and an optional scope.
MongoDBRef is a good choice for this case, as it is a common format that all of the drivers and the database understand.
MongoIds are serializable/unserializable.
MongoMaxKey has no associated fields, methods, or constants.
MongoMaxKey is a special type used by the database that evaluates to greater than any other type.
MongoMinKey has no associated fields, methods, or constants.
MongoMinKey is a special type used by the database that evaluates to less than any other type.
MongoTimestamp is used by sharding.
Montag der 28ten Woche 2010
More complex SetM with array base on the stack, then with a ref
More efficient lookups than array_search
More number of arguments than expected
More than  expected number of arguments
More than expected arguments
More than expected no.
More than expected number of args
More than expected number of arguments
More than valid no.
More than valid number of arguments
More than valid number of arguments i.e. 3 args
More unusually, they can be saved to the database and retrieved.
Most European countries used the Julian calendar prior to the Gregorian.
Most of the time there is only one row block per query result since the query was never interrupted or otherwise deterred by some outside condition like exceeding network packet parameters.
Most offsets tested in strtotime-relative.phpt.
Most parameters are input parameters, that is, parameters that are used in a read-only fashion to build up the query.
Motivation: Suppose we need to refer to a document in another collection.
Move all attached Iterator instances forward.
Move forward to next element.
Move this iterator back to the first position.
Moves mail messages specified by msglist to the specified mailbox.
Moves the node with the given key to the top of the tree.
Multi-byte characters are usually twice the width of single byte characters.
Multibyte characters may be used in pattern.
Multibyte characters may be used.
Multibyte string was not returning error message until offset was passed the byte count of the string.
Multiple elements with the same priority will get dequeued in no particular order.
Multiple recipients may be specified by putting a comma between each address in to.
Multiple sessions serialized in the same session file.
Must be a constant string.
Must be a positive integer.
Must be derived from SPLFileObject.
Must be derived from SplFileInfo.
Must be empty or one of: '.
Must be greater than or equal to zero.
Must be greater than zero.
Must be in the format: '.
Must be pass
Must be valid UTF-8.
Must match CPU's ABI definition for SIMD usage
Must match kMaxBuiltinArgs
Mutually exclusive with FILE_APPEND.
Mutually exclusive with LOCK_EX since appends are atomic and thus there is no reason to lock.
My Doc  Comment  for A
My Doc Comment for A
My Doc Comment for A::f
My Doc Comment for A::finalStatPubf
My Doc Comment for A::privf
My Doc Comment for A::protStatf
My Doc Comment for B::protStatf
My DocComment for B
My templated class
MyISAM engine should be part of _every_ MySQL today
MySQL Server 4.1 - charset support available
MySQL Server might accept anonymous connections, don't print anything
MySQL server may not support this - ignore errors
MySQL will silently truncate this data if it is inserted into a `utf8` column.
MySQLi Driver.
NB: DateTimeZone class does not define a customized compare class handler so standard object handler will be used
NB: These will return false in server mode
NB: basic functionality tested in tests/strings/001.phpt
NOTE - this will cause an error and it OK When using unbuffered prepared statements MySQL expects you to fetch all data from the row before sending new data to the server.
NOTE this test can fail on asm builds of zlib 1.2.5 or  1.2.7 on at least Windows and Darwin.
NOTE to users Behaviour with libmysql is UNDEFINED, see http://news.php.net/php.internals/55210 Because it is undefined it is allowed to the mysqlnd DEVELOPER to implement any behaviour they like, including the one checked for in this test_mysqli_stmt_num_rows_table_1.
NOTE: PDO does not care about protected
NOTE: This will become part of SPL
NOTE: again this test does not test all of the behaviour of the function
NOTE: do not run this directly under a web server, as it will take a very long time to execute.
NOTE: documentation is not clear on this: function always return NULL or TRUE
NOTE: empty string, no multiple insert syntax
NOTE: for BC reasons with ext/mysql, ext/mysqli accepts invalid result modes.
NOTE: no LOAD DATA INFILE test
NOTE: no LOAD DATA INFILE test_mysqli_info_table_1
NOTE: tests is a stub, but function is deprecated, as long as it does not crash when invoking it...
NOTE: this function is deprecated.
NOTE: this will NOT update dbl_ddls counter
NS  target: FQDN of the name server which is authoritative for this hostname.
NULL Argument
NULL argument
NULL as Argument
NULL as arg
NULL as argument
NULL as filename
NULL as glue
NULL as linkname
NULL as pieces
NULL by default.
NULL indicates an invalid argument was supplied to the function.
NULL is also returned in case of an error such as an invalid callback.
NULL is returned if no error occurred.
NULL is returned if the json cannot be decoded or if the encoded data is deeper than the recursion limit.
NULL is returned.
NULL may be passed instead, to reset this handler to its default state.
NULL or not there at all
NULL values
Name could be the name of the single test file for a given framework, or the actual framework name if we are running in serial, for example
Named attribute
Named connection pools are initialized via the 'curl.namedPools' ini setting, which is a comma separated list of named pools to create.
Namespace declarations occur inside start tags.
Namespaced Map.
Namespaced Set.
Namespaced classes do not recognize PHP 4 constructors
Namespaced pair.
Namespaced vector.
Native PS Libmysql cannot handle such a stored procedure.
Native version will cause a fatal error
Need to be created every time to get expected return value
Need to manually check since we might do several reads none of which timeout themselves but still not get the response requested
Need to meet the requirement
Needs 'data type' and argument to vary
Needs to be equal
Negative exp, generates warning
Negative lengths
Negative offset
Negative offset Note: PHP Warning - offset is negative.
Negative offset values will start the search at offset characters from the start of the string.
Negative offsets, the file pointer should be at the end of file  to get data
Negative start
Negative values will stop searching at an arbitrary point prior to the end of the string.
Neither of these options is supported in this implementation, and if provided a fatal error will be thrown.
Neither with libmysql nor with mysqlnd.
Nested FVs.
Nested anonymous shape
Nested array
Nested collections
Nested namespaced Map.
Nested namespaced pairs.
Nested namespaced vectors.
Nested shape-like arrays preserve element types - usage that should report errors.
Nested shape-like arrays preserve element types - usage with no errors.
Nested shapes don't grow
Nested: relative from include path.
Never check for a specific error message text, but always use an error number to check.
Never reached
New YAML document
New and all executors with CALL threading model can use the same handler for undefined opcodes, do we emit code for it only once
New expression id
New expression id assigned
New expression id different from everything above
New features and options.
New ids outside of loop
New ids within the loop
New instance of class C - defined below
New item's value will not be less than zero.
New namespace test
New stable id
New strengths may be inserted in the strength hierarchy without disrupting current constraints.
Newlines are considered whitespace, and are removed too:
Newly created files and dirs
No Exception
No argument is required.
No buffering active
No bug, but slightly different behaviour...
No connection yet.
No data fetched so far
No default value, return null.
No error since Foo is an 'as' constraint on a generic
No error to trigger.
No error: we are sure that there is no field 'z' in returned shape
No filename
No first time init
No it's not
No longer accepts negative integers for accessing elements from the end of the array.
No more constraints - mysqlnd and libmysql return different strings at least with mysqli.
No more data
No nodes directly correspond to this class, but other nodes do inherit from it.
No parameters.
No real logic in here to do that, just simple printing.
No replacement shall be made
No server name given.
No tilde expansion or parameter substitution is done.
No user specific information in status.
No vendor directory.
No warnings from normal operation
No way to tell what the optional type is.
No write permissions
No, you cannot fetch the result
No.of args greaer than expected
No.of args greater than expected
No.of args leass than expected
No.of args less than expected
No.of args more than expected
No.of arguments greater than expected
No.of arguments less than expected
Node gets destroyed during removeChild
Node is preserved from removeChild
Non default
Non exhuastive match
Non exhuastive match, but we don't care because no annotation
Non string assert
Non-deterministic tests.
Non-existent filename
Non-existing dir
Non-existing dirs
Non-existing file
Non-existing file or dir
Non-existing file resource
Non-existing.
Non-initialised session_id behaviour.
Non-numeric number causes returning NULL and emitting E_WARNING.
Non-short-circuit.
Non-string salt, checking for memory leaks
Non-zero is returned if auto-commit is on, 0 if it is off, or FALSE if an error occurs.
Nonblocking.
Normal client errors such as adding an existing key will not trigger a failover.
Normal constraints are not input constraints.
Normal operation with hexadecimal output
Normal operation with raw binary output
Normalization is a process that involves transforming characters and sequences of characters into a formally-defined underlying representation.
Normalize author.
Normalize record
Normalize title.
Normalize to avoid calling __autoload twice for undefined classes
Normalizer class.
Normalizer provides access to Unicode normalization of strings.
Normalizes the node.
Normally -1 for types other than floating point decimals.
Normally 0 for types other than floating point decimals.
Normally this means there was an arithmetic error other than under/overflow.
Normally we expect 1 response, but with the break command, we expect 2.
Normally you would use this to make one asynchronous connection to the MySQL client.
Normally, memory is allocated for all of the elements of the `Pair`.
Normally, you will `catch` an `AsyncMysqlException`, but if you want to explictly construct one and, for example, `throw` it for some given reason, then you pass it an `AsyncMysqlErrorResult`.
Not Changeable
Not a doc comment
Not a magic method, just here for example.
Not a public API
Not a valid compressed string.
Not a valid constraint since T is unbounded type parameter
Not all drivers support this option, and it's meaning may differ from driver to driver.
Not all server versions will support all statements
Not all servers support this feature.
Not an INSERT, API value must become 0
Not available in CLI mode
Not every MySQL Server version supports this
Not permitted to create hard-link to a dir
Not reserched.
Not sure whether this is strictly necessary.
Not sure which is most portable.
Not typing this since we are setting it as a mixed to comply with GitHub issue 2082.
Not used for web based tests
Not used when using URLs.
Notation Tests
Note that 'alphabetic' is determined by the current locale.
Note that .phar cannot be used anywhere in the filename for a non-executable tar or zip archive.
Note that JPC and JP2 are capable of having components with different bit depths.
Note that all zip- and tar-based phar archives must contain .phar in their file extension in order to be processed as a phar archive.
Note that built-in functions are not interceptable.
Note that depending on what extensions you have compiled or loaded into PHP, additional classes could be present.
Note that dynamically calling extract is not allowed with the DisallowDynamicVarEnvFuncs option
Note that for socket streams this member can be TRUE even when unread_bytes is non-zero.
Note that if the length argument is given, then the magic_quotes_runtime configuration option will be ignored and no slashes will be stripped from string.
Note that item names are treated case-sensitive.
Note that keys are preserved.
Note that keys in replacement array are not preserved.
Note that numeric keys in input are not preserved.
Note that objects are not supported.
Note that only the first call to strtok uses the string argument.
Note that pairs return a Vector despite the documentation saying that they return an immVector
Note that profiling slows down queries, so it is better to use in development or testing than in a time-sensitive application.
Note that seeking past EOF is not considered an error.
Note that some database/driver combinations may not support all of the database connection attributes.
Note that structures are deserialized into associative arrays.
Note that the "dn" is always returned irrespective of which attributes types are requested.
Note that the "named placeholder" is enclosed by double quotes.
Note that the access time is always modified, regardless of the number of parameters.
Note that the data itself is not encrypted.
Note that the default return value comes BEFORE the arguments to the function.
Note that the errno and errstr arguments will always be passed by reference.
Note that the list of elements is prepended as a whole, so that the prepended elements stay in the same order.
Note that the needle in this case can only be a single character in PHP 4.
Note that the values of trans need to be valid keys, i.e. they need to be either integer or string.
Note that this can be thrown by any database request that receives a reply, not just queries.
Note that this changes the return value in an array where every element is an array consisting of the matched string at offset 0 and its string offset into subject at offset 1.
Note that this changes the value of matches into an array where every element is an array consisting of the matched string at offset 0 and its string offset into subject at offset 1.
Note that this comparison is case sensitive.
Note that this function modifies this Vector in place.
Note that this ignores the keys of this ImmMap and the specified Iterable.
Note that this ignores the keys of this Map and the specified Iterable.
Note that this implementation does not use a stack as in Oliver's pseudo code, but recursive calls which may or may not speed up the whole process.
Note that this is a C constant, but not exposed to PHP, so we don't define it here.
Note that this is different from xdebug.
Note that this is not the case when compiling with WholeProgram mode, and Option::HardTypeHints, so this test is disabled for repo.
Note that this means that a cursor does not "contain" the database results, it just manages them.
Note that this means that you won't have an indication that a shard is down in your query response.
Note that this parameter is always treated as an ASCII string regardless of the value of input-charset.
Note that this parameter is applied to the stream processed by the filters.
Note that this parameter only has an effect if the string is not empty.
Note that when an XHP name is used in a function signature it's okay to use the XHP name without preceding whitespace as long as the previous token is not ':'.
Note that when you set a handler to an object method, that object's reference count is increased which makes it persist until you either change the handler to something else, or your script ends.
Note that you may put multiple tokens in the token parameter.
Note that you probably want to specify the mode as an octal number, which means it should have a leading zero.
Note that you should use this function even if you do not use the automatic routing to secondaries.
Note the absence of FilesystemIterator::SKIP_DOTS
Note this value is returned internally to PHP for processing.
Note: Bad string raise Warning.
Note: Did not start form -22 offset.
Note: Due to detect order, detected as UTF-8
Note: It does not return TRUE/FALSE for setting char
Note: No error conditions relating to passing arguments can be tested because these are not functions but statements, it will result in syntax error.
Note: Other than string type, PHP raises Warning
Note: SWC requires zlib
Note: The 'variant' and 'private' subtags can take maximum 15 values whereas 'extlang' can take maximum 3 values.
Note: This path may vary depending on customizations to bin-dir in  composer.json or the environmental variable COMPOSER_BIN_DIR.
Note: Wanted to use builtin SPL for this, but it seems like the order cannot be guaranteed with their iterators.
Note: basic use cases in Zend/tests/009.phpt get an unset variable
Note: basic use cases in Zend/tests/010.phpt
Note: basic use cases in Zend/tests/is_a.phpt
Note: bind_result before execute
Note: configure with --enable-dba
Note: not particularly optimal ...
Note: returns last character
Note: the first four values are valid as they will all be cast to 1L.
Note: this cache could easily be shared between threads
Note: this is different from zend right now.
Note: use this function if you don't want files from the file system loaded and processed as YAML.
Note: very weak testing, we accept almost any result
Note: you cannot insert any blob values this way.
Nothing should have been flushed.
Nothing to read
Nothing to set here since this is the default
Notice that foo is invariant in T
Notice: Undefined offset: 0
Notifies the runner that running a benchmark resulted in an error.
Notifies the runner that we're done running a single benchmark in the benchmark suite.
Notifies the runner that we're done with running a suite and that we have a result which can be reported to the user if needed.
Notify all observers
Now add those dependencies
Now do it with unbuffered queries
Now exchange fruits for locations
Now just a meaningful subset of the above, since lots of them are not number in any context on any version, and we've proven that in a couple ways already.
Now just get the incoming data unitl we find some sort of status data
Now test the base form of log
Now that this is a non-terminal, this is bad
Now that we have an install, we can safely set all possible other framework information
Now that we have our first non-blank line, print out the test information until we have our final stats
Now the result is either the root node or the greatest node in the left subtree.
Now the same as procedural API
Now the same where the current day-of-week does not match the one in the phrase.
Now the same with emulated PS.
Now we should be back to autocommit - we've issues a commit
Now we use the trait, which happens to introduce another private variable but they are distinct, and not related to each other, so no warning.
Null here doc string
Null heredoc string
Null should fallback to default separators.
Nullable enum supertype is still a supertype
Number 1 means that you grant execute rights, number 2 means that you make the file writable, number 4 means that you make the file readable.
Number formatter class - locale-dependent number formatting/parsing.
Number of arguments not matching as specified in format field
Number of characters from the beginning of string.
Number of columns in a result
Number of spaces to indent per level
Number parsing.
NumberFormatter is locale-sensitive so you need to create a new NumberFormatter for each locale.
NumberFormatter methods format primitive-type numbers, such as double and output the number as a locale-specific string.
Numbered indices are left as is.
Numeric String
Numeric keys
Numeric positions of attributes
Numeric strings consist of optional sign, any number of digits, optional decimal part and optional exponential part.
OK because arrays are sequenced
OK because constructors and function calls are sequenced
OK because short circuiting ops are sequenced
OK, results in ""
OK, results in "e"
OK, results in "r"
OK, results in "r" change a string
OK, results in NULL subscript some strings
ON DUPLICATE KEY UPDATE" queries, the return value will be 1 if an insert was performed, or 2 for an update of an existing row.
OO inteface to finfo
ORIGINAL ARRAY
OUT OF BOUNDS
Object data
Object with static array
Objects are only created wit the static create functions
Occurs if the database response started out correctly, but broke off in the middle.
Octal array
Octal type variations
Octal values
October 23rd, with a broken time
Of course, if length is zero then this function will have the effect of inserting replacement into string at the given start offset.
Of course, the NumberFormatter class is unaware of exchange rates so, the number output is the same regardless of the specified currency.
Of course, this is also true if string is empty.
Often, for example on a system employing "shadow" passwords, an asterisk is returned instead.
Oh, and you can decide how big the indent is and what the wordwrap for folding is.
Ok, lets check MyISAM resp.
Old server should die after a while
On Linux, it is silently truncated to SOMAXCONN.
On Linux, this value may be read and modified via /proc/sys/kernel/msgmnb.
On PHP side this should do nothing.
On Red Hat variants, this can be caused by a default setting that does not allow Apache to create network connections.
On Windows, the error message is prefixed with "WSA".
On error FALSE is returned.
On error boolean FALSE is returned.
On error false is returned.
On error the function returns FALSE.
On error, FALSE is returned.
On errors the return value is NULL   If matches are found, the new subject will be returned, otherwise subject will be returned unchanged.
On errors, it will return FALSE.
On failure returns FALSE.
On failure, FALSE is returned.
On failure, a -1 will be returned in the parent's context, no child process will be created, and a PHP error is raised.
On failure, returns FALSE
On failure, throws ImagickException.
On most systems, only the user's full name is available.
On return, this value will hold the offset at which parsing ended.
On some older UNIX platforms, it may not be able to determine the current OS information in which case it will revert to displaying the OS PHP was built on.
On some operating systems, you may want to specify a path on a filesystem that handles lots of small files efficiently.
On some systems it is impossible to distinguish between empty match and an error.
On success, the array will contain two keys 'file' and 'line' which indicate the filename and line number of the callsite that invoked the current function or method.
On systems where time_t is a 32bit signed integer, as most common today, the valid range for year is somewhere between 1901 and 2038.
On systems without fopencookie, the stream is fed into a temporary file, and that temporary file is passed back to the ZE.
On the continuous integration server, it's not unlikely that we'll fail to bind one of these random ports.
On the contrary, the mysqlnd way is a reasonable one and, maybe, one fine day, after Klingons visited earh, becomes the official one.
On win32, if passed SOMAXCONN, the underlying service provider responsible for the socket will set the backlog to a maximum reasonable value.
Once a successful connection is made, a new socket resource is returned, which may be used for communication.
Once done, the final score is reported to the runner.
Once expired the connection will be successfully reconnected or marked as failed for another retry_interval seconds.
Once the crypto settings are established, cryptography can be turned on and off dynamically by passing TRUE or FALSE in the enable parameter.
Once the last benchmark has been executed, null is returned.
Once this resource is adpoted by a call to this function, it is no longer valid in the context on which it was being used.
Once you have your pool constructed, you use this method to connect to the MySQL client.
One Valid arg
One argument
One argument, less than expected no.
One component can be computed by adding up the needed permissions for that target user base.
One day we can compare this to the previous version and get a bigger number
One extra argument
One final test to see if the position is respected when opened for append
One has to make sure there are no exceptions in between these two calls, as otherwise, it may report incorrect timings.
One more than the expected number of arguments
One part of the options governs how the driver reads from secondary nodes in a replica set environment.
Only SWITCH dispatch method use it
Only When you `await` or `join` the resulting `Awaitable`, will all of the key/values in the `Map` within the returned `Awaitable` be available.
Only When you `await` or `join` the resulting `Awaitable`, will all of the values in the `Vector` within the returned `Awaitable` be available.
Only accept SSLv3 and TLSv1.2 connections
Only allowed when there's no arguments.
Only do the unix2dos thing done above already
Only file paths matching the regular expression will be included in the archive.
Only for internal use
Only formats available: type, key, value, memsize, ttl throws notice on different flags
Only go through
Only here to be var_dump compatible with zend
Only int and string are currently allowed.
Only lowercase should work
Only one invalid argument
Only purpose is to test basic code paths in the ezc string to double and double to string routines.
Only put this timeout if we are using hhvm
Only read one row and break
Only the first character of thousands_sep is used.
Only the start, end and period characters will be escaped.
Only the superuser may change the owner of a file.
Only the superuser may change the owner of a symlink.
Only use this function when all processes have finished working with the message queue and you need to release the system resources held by it.
Only user implemented
Open a persistent database connection
Open directory with different permission values, read and close, expected: none of them to succeed.
Open handle
Opening 'fubar' with the incorrect readonly flag
Opening section and start of test case array.
Opening the existing data file again in "w" mode
Opening the existing data file again in "wb" mode
Opening the existing data file again in "wt" mode
Opening the existing data file in 'x' mode to check for the warning message
Opening the existing data file in 'xb' mode to check for the warning message
Opening the existing data file in 'xt' mode to check for the warning message
Opening the file in binary read mode
Opening the non-existing file in "a" mode, which will be created
Opening the non-existing file in "ab" mode, which will be created
Opening the non-existing file in "at" mode, which will be created
Opening the non-existing file in "w" mode, which will be created
Opening the non-existing file in "wb" mode, which will be created
Opening the non-existing file in "wt" mode, which will be created
Opens a pipe to a process executed by forking the command given by command.
Opens an IMAP stream to a mailbox.
Opens an SQLite 3 Database.
Operation in progress  Connecting to the database timed out.
Operational modes  In ATOMIC mode, we wait for the server to respond to each request and return the value directly.
Option parsing.
Optionally you can do this here if you want to fix up the document
Options used by lInsert and similar methods
Or I am a clown.
Or if the flag FILTER_NULL_ON_FAILURE is used, it returns FALSE if the variable is not set and NULL if the filter fails.
Order defined by ksort
Order of destruction is implementation-defined
Ordinarily, every time a file within a Phar archive is created or modified in any way, the entire Phar archive will be recreated with the changes.
Other characters remain unchanged.
Other keys in associative arrays dependant on 'type'    Type Extra Columns     A  ip: An IPv4 addresses in dotted decimal notation.
Other levels, such as TCP, can be used by specifying the protocol number of that level.
Other return values are currently not available.
Other uses could include explicitly specifying a MIME type to return.
Other versions only define this function, if the correct GD version is installed.
Otherwise a new session id is generated every time.
Otherwise do nothing.
Otherwise exact offset is searched and only if not found then the first time zone with any offset is returned.
Otherwise it will contain the higher descriptor number.
Otherwise later operations take effect outside clipping path.
Otherwise lookup that index
Otherwise, Returns TRUE on success or FALSE on failure.
Otherwise, a blank page will be displayed by default.
Otherwise, all the keys from the input are returned.
Otherwise, answer true.
Otherwise, false.
Otherwise, if optional parameters are passed, the function will return the number of assigned values.
Otherwise, it is set to time.
Otherwise, it returns FALSE.
Otherwise, it returns an array of keys for the random entries.
Otherwise, it will return what handler tells.
Otherwise, return the return value.
Otherwise, returns TRUE if the query succeeded, FALSE on failure.
Otherwise, returns a human-readable description of why the server is not warmed up.
Otherwise, returns an associative array.
Otherwise, returns false.
Otherwise, see if we have a diff file.
Otherwise, str is cut from the first illegal character and an E_NOTICE is generated.
Otherwise, the existing file is overwritten, unless the FILE_APPEND flags is set.
Otherwise, the previous value is retained.
Otherwise, the returned string is path with any trailing /component removed.
Otherwise, this function will return NULL.
Out of bound param.
Out of range - should return false
Output after this function is converted to encoding.
Output facilitating function
Output files only in subsuites
Output is in the format expected by JsonTestRunner.
Output the format
Output the image
Output the image to browser
Outputs 'D1:foo true'
Outputs 'D4::foo false'
Outputs a GD image to the given filename.
Outputs a GD2 image to the given filename.
Outputs a large amount of information about the current state of PHP.
Outputs barbaz
Outputs or save an XBM version of the given image.
Outputs or saves a PNG image from the given image.
Outputs or saves a webp image from the given image.
Overloading not used on declared properties.
Overloading only used on this when accessed outside the class.
Override the alert function to throw an exception instead.
Override width property
Override with something else
Overrideable
PDO thinks autocommit is off, but its manually turned on...
PDO will emulate prepared statements/bound parameters for drivers that do not natively support them, and can also rewrite named or question mark style parameter markers to something more appropriate, if the driver supports one style but not the other.
PDO::ATTR_CASE: Force column names to a specific case.
PDO::ATTR_ERRMODE: Error reporting.
PDO::ATTR_STATEMENT_CLASS: Set user-supplied statement class derived from PDOStatement.
PDO::ATTR_STRINGIFY_FETCHES: Convert numeric values to strings when fetching.
PDO::ATTR_TIMEOUT: Specifies the timeout duration in seconds.
PDO::CASE_LOWER: Force column names to lower case.
PDO::CASE_NATURAL: Leave column names as returned by the database driver.
PDO::CASE_UPPER: Force column names to upper case.
PDO::ERRMODE_EXCEPTION: Throw exceptions.
PDO::ERRMODE_SILENT: Just set error codes.
PDO::ERRMODE_WARNING: Raise E_WARNING.
PDO::NULL_EMPTY_STRING: Empty string is converted to NULL.
PDO::NULL_NATURAL: No conversion.
PDO::NULL_TO_STRING: NULL is converted to an empty string.
PEAR-like class name
PHP 7 used preg_replace_callback here, but we are testing preg_replace_callback_array.
PHP comment here
PHP defaults to Daylight Saving Time.
PHP doesn't handle strings like "12,300.2" correctly by default.
PHP encodes UTF-8 characters in up to four bytes, like this: UTF-8 encoding bytes bits representation 1 7 0bbbbbbb 2 11 110bbbbb 10bbbbbb 3 16 1110bbbb 10bbbbbb 10bbbbbb 4 21 11110bbb 10bbbbbb 10bbbbbb 10bbbbbb Each b represents a bit that can be used to store character data.
PHP sets a constant named CRYPT_SALT_LENGTH which indicates the longest valid salt allowed by the available hashes.
PHP should not try to close the connection or something.
PHP stacks but no Async stacks.
PHP will call this method when the session is ready to be saved and closed.
PHP will evaluate a non-numeric string as 0 if compared to integer, but still return the string if it's seen as the numerically highest value.
PHP will evaluate a non-numeric string as 0 if compared to integer, but still return the string if it's seen as the numerically lowest value.
PHP will try to cast this parameter to a non-null integer to use it.
PHP's resource numbers start one ahead of us
PHP5 32, allowed quietly, but does not change the original argument PHP5 64  allowed with warning "PHP Strict standards:  Only variables should be passed by reference", but does not change the original argument HHVM, allowed quietly, but does not change the original argument
PHP5 and HHVM: type Generator
PHP5 does not have "real" runtime support as of 5.5.7 So the expected behavior is not what you would expect "logically"
PHP5: Succeeded HHVM: Constants may only evaluate to scalar values
PHP_CLI_SERVER_MIME_TYPE_MAP_H
PHP_INI_ALL
PHP_INI_NONE
PHP_INI_ONLY
PHP_INI_PERDIR
PHP_INI_SYSTEM
PHP_INT_MAX
PHP_SESSION_ACTIVE if sessions are enabled, and one exists.
PHP_SESSION_NONE if sessions are enabled, but none exists.
POSIX style
POSIX_F_OK just requests checking for the existence of the file.
POSIX_R_OK, POSIX_W_OK and POSIX_X_OK request checking whether the file exists and has read, write and execute permissions, respectively.
PREFIX_END_HAS_NEXT
PREFIX_END_LAST
PREFIX_LEFT
PREFIX_MID_HAS_NEXT
PREFIX_MID_LAST
PREFIX_RIGHT
PREG_OFFSET_CAPTURE   If this flag is passed, for every occurring match the appendant string offset will also be returned.
PREG_SPLIT_DELIM_CAPTURE   If this flag is set, parenthesized expression in the delimiter pattern will be captured and returned as well.
PREG_SPLIT_OFFSET_CAPTURE   If this flag is set, for every occurring match the appendant string offset will also be returned.
PS are unbuffered, num_rows cannot determine the row count before all rows have been fetched and/or buffered
PTR  target: Location within the DNS namespace to which this record points.
Pacific-ish
Pack given arguments into binary string according to format.
Pad a string to a certain length with another string
Pair and ImmVector are immutable, so we can't do a similar test for them.
Pairwise probe.
Palette image
Parameter expire is expiration time in seconds.
Parameters are numbered beginning with 0.
Parent was skipping one.
Parentheses are not added automatically around the placeholder in the query string, so be sure to add them if necessary.
Parentheses may be nested, in which case they are counted by the opening parenthesis.
Parse Errors tests from HHJsonDecodeTest.php
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_FRAGMENT as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_HOST as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_PASS as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_PATH as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_PORT as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_QUERY as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_SCHEME as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying PHP_URL_USER as the URL component
Parse a load of URLs without specifying the component
Parse a number according to current formatting rules.
Parse all the options passed to run.php
Parse arguments
Parse command line options
Parse currency string  This parser would use parseCurrency API string to parse currency string.
Parse definition file into tree
Parse error
Parses GET/POST/COOKIE data and sets global variables.
Parses YAML to array.
Parses a file.
Parses a string input for fields in CSV format and returns an array containing the fields read.
Parses options passed to the script.
Parses str as if it were the query string passed via a URL and sets variables in the current scope.
Parsing callback for yaml tag.
Parsing helper's definition
Parsing opcode handler's definition
Part 1: Storing the result of a function in a static variable.
Part 2: Storing a reference to the result of a function in a static variable.
Part 3: TO BE DISCUSSED  Storing a reference to the result of a function in a static variable.
Part of the GNU extension.
Partial parsing
Pasing object in place of 'input' argument to test object functionatlity
Pass a `Vector` of values to have it expanded into a comma-separated list.
Pass a function that will be called if any `invariant` fails.
Pass a function that will be called if any invariant fails.
Pass a non-object as the parameter for binding the closure to.
Pass accented characters and Russian characters to check case conversion is correct
Pass all encodings listed on php.net to test that function recognises them.
Pass an array of objects which are either:  1.
Pass an array with different data types as keys to test how array_merge  adds it onto an existing array
Pass array_merge arrays with string keys to test behaviour.
Pass array_push arrays where the keys are different data types.
Pass arrays of different data types to test how array_merge adds them onto an existing array
Pass arrays of numeric data to test how natcasesort re-orders the array
Pass characters from different languages to check that mb_strtoupper is doing a correct case conversion
Pass different hexadecimal and octal values that: 1.
Pass different strings to ctype_alnum to test behaviour
Pass iconv_strlen an incorrect number of arguments to test behaviour
Pass in a problem as an OAuthException, with possible problems listed in the OAuth constants section.
Pass incorrect number of arguments and an unknown function to test which error is generated.
Pass incorrect number of arguments to array_values to test behaviour
Pass mb_internal_encoding an unknown encoding
Pass mb_regex_encoding an unknown type of encoding
Pass mb_strlen an incorrect number of arguments to test behaviour
Passed a referenced variable 2.
Passed an argument by reference
Passed an array as the first argument and a reference to that array as the second.
Passed an array by reference
Passed an array made up of referenced variables 2.
Passed an array of referenced variables 2.
Passed an infinitely recursive multi-dimensional array
Passing 'input' array which contains elements as reference to other data
Passing 'source' argument with different style of comments
Passing 0 causes the seams to be straight.
Passing NULL or an empty string will be equivalent to the default value.
Passing built-in functions and different language constructs as 'callback' argument
Passing different anonymous callback functions with passed by value and reference arguments
Passing different anonymous functions as 'cmp_function' arguments passed by value arguments passed by reference
Passing different buit-in functionns as callback function pow function min function echo language construct
Passing different scalar and nonscalar values for 'input' argument
Passing different scalar and nonscalar values in place of 'callback' argument
Passing different scalar/non-scalar values in place of 'source' argument It returns either T_INLINE_HTML by converting values into string or gives warning
Passing different scalar/nonscalar values in place of 'funcname' argument
Passing different scalar/nonscalar values in place of 'input' argument
Passing different types of array as 'input' argument.
Passing dir names with different notations, using slashes, wild-card chars
Passing file names with different notations, using slashes, wild-card chars
Passing it to an 'as' constrained Bar is fine
Passing object in place of an 'input' argument to test object functionality
Passing resource as an argument
Passing the NULL value or the string "localhost" to this parameter, the local host is assumed.
Patched a self-signed certificate to include validity timestamps starting with nul byte
Path modifier that should be applied after adding current element.
Pear is a current example of this behavior.
Pear won't run correctly unless a 'php' executable exists.
Perform a nonblocking test whether an asynchronous query has completed.
Perform a regular expression search and replace using an associative array of pattern and callback key/value pairs.
Perform a regular expression search and replace.
Perform the splay operation for the given key.
Performance.now is used in latency benchmarks, the fallback is Date.now.
Performing addition operation on given values : a, b
Performs a "han-kaku" - "zen-kaku" conversion for string str.
Performs a multibyte regular expression match for a predefined multibyte string.
Performs an ordered traversal of the subtree starting at this SplayTree.Node.
Performs case folding on a string, converted in the way specified by mode.
Performs the ROT13 encoding on the str argument and returns the resulting string.
Performs the search for a specified filter on the directory with the scope LDAP_SCOPE_BASE.
Performs the search for a specified filter on the directory with the scope LDAP_SCOPE_ONELEVEL.
Performs the search for a specified filter on the directory with the scope of LDAP_SCOPE_SUBTREE.
Permission denied  This means that the socket could not be opened due to permissions issues.
Phar write buffering is per-archive, buffering active for the foo.phar Phar archive does not affect changes to the bar.phar Phar archive.
Pick random number between 1 and max 16 bit unsigned int 65535
Pick sample size, results normalized against median function call cost
Pipe doesn't force you to format with a newline if you don't want.
Planners may exploit the fact that instances, if satisfied, will not change their output during plan execution.
Playing with the port makes only sense if no socket gets used
Please consult the Streams constant list for further details on each constant.
Please note sessions use an alternative serialization method.
Please note that needle is case sensitive.
Please note that this function only checks one dimension of a n-dimensional array.
Please note the callback methods of this class are designed to be called internally by PHP and are not meant to be called from user-space code.
Please read server documentation for more details.
Please read server documentation for what a pagelet server is.
Please read server documentation for what an xbox is.
Please read the section on Booleans for more information.
Please see the Array section of the manual for a detailed explanation of how arrays are implemented and used in PHP.
Please see the Floating point numbers section in the manual for more specific information and limitations.
Please see the Replica Sets section for information on how to connect to Replica Sets.
Please use MongoClient instead.
Pooled curl handles persist between requests.
Ported to PHP from Google's Octane v2.0 benchmarking suite for JavaScript.
Position is counted from the beginning of str.
Positional argument, presumably.
Positive offsets
Posix requires that assumptions must not be made about the format of the values, e.g. the assumption that a release may contain three digits or anything else returned by this function.
Possible patterns are documented at .
Possible values are RecursiveIteratorIterator::LEAVES_ONLY - The default.
Possible values are fifo, char, dir, block, link, file, and unknown.
Possible values are fifo, char, dir, block, link, file, socket and unknown.
Possible values for flags Flag Description MSG_OOB Process out-of-band data.
Possible values: - SIG_BLOCK: Add the signals to the currently blocked signals.
Post test information are error/failure information and the final passing stats for the test
Posts an xbox message without waiting.
Potentially an infinitely-growing map type.
Pre 5.6: link remains useable
Precision loss when comparing bit ints w/ floats.
Predefined Date constants
Prefer splitting into two methods to calling it mixed.
Prefer to use XhprofFrame classobjects instead of calling this function directly.
Preparation
Prepared Statements
Prepared statements are released and HANDLER variables are closed.
Prepared statements with bound parameters are not only more portable, more convenient, immune to SQL injection, but are often much faster to execute than interpolated queries, as both the server and client side can cache a compiled form of the query.
Prepares an SQL statement for execution and returns an SQLite3Stmt object.
Prepending host by p: opens a persistent connection.
Preppend test signature to output string
Presently, the ISO-8859-1 character set is used as the default.
Pretty cool -- just pass in 'false' for either if you want to use the default.
Pretty simple.
Prevent clone
Prevent cloning
Prevent infinite loops.
Prevent notices about undefines variables
Previous to PHP 5.1.0, this function would return -1 on failure.
Previous to this, dates will be in the Julian calendar.
Previously, an end user message was created as a sentence and handled as a string.
Prime the generator
Print a hashbang if not run from the first source file executed.
Print every element of a ImmSet with a custom function, since serialization is not wired up yet.
Print if output format is for humans
Print out summary information
Print output if format is human readable, but not not verbose.
Print output if verbose mode is on.
Print result as HTML table
Print stats
Print the diffs
Printing the returned value from the function
Prints the entries of a Vector in sorted order.
Prior to 5.3.0, MCRYPT_RAND was the only one supported on Windows.
Private constructor for disallowing instantiation
Private function to walk the WDDX DOM tree
Private use registry values
Private use subtags:
Probably bad practice to have --latest --record --latest-record, but it is not a contradiction.
Probably indicates a network problem.
Probably max_allowed_packet_size is smaller than the data.
Processes a SOAP request, calls necessary functions, and sends a response back.
Processes a pagelet server request.
Produce specialized executor
Produce unspecialized executor for each handlers in helpers in original order
Produces output according to format.
Programs store and operate on numbers using a locale-independent binary representation.
Prop for visible, accessible property
Prop for visible, accessible property: use __get
Prop for visible, inaccessible property: use __get
PropD for visible, accessible property
PropD for visible, accessible property: use __get
PropD for visible, inaccessible property: use __get
PropU for visible, accessible property
Propagate value array
Protected and public are handle more strict with a warning then what is expected from normal inheritance since they can have easier coliding semantics
Protected property
Provide a placeholder string with the data we do have pending changes to the Extension registry.
Provide a value of 0 and the radius will be chosen automagically.
Provides string comparison capability with support for appropriate locale-sensitive sort orderings.
Provides the result information for when the connection to the MySQL client is made successfully.
Provides timing statistics about the MySQL client.
Public methods are always accessible.
Purges the cache of entries of a specific type.
Push down bytecode offsets
Push two values onto the list
Put a side effect in the function designator and see the order of evaluation of that compared with the argument list expressions.
Put any script error to a file when we are in a mode like --csv and want to control what gets printed to something like STDOUT.
Put something there if the node name is empty
Put the proxy information in its own "struct-like" class for easy access in case folks outside this proxy wall need to change them.
Putting element inside a container should not affect it's type.
QA configuration
QqJP test 64-bit ints specifically
Queries the remote side of the given socket which may either result in host/port or in a Unix filesystem path, dependent on its type.
Questionable, dissallowed in the type-checker
Quick hack to make sure we get the latest phpunit binary from composer
Quickly determine if a debugger is attached to this process and configured to debug this thread.
RENAME TABLE
REPLACE EXPR
REPLACE STMT
RFC 1320 vectors
RFC 3629 limited char points to 0000-10FFFF aka 5 byte utf-8 not valid
Raise Notice: 5.6.0Raise E_NOTICE security warning if salt is omitted.
Raise a fatal.
Raise a warning and throw from the user error handler.
Raises a fatal error.
Rather than retrieving all of the data and manipulating it in PHP, consider using the database server to manipulate the result sets.
Rather, if the operation would result in a block, the called function will fail.
Rather, the cursor marks the final object's position.
Raw Binary Output for Empty file as input
Re-add __DIR__ if not there so we have a full test path to run
Re-add the empties
Re-add the mappings
Re-add the sequences
Re-add the strings
Re-create for read
Reaction on host not specified differs for different configs, so no printing
Read Response 1
Read Response 2
Read ahead.
Read the list of mailboxes.
Read the section about  for further information.
Read the structure of a specified body section of a specific message.
Read the values from memcached and decompress/unserialize.
Read their descriptions for details.
Read/write them while implicitly mutating them through the temporary object's destructor.
Reading 1024 bytes from file, expecting 1024 bytes
Reads a dbgp message from the socket.
Reads a file and writes it to the output buffer.
Reads all the values of the attribute in the entry in the result.
Reads an entire file into an array.
Reads attributes and values from an entry in the search result.
Reads multiple entries from the given result, and then reading the attributes and multiple values.
Reads to EOF on the given file pointer from the current position and writes the results to the output buffer.
Received response saying we're stopping.
Recompute the walkabout strengths and stay flags of all variables downstream of the given constraint and recompute the actual values of all variables whose stay flag is true.
Reconnect because after 3 failed change_user attempts, the server blocks you off.
Reconnect failed, give up
Record 'DocumentFragment is empty' warnings
Record the fact that this constraint is unsatisfied.
Record time
Records that this constraint is unsatisfied
Recurse along the children to generate the remaining nodes
RecursiveCachingIterator expects param1 to be recit
RecursiveIteratorIterator::CHILD_FIRST - Lists leaves and parents in iteration with leaves coming first.
RecursiveIteratorIterator::SELF_FIRST - Lists leaves and parents in iteration with parents coming first.
Recursively test all sub scripts of provided statement list
Red if we go from pass to something else
Redis servers run here by default
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met:
Redundant match
Refer to context options and parameters for a listing of stream options.
Refer to context parameters for a listing of standard stream parameters.
Refer to the list of gravity constants.
Refer to this list of alpha channel constants.
Refer to this list of channel constants.
Refer to this list of metric constants.
Refer to this list of noise constants.
Refer to this list of pixel constants.
Reference mess...
Reference to an array
Referenced variables 2.
References must be a variant type
Referral can only be removed with Manage DSA IT Control
ReflectionClass cannot create or delete static properties
ReflectionClass cannot touch protected or private static properties
ReflectionTypeAlias should autoload the alias it references
Regex string
Regex without closing delimiter
Regex without delimiter
Regex without delimiters
Regex without opening delimiter
Register a function with the spl provided __autoload stack.
Registers a PHP function or user-defined function for use as an SQL aggregate function for use within SQL statements.
Registers a PHP function or user-defined function for use as an SQL scalar function for use within SQL statements.
Registers a User Defined Function for use in SQL statements.
Registers a set of classes, merging with any others previously set.
Registers a set of classes, replacing any others previously set.
Registers the namespaceURI and prefix with the DOMXPath object.
Registers this instance as an autoloader.
Regression test for Peephole optimizer's logic for remapping method entry points
Regression test for a translator bug
Regression test: newlines in strings used to mess up line numbers in error messages.
Regression test: running autocomplete on a file with erroneous typeconst used to crash the typechecker.
Regular Data Test
Regular expression to select the error and warning information tuned for gcc 3.4, 4.0 and 4.1
Regular expressions consist of four parts.
Regular strings keys
Relative from CWD path.
Relative path
Release a task that is currently blocked and return the next block to run.
Releases the current connection and returns a synchronous MySQL connection.
Relies on `hh_server` to poke a stamp file to say "something has changed" to invalidate our cache.
Relying on this feature is highly discouraged.
Remember, that shared memory still exist in the Unix system and the data is still present.
Remove a zero port, if found
Remove all deleted files, which are not checked by the following linters.
Remove all lib/core functions at the top of the stack
Remove any possible periods.
Remove comments and flip into an extensions array.
Remove data we don't need as otherwise the caches get huge.
Remove fb_debug_backtrace from the backtrace
Remove strings that could change between runs.
Remove systemlib stack frames until we hit the user code.
Remove the directory if already exists
Remove the given constraint and incrementally update the dataflow graph.
Remove the last element of this Vector and return it.
Remove top stack frames up to and including Exception::__init__, set the 'file' and 'line' properties appropriately
Remove unused free_op1 and free_op2 declarations
Removed skipped and incomplete tests
Removes a node with the specified key from the tree if the tree contains a node with this key.
Removes a parameter, if set.
Removes a required parameter.
Removes a stored variable from the cache.
Removes a variable with a given variable_key and frees the occupied memory.
Removes all entries from this container
Removes all key/value pairs from the Map.
Removes all traces of c from this variable.
Removes all values from the Set.
Removes all values from the Vector.
Removes attribute is namespace namespaceURI named localName from the element.
Removes attribute named name from the element.
Removes attribute oldnode from the element.
Removes one or more attributes from the specified dn.
Removes the element with the specified key from this Vector and renumbers the keys of all subsequent elements.
Removes the elements designated by offset and length from the input array, and replaces them with the elements of the replacement array, if supplied.
Removes the specified directory on the FTP server.
Removes the specified key from this Map.
Removes the specified key from this Vector.
Removes the specified value from this Set and returns itself.
Removes the specified value from this Set.
Removing optional field allows omitting it even when fields are only partially known.
Rename a function, so that a function can be called with the new name.
Renaming a file and directory to numeric name
Renaming a file, link and directory to numeric name
Reopens the specified stream to a new mailbox on an IMAP or NNTP server.
Repeat off-by-one because the old lexer worked right with the second version, but not the first, so test both.
Repeat the data three times, to make it invalid.
Repeated types
Repeated use of Tv bound to something different in each class is meant to be a stress-test of tricksy typing_decl instantiation code
Replace a few nodes in the splay tree.
Replace count characters starting from position offset with data.
Replace headers with existing sources.
Replace with __call-having object
Replace with closure
Replace with empty string
Replaces one or more attributes from the specified dn.
Replaces rest of string if count is greater than length of existing string
Replaces the child node oldChild with newChild in the list of children, and returns the oldChild node.
Replaces the colors of an image with the closest color from a reference image.
Represent date objects for the database.
Representation of date and time.
Representation of time zone.
Representations a database collection.
Represents JavaScript code for the database.
Represents a MySQL warning.
Represents a SOAP header.
Represents a connection between PHP and a MySQL database.
Represents a connection between PHP and a database server.
Represents a connection to a set of memcache servers.
Represents a connection to a set of memcached servers.
Represents a date interval.
Represents a prepared statement and, after the statement is executed, an associated result set.
Represents a prepared statement.
Represents a result of operation that either has a successful result of an `Awaitable` or the exception object if that `Awaitable` failed.
Represents a row block.
Represents a writer that provides a non-cached, forward-only means of generating streams or files containing XML data.
Represents an element in an XML document.
Represents nodes with character data.
Represents parameter to a SOAP call.
Represents the result of failed `Awaitable` operation.
Represents the result of successful `Awaitable` operation.
Represents the result set obtained from a query against the database.
Request a page so that the client can debug it.
Requests for this server will then failover or fail immediately depending on the memcache.allow_failover setting.
Require the explicit specification.
Requirements of Trait1 inherited
Requires bool.
Requires int.
Requires: PostgreSQL 7.2.x
Reschedule the work of an async function until some other time in the future.
Reserves enough memory to accommodate 'sz' elements.
Reset environment from any previous test.
Reset the cursor and try again.
Reset the iterator to the first row.
Reset timeout
Reset timeout on socket for now
Resets the current date of the DateTime object to a different date.
Resets the current time of the DateTime object to a different time.
Resets the directory stream indicated by dir_handle to the beginning of the directory.
Resets the prepared statement to its state prior to execution.
Resize this Vector to contain 'sz' elements.
Resource variable
ResourceBundle supports direct access to the data through array access pattern and iteration via foreach, as well as access via class methods.
Response Count
Restore attribute's symbol.
Restore attribute's value to default
Restore original attribute of the  value
Restores a given configuration option to its original value.
Restrict this test case to the basics.
Result of detecting the encoding of an array of bytes
Results may vary.
Results will be similar to: /tmp/root/b34.txt /tmp/root/a.txt /tmp/root/z.txt /tmp/root/foo/we.txt /tmp/root/foo/a.txt /tmp/root/waz/bing.txt where the ending files are not necessarily in order, but the containing directories are in order.
Ret runs two destructors
Retreive error code.
Retreive error message.
Retrieve a comma-separated list of paths to any additionally loaded ini files after php.ini.
Retrieve a path to the loaded php.ini file.
Retrieve array of errors.
Retrieve binary from DB
Retrieve column metadata for a result set returned by a function
Retrieve column metadata for a result set returned by explicit SELECT
Retrieve information about parameters to procedures
Retrieve list of registered streams available on the running system.
Retrieve statistics about a table
Retrieve the entries stored in the result.
Retrieve the error number set by the last posix function that failed.
Retrieve the pagination information send by the server.
Retrieves APC's Shared Memory Allocation information.
Retrieves a list of foreign keys
Retrieves a node specified by index within the DOMNamedNodeMap object.
Retrieves a node specified by index within the DOMNodeList object.
Retrieves a node specified by its nodeName.
Retrieves a node specified by localName and namespaceURI.
Retrieves cached information and meta-data from APC's data store.
Retrieves code snippets for adding to test cases
Retrieves information about data types supported by the data source
Retrieves information about the caller that invoked the current function or method.
Retrieves special columns
Retrieves the TypeStructure for a type constant or a type alias.
Retrieves the attributes in an entry.
Retrieves the callback function name.
Retrieves the full error result document.
Retry a few times and hope for the best.
Return FALSE if it does not understand the search criteria or no messages have been found.
Return ICU error code name.
Return an empty string instead of false for new sessions as false values cause sessions to fail to init
Return an image containing the affine tramsformed src image, using an optional clipping area.
Return column number
Return contents of all the arrays.
Return current normalication mode.
Return either of the above
Return error text for the last ICU operation.
Return output data.
Return something that looks close to the hh_client response.
Return the Unicode name for a given property value.
Return the Unicode name for a given property.
Return the attribute if it's there
Return the current element.
Return the current key and value pair from an array  and advance the array cursor
Return the current key and value pair from an array and advance the array cursor.
Return the key of the current element.
Return the name of another class
Return the number of pagelet tasks started during this request.
Return the numeric effective group ID of the current process.
Return the numeric effective user ID of the current process.
Return the numeric real group ID of the current process.
Return the numeric real user ID of the current process.
Return the process group identifier of the current process.
Return the process identifier of the current process.
Return the process identifier of the parent process of the current process.
Return the result of the operation, or throw underlying exception.
Return the session id of the process pid.
Return the underlying exception, or fail with invariant violation.
Return thread type.
Return time zone relative to given DateTime.
Return type check is already performed in the generic test.
Return url back to a unix:// prefix instead of file://
Return what we know how to lint.
Return whether stack traces would be shown in case of an error or not.
Returns -1 if the supplied connection itself is invalid.
Returns -1 if unknown.
Returns -1 on error.
Returns 0 or FALSE in case of error.
Returns English text describing the most recent failed SQLite request.
Returns FALSE if an error occurs.
Returns FALSE if called from outside a class.
Returns FALSE if no error messages are available.
Returns FALSE if object is not an object.
Returns FALSE if such key already exist.
Returns FALSE if text contains control characters or characters that do not have any output or control function at all.
Returns FALSE if the driver does not support quoting in this way.
Returns FALSE if the needle was not found.
Returns FALSE if the requested column does not exist in the result set, or if no result set exists.
Returns FALSE on EOF.
Returns FALSE on error.
Returns FALSE on failure.
Returns FALSE otherwise.
Returns FALSE, and does not write the CSV line to the file, if the delimiter or enclosure parameter is not a single character.
Returns I/O status of current thread.
Returns NULL if no operation has been run on the database handle.
Returns NULL if there hasn't been an error yet.
Returns NULL in case of a failure.
Returns NULL in case of an error.
Returns TRUE if the file named by filename was uploaded via HTTP POST.
Returns TRUE if the filename exists and is writable.
Returns TRUE on success or FALSE on failure.
Returns a ConstSetLike built from the keys of the specified container.
Returns a DOMNodeList of all elements with a given local name and a namespace URI.
Returns a ImmMap built from the key/value Pairs produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns a ImmMap built from the keys and values of this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmMap built from the keys and values of this ImmVector.
Returns a ImmMap built from the keys and values of this Map.
Returns a ImmMap built from the keys and values of this Set.
Returns a ImmMap built from the keys and values of this Vector.
Returns a ImmMap built from the keys and values produced by the specified KeyedIterable.
Returns a ImmMap containing all key/value pairs except the first n of this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmMap containing the first n key/value pairs of this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmMap containing the key/value pairs of this ImmMap excluding the first values that produces true when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a ImmMap containing the key/value pairs of this ImmMap up to but not including the first value that produces false when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a ImmMap containing the specified range of key/value pairs from this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmMap of all the keys/values from this ImmMap for which the specified callback returns true.
Returns a ImmMap of the keys/values produced by applying the specified callback on each key and value from this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmMap of the keys/values produced by applying the specified callback on each value from this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmSet built from the keys of the specified container.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values from the specified arrays.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values of this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values of this ImmVector.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values of this Map.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values of this Set.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values of this Vector.
Returns a ImmSet built from the values produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns a ImmSet containing all the values of this ImmSet excluding the first values that produces true when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a ImmSet containing all values except the first n of this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmSet containing the first n values of this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmSet containing the specified range of values from this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmSet containing the values of this ImmSet up to but not including the first value that produces false when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a ImmSet of all the values from this ImmSet for which the specified callback returns true.
Returns a ImmSet of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each key and value from this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmSet of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each value from this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmVector built from the keys of the specified container.
Returns a ImmVector built from the keys of this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmVector built from the values of this ImmMap.
Returns a ImmVector built from the values of this ImmSet.
Returns a ImmVector built from the values of this Map.
Returns a ImmVector built from the values of this Set.
Returns a ImmVector built from the values of this Vector.
Returns a ImmVector built from the values produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns a ImmVector containing all values except the first n of this ImmVector.
Returns a ImmVector containing the first n values of this ImmVector.
Returns a ImmVector containing the values of this ImmVector excluding the first values that produces true when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a ImmVector containing the values of this ImmVector up to but not including the first value that produces false when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Iterable produced by combined the specified Iterables pair-wise.
Returns a KeyedIterable produced by combined the specified Iterables pair-wise.
Returns a LibXMLError object if there is any error in the buffer, FALSE otherwise.
Returns a Map built from the key/value Pairs produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values from the specified array.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values of this ImmMap.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values of this ImmSet.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values of this ImmVector.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values of this Set.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values of this Vector.
Returns a Map built from the keys and values produced by the specified KeyedIterable.
Returns a Map containing all key/value pairs except the first n of this Map.
Returns a Map containing the first n key/value pairs of this Map.
Returns a Map containing the key/value pairs of this Map excluding the first values that produces true when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Map containing the key/value pairs of this Map up to but not including the first value that produces false when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Map containing the specified range of key/value pairs from this Map.
Returns a Map of the keys/values produced by applying the specified callback on each key and value from this Map.
Returns a Map of the keys/values produced by applying the specified callback on each value from this Map.
Returns a Set built from the keys of the specified container.
Returns a Set built from the values from the specified array.
Returns a Set built from the values from the specified arrays.
Returns a Set built from the values of this ImmMap.
Returns a Set built from the values of this ImmSet.
Returns a Set built from the values of this ImmVector.
Returns a Set built from the values of this Map.
Returns a Set built from the values of this Vector.
Returns a Set built from the values produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns a Set containing all the values of this Set excluding the first values that produces true when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Set containing all values except the first n of this Set.
Returns a Set containing the first n values of this Set.
Returns a Set containing the specified range of values from this Set.
Returns a Set containing the values of this Set up to but not including the first value that produces false when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Set of all the values from this Set for which the specified callback returns true.
Returns a Set of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each key and value from this Set.
Returns a Set of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each value from this Set.
Returns a Vector built from the keys of the specified container.
Returns a Vector built from the keys of this ImmSet.
Returns a Vector built from the keys of this Map.
Returns a Vector built from the keys of this Set.
Returns a Vector built from the keys of this Vector.
Returns a Vector built from the values from the specified array.
Returns a Vector built from the values of this ImmMap.
Returns a Vector built from the values of this ImmSet.
Returns a Vector built from the values of this ImmVector.
Returns a Vector built from the values of this Map.
Returns a Vector built from the values of this Set.
Returns a Vector built from the values produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns a Vector containing all the values except the first n of this Vector.
Returns a Vector containing the first n values of this Vector.
Returns a Vector containing the specified range of values from this Vector.
Returns a Vector containing the values of this Vector excluding the first values that produces true when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Vector containing the values of this Vector up to but not including the first value that produces false when passed to the specified callback.
Returns a Vector of all the values from this ImmVector for which the specified callback returns true.
Returns a Vector of all the values from this Vector for which the specified callback returns true.
Returns a Vector of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each key and value from this ImmVector.
Returns a Vector of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each key and value from this Vector.
Returns a Vector of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each value from this ImmVector.
Returns a Vector of the values produced by applying the specified callback on each value from this Vector.
Returns a `ImmVector` containing the values of the current `Pair` that meet a supplied condition.
Returns a `Set` with the values of the current `Pair`.
Returns a `Vector` containing the elements of the current `Pair`.
Returns a `Vector` representing all row blocks returned by the successful query.
Returns a clone of this ImmVector.
Returns a clone of this Vector.
Returns a color identifier representing the color composed of the given RGB components.
Returns a copy of this Map.
Returns a copy of this Set.
Returns a copy of this Vector.
Returns a description of the warmup status of the server.
Returns a human-readable string for the error encountered in the current exception.
Returns a human-readable string for the error encountered in this result.
Returns a key-value array of locale ID subtag elements.
Returns a lazy iterable view of this ImmMap.
Returns a lazy iterable view of this ImmSet.
Returns a lazy iterable view of this ImmVector.
Returns a lazy iterable view of this Map.
Returns a lazy iterable view of this Set.
Returns a lazy iterable view of this Vector.
Returns a lazy, access elements only when needed view of the current `Pair`.
Returns a list of the defined functions in the SoapServer object.
Returns a new Map of all the keys/values from this Map for which the specified callback returns true.
Returns a number formatted according to the given format string using the given integer timestamp or the current local time if no timestamp is given.
Returns a one-character string containing the character specified by ascii.
Returns a quoted printable string created according to  RFC2045, section 6.7.
Returns a single column from the next row of a result set or FALSE if there are no more rows.
Returns a string containing a binary representation of the given number argument.
Returns a string containing a hexadecimal representation of the given number argument.
Returns a string containing a month name.
Returns a string containing an octal representation of the given number argument.
Returns a string containing number represented in base tobase.
Returns a string containing the version of the currently running PHP parser or extension.
Returns a string containing the version of the currently running Zend Engine.
Returns a string for the absolute path to the current terminal device that is open on the file descriptor fd.
Returns a string formatted according to the given format string using the given integer timestamp or the current time if no timestamp is given.
Returns a string representation of this regular expression.
Returns a string that has been properly escaped for safe inclusion in an SQL statement.
Returns a string with backslashes before characters that are listed in charlist parameter.
Returns a string with backslashes before characters that need to be quoted in database queries etc.
Returns a string with backslashes stripped off.
Returns a string with the first character of each word in str capitalized, if that character is alphabetic.
Returns a string with the first character of str , lowercased if that character is alphabetic.
Returns a string with the first character of str capitalized, if that character is alphabetic.
Returns a subset of the current `Pair` starting from a given key up to, but not including, the element at the provided length from the starting key.
Returns a text error message describing the given CURLM error code.
Returns all attributes with given key.
Returns all of haystack from the first occurrence of needle to the end.
Returns an ASCII string containing the binary representation of hexidecimal str.
Returns an ASCII string containing the hexadecimal representation of str.
Returns an EncodingMatch object containing the best guess for the encoding of the byte array.
Returns an ImmVector built from the keys of the specified container.
Returns an ImmVector built from the values produced by the specified Iterable.
Returns an ImmVector containing the specified range of values from this ImmVector.
Returns an Iterable produced by combining the specified Iterables pair-wise.
Returns an Iterable that produces the key/value Pairs from this ImmMap.
Returns an Iterable that produces the key/value Pairs from this Map.
Returns an Iterable that produces the keys from this ImmVector.
Returns an Iterable that produces the values from this ImmSet.
Returns an Iterable that produces the values from this ImmVector.
Returns an Iterable that produces the values from this Set.
Returns an Iterable that produces the values from this Vector.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` after a filtering operation has been applied to each key and value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` after a filtering operation has been applied to each value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` after a mapping operation has been applied to each key and value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` containing after a mapping operation has been applied to each value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a filtering operation has been applied to each key/value pair in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a filtering operation has been applied to each value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a mapping operation has been applied to each key/value pair in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Map` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a mapping operation has been applied to each value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` after a filtering operation has been applied to each key and value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` after a filtering operation has been applied to each value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` after a mapping operation has been applied to each key and value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` containing after a mapping operation has been applied to each value in the provided `Traversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a filtering operation has been applied to each key/value pair in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a filtering operation has been applied to each value in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a mapping operation has been applied to each key/value pair in the provided `KeyedTraversable`.
Returns an `Awaitable` of `Vector` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` after a mapping operation has been applied to each value in the provided `Traversable`.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the first `n` values of the current `Pair`.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values after an operation has been applied to each key and value in the current `Pair`.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values after an operation has been applied to each value in the current `Pair`.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values after the `n`-th element of the current `Pair`.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values of the current `Pair` starting after and including the first value that produces `true` when passed to the specified callback.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values of the current `Pair` that meet a supplied condition applied to its keys and values.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values of the current `Pair` up to but not including the first value that produces `false` when passed to the specified callback.
Returns an `ImmVector` containing the values of the current `Pair`.
Returns an `ImmVector` that is the concatenation of the values of the current `Pair` and the values of the provided `Traversable`.
Returns an `ImmVector` where each element is a `Pair` that combines each element of the current `Pair` and the provided `Traversable`.
Returns an `ImmVector` with the values being the keys of the current `Pair`.
Returns an `Iterable` view of the current `Pair`.
Returns an `array` containing the values from the current `Pair`.
Returns an `array` whose values are the keys from the current `Pair`.
Returns an array built from the keys and values from this ImmMap.
Returns an array built from the keys and values from this Map.
Returns an array built from the keys from this ImmMap.
Returns an array built from the keys from this ImmVector.
Returns an array built from the keys from this Map.
Returns an array built from the keys from this Vector.
Returns an array built from the values from this ImmMap.
Returns an array built from the values from this ImmSet.
Returns an array built from the values from this ImmVector.
Returns an array built from the values from this Map.
Returns an array built from the values from this Set.
Returns an array built from the values from this Vector.
Returns an array containing all supported encodings.
Returns an array containing the key/value pairs from this MapLike
Returns an array containing the values from this ImmSet.
Returns an array containing the values from this VectorLike.
Returns an array of all open connections, and information about each of the servers
Returns an array of all the collection names for the given database.
Returns an array of files and directories from the directory.
Returns an array of information about all connection pools.
Returns an array of information about the given user.
Returns an array of information about the user referenced by the given user ID.
Returns an array of strings, each of which is a substring of string formed by splitting it on boundaries formed by the string delimiter.
Returns an array of the information that was used to generate the password hash.
Returns an array that corresponds to the fetched row, if available.
Returns an array where each element is a variable name which is defined in the current scope.
Returns an array which resembles the stack trace up to this point.
Returns an array whose values are this containers's keys.
Returns an array with LibXMLError objects if there are any errors in the buffer, or an empty array otherwise.
Returns an array with all keys from input lowercased or uppercased.
Returns an associative array containing localized numeric and monetary formatting information.
Returns an associative array containing the date information of the timestamp, or the current local time if no timestamp is given.
Returns an immutable version of this collection.
Returns an integer-keyed `Map` based on the elements of the current `Pair`.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of the current `Pair`.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of this ImmMap.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of this ImmSet.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of this ImmVector.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of this Map.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of this Set.
Returns an iterator that points to beginning of this Vector.
Returns an iterator that points to the beginning of this Container.
Returns base raised to the power of exp.
Returns buffer readden by stream_get_line
Returns code coverage data collected so far.
Returns date formatted according to given format.
Returns e raised to the power of arg.
Returns false and raises warning when called from global scope.
Returns index of the specified value if it is present, -1 otherwise.
Returns information about a current connection
Returns information about an existing stream.
Returns input repeated multiplier times.
Returns name of specialized helper
Returns part of haystack string from the first occurrence of case-insensitive needle to the end of haystack.
Returns part of haystack string from the first occurrence of needle to the end of haystack.
Returns statistical information for the current pool.
Returns status of different server threads.
Returns status of the circular reference collector.
Returns str with all alphabetic characters converted to lowercase.
Returns str with all alphabetic characters converted to uppercase.
Returns string with all alphabetic characters converted to lowercase.
Returns string with all alphabetic characters converted to uppercase.
Returns string, reversed.
Returns the "sec" field of this timestamp.
Returns the ASCII value of the first character of string.
Returns the ID of the last inserted row, or the last value from a sequence object, depending on the underlying driver.
Returns the MySQL client statistics at the moment the connection was established.
Returns the MySQL client statistics at the moment the result was created.
Returns the MySQL client statistics at the moment the successful query ended.
Returns the MySQL client statistics for the events that produced the error.
Returns the MySQL error number for that caused the current exception.
Returns the MySQL error number for this result.
Returns the POSIX system error message associated with the given errno.
Returns the SQLite3 library version as a string constant and as a number.
Returns the Unix timestamp corresponding to midnight on Easter of the given year.
Returns the Unix timestamp corresponding to the arguments given.
Returns the `AsyncMysqlConnectResult` for the current connection.
Returns the `string` version of the current `Pair`, which is `"Pair"`.
Returns the absolute value of number.
Returns the actual rows returned by the successful query, each row including the name and typed-value for each column.
Returns the actual rows returned by the successful query, each row including the name and value for each column.
Returns the actual rows returned by the successful query, each row including the typed values for each column.
Returns the actual rows returned by the successful query, each row including the values for each column.
Returns the amount of memory, in bytes, that's currently being allocated to your PHP script.
Returns the arc cosine of arg in radians.
Returns the arc sine of arg in radians.
Returns the arc tangent of arg in radians.
Returns the argument list with the greatest possible number of arguments.
Returns the async operation status for a given mysql connection.
Returns the attribute node in namespace namespaceURI with local name localName for the current node.
Returns the attribute node with name name for the current element.
Returns the base-10 logarithm of arg.
Returns the best pattern matching the input skeleton.
Returns the combining class of the code point.
Returns the current amount of memory the script uses.
Returns the current buffer.
Returns the current configuration setting of magic_quotes_gpc  Keep in mind that attempting to set magic_quotes_gpc at runtime will not work.
Returns the current encoding for a multibyte regex as a string.
Returns the current input variable
Returns the current key that the iterator points to.
Returns the current output variable
Returns the current output variable.
Returns the current time index since the starting of the script in seconds.
Returns the current value that the iterator points to.
Returns the day of the week.
Returns the decimal equivalent of the binary number represented by the binary_string argument.
Returns the decimal equivalent of the hexadecimal number represented by the hex_string argument.
Returns the decimal equivalent of the octal number represented by the octal_string argument.
Returns the entry identifier for first entry in the result.
Returns the extension for the given IMAGETYPE_XXX constant.
Returns the filename of the next file from the directory.
Returns the first key from this ImmMap, or null if this ImmMap is empty.
Returns the first key from this ImmSet, or null if this ImmSet is empty.
Returns the first key from this ImmVector, or null if this ImmVector is empty.
Returns the first key from this Map, or null if this Map is empty.
Returns the first key from this Set, or null if this Vector is empty.
Returns the first key from this Vector, or null if this Vector is empty.
Returns the first key in the current `Pair`.
Returns the first value from this ImmMap, or null if this ImmMap is empty.
Returns the first value from this ImmSet, or null if this ImmSet is empty.
Returns the first value from this ImmVector, or null if this ImmVector is empty.
Returns the first value from this Map, or null if this Map is empty.
Returns the first value from this Set, or null if this Set is empty.
Returns the first value from this Vector, or null if this Vector is empty.
Returns the first value in the current `Pair`.
Returns the general category value for the code point.
Returns the height of the given image resource.
Returns the hostname of the server the query was sent too.
Returns the image types supported by the current PHP installation.
Returns the index of the color in the palette of the image which is "closest" to the specified RGB value and alpha level.
Returns the index of the color in the palette of the image which is "closest" to the specified RGB value.
Returns the index of the color of the pixel at the specified location in the image specified by image.
Returns the index of the first element that matches the search value.
Returns the index of the specified color in the palette of the image.
Returns the inverse hyperbolic cosine of arg, i.e. the value whose hyperbolic cosine is arg.
Returns the inverse hyperbolic sine of arg, i.e. the value whose hyperbolic sine is arg.
Returns the inverse hyperbolic tangent of arg, i.e. the value whose hyperbolic tangent is arg.
Returns the last key from this ImmMap, or null if this ImmMap is empty.
Returns the last key from this ImmSet, or null if this ImmSet is empty.
Returns the last key from this ImmVector, or null if this ImmVector is empty.
Returns the last key from this Map, or null if this Map is empty.
Returns the last key from this Set, or null if this Set is empty.
Returns the last key from this Vector, or null if this Vector is empty.
Returns the last key in the current `Pair`.
Returns the last value from this ImmMap, or null if this ImmMap is empty.
Returns the last value from this ImmSet, or null if this ImmSet is empty.
Returns the last value from this ImmVector, or null if this ImmVector is empty.
Returns the last value from this Map, or null if this Map is empty.
Returns the last value from this Set, or null if this Set is empty.
Returns the last value from this Vector, or null if this Vector is empty.
Returns the last value in the current `Pair`.
Returns the length of the first group of consecutive characters from mask found in subject.
Returns the length of the given string.
Returns the length of the initial segment of str1 which does not contain any of the characters in str2.
Returns the length of the written string, or FALSE on failure.
Returns the local or remote name of a given socket connection.
Returns the login name of the user owning the current process.
Returns the matched part of a multibyte regular expression.
Returns the maximum amount of memory the script used until now.
Returns the message sequence number for the given uid.
Returns the name of the column specified by the column_number.
Returns the name of the file which is used to save profile information to.
Returns the name of the file which is used to trace the output of this script too.
Returns the name of the timezone.
Returns the names and values of all the constants currently defined.
Returns the nesting level of the output buffering mechanism.
Returns the node having the specified key or null if the tree doesn't contain a node with the specified key.
Returns the number of colors in an image palette.
Returns the number of columns in the result set.
Returns the number of days after March 21 on which Easter falls for a given year.
Returns the number of elements in this ImmSet.
Returns the number of elements in this VectorLike.
Returns the number of entries stored in the result of previous search operations.
Returns the number of errors generated during execution of the previous SQL statement.
Returns the number of key/value pairs in the ImmMap.
Returns the number of key/value pairs in the Map.
Returns the number of key/value pairs in the MapLike.
Returns the number of parameters within the prepared statement.
Returns the number of rows in the current row block.
Returns the number of successfully executed queries.
Returns the number of the signal that caused the child process to terminate.
Returns the number of the signal which caused the child to stop.
Returns the number of values in the ImmSet.
Returns the number of values in the ImmVector.
Returns the number of values in the Set.
Returns the number of values in the Vector.
Returns the numeric position of the first occurrence of needle in the haystack string.
Returns the numeric position of the last occurrence of needle in the haystack string.
Returns the numeric result code of the most recent failed SQLite request.
Returns the path of the directory PHP stores temporary files in by default.
Returns the peak of memory, in bytes, that's been allocated to your PHP script since calling memory_start_usage_interval.
Returns the peak of memory, in bytes, that's been allocated to your PHP script.
Returns the pixel height of a character in the specified font.
Returns the pixel width of a character in font.
Returns the portion of string specified by the start and length parameters.
Returns the position of the file pointer referenced by handle.
Returns the process group identifier of the process pid or FALSE on failure.
Returns the required initialisation vector length for the cipher determined by the mode parameter.
Returns the result AND the converted key for further uses.
Returns the results that were fetched by the successful query statements.
Returns the return code of a terminated child.
Returns the row ID of the most recent INSERT into the database.
Returns the socket and port used.
Returns the specified substring.
Returns the square root of arg.
Returns the stack depth level.
Returns the standardized error number returned by the last LDAP command.
Returns the string error message explaining the error generated by the last LDAP command for the given link_identifier.
Returns the string error message explaining the error number errno.
Returns the system type identifier of the remote FTP server.
Returns the time that the current xbox thread has been running without a reset, in seconds, and throws for non-xbox threads.
Returns the time that the http server has been running.
Returns the timezone offset.
Returns the total memory, in bytes, that your PHP script has allocated.
Returns the type of the PHP variable var.
Returns the type of the column identified by column_number.
Returns the type of the given file.
Returns the underlying `AsyncMysqlErrorResult` associated with the current exception.
Returns the unix timestamp representing the date.
Returns the value at an index of an array.
Returns the value at the specified key in the current `Pair`.
Returns the value at the specified key.
Returns the value of the configuration option on success.
Returns the width of string str.
Returns the width of the given image resource.
Returns this pointer bound to closure.
Returns timestamps of different request events.
Returns true if the ImmMap is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the ImmSet is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the ImmVector is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the Map is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the MapLike is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the Set is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the Vector is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the VectorLike is empty, false otherwise.
Returns true if the iterator points to a valid value, returns false otherwise.
Returns true if the specified key is present in the ImmMap, false otherwise.
Returns true if the specified key is present in the ImmVector, returns false otherwise.
Returns true if the specified key is present in the Map, false otherwise.
Returns true if the specified key is present in the Vector, returns false otherwise.
Returns true if the specified value is present in the ImmSet, returns false otherwise.
Returns true if the specified value is present in the Set, returns false otherwise.
Returns true if this constraint is satisfied in the current solution.
Returns true iff the given message is a stream.
Returns values from the 'items' parameter when they become actionable.
Returns whether a given option is recognized at all.
Returns whether code coverage has been started.
Returns whether or not the current connection is reusable.
Returns whether or not the current connection reused the SSL session from another SSL connection.
Returns whether or not the current connection was established as SSL based on client flag exchanged during handshake.
Returns whether or not the value is defined as a constant.
Returns whether the state of interval tracking was changed.
Returns whether the type of failure that produced the exception was a general connection or query failure.
Returns whether the type of failure that produced the exception was a timeout.
Returns whether there is a remote debugger attached to the current request.
Returns whether there were any rows are returned in the current row block.
Returns whether this ReflectionClass represents an enum.
Returns zero if there was no previous query on the connection or if the query did not update an AUTO_INCREMENT value.
Reverse prior op
Reverse sorter
Reverse the elements of this Vector in place.
Reverses the values of the Vector in place.
Revert all changes done to an entry with the given name.
Revert all global changes done in the archive.
Rewind all attached Iterator instances.
Rewind the Iterator to the first element.
Rewind the internal array pointer.
Rewrites the text for comparison
Right now Ctor's cannot be made protected when defined in a ctor.
Right now this is just an estimate since one test can have a bunch of different data sets sent to it via a data provider, making one test really into n tests.
RocksDB team forked this file from phabricator's /src/lint/linter/ArcanistCpplintLinter.php, and customized it for its own use.
Rotate left.
Rotate right.
Rotates the image image using the given angle in degrees.
Row numbers start at 0.
Run all the frameworks, except the ones we listed.
Run an individual test case.
Run either for 1 second or for the number of iterations specified by minIterations, depending on the config flag doDeterministic.
Run from a command line or something, and redirect output to an html file.
Run operation a few times before starting timer
Run selected tests.
Run tests in sandcastle
Run the actual command
Run the setup, the actual benchmark, and the tear down in three separate steps to allow the framework to yield between any of the steps.
Run the test
Run the test suite
Run time error would result since we will pass a string, not an int
Run with --help for help.
Run with native PS.
Running JavaScript in the database takes a write lock, meaning it blocks other operations.
Runs a destructor
Runs a single benchmark for at least a second and computes the average time it takes to run a single iteration.
Runs all registered benchmark suites and optionally yields between each individual benchmark to avoid running for too long in the context of browsers.
Runs this task, if it is ready to be run, and returns the next task to run.
SECOND CAPTURE
SEEK_CUR - Set position to current location plus offset.
SEEK_END - Set position to end-of-file plus offset.
SET URL AND OTHER OPTIONS
SIGINT handler that sends a dbgp break command.
SITE commands are not standardized, and vary from server to server.
SOA  mname: FQDN of the machine from which the resource records originated.
SOAP_PERSISTENCE_REQUEST - persist the object for the duration of a request.
SOAP_PERSISTENCE_SESSION - persist the object for the duration of a session.
SOCK_RAW Provides raw network protocol access.
SOCK_RDM Provides a reliable datagram layer that does not guarantee ordering.
SOME ITERATIONS
SORT_NUMERIC - compare items numerically
SORT_NUMERIC - compare items numerically 4.
SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally
SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally 3.
SORT_REGULAR is a global constant
SORT_STRING - compare items as strings
SQLITE3_BLOB: The value is a blob of data, stored exactly as it was input.
SQLITE3_FLOAT: The value is a floating point value, stored as an 8-byte IEEE floating point number.
SQLITE3_INTEGER: The value is a signed integer, stored in 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, or 8 bytes depending on the magnitude of the value.
SQLITE3_NULL: The value is a NULL value.
SQLITE3_OPEN_CREATE: Create the database if it does not exist.
SQLITE3_OPEN_READONLY: Open the database for reading only.
SQLITE3_OPEN_READWRITE: Open the database for reading and writing.
STDERR, which we just closed - shouldn't be rendered
STDOUT, which we just closed - shouldn't be rendered
STREAM_PEEK Retrieve data from the socket, but do not consume the buffer.
Safe for reading binary data.
Safe mode limitations are not taken into account.
Same again but disable grouping character
Same again but suppress currency symbol
Same again but use a '0' for padding character
Same as Part 1 but: The return statment transports a copy of the value to return.
Same case with a scalar initializer
Same expression id as above
Same expression id as outside the switch
Same name as private in base class, different value
Same tests as above but stdclass is internal - so all results should be false.
Same varient  values are used as string to be repeated as well as multiplier
Sandcastle machines don't have arc setup.
Sanitize a string to make sure it's legal UTF-8 by stripping off any characters that are not properly encoded.
Sanity check to ensure that pcre extension needed by this script is available.
Save ini data to file
Save the image
Save the image as 'simpletext.jpg'
Save the image as 'simpletext.png'
Save the interfaced image
Scala has also this feature, see point 2 in http://codemonkeyism.com/top-5-things-to-know-about-constructors-in-scala/ See also section 5.3 of the scala reference manual.
Scalar Argument
Scalar argument
Scalar types tests from HHJsonDecodeTest.php
Scalar value as filename
Scalar values are integer, float, string or boolean values.
Scalar variables are those containing an integer, float, string or boolean.
Scans the data from the given file pointer and extract each embedded uuencoded file into a temporary file.
Schedules a reset of the current xbox thread, when the next request comes in.
Scheduling is done by maintaining a list of task control blocks which holds tasks and the data queue they are processing.
Scientific type variations
Scores are not comparable across versions.
Search for email message on the mail server using imap.
Search for opcode handlers those are used by other opcode handlers
Search for the targets directories for the given files.
Search under current dir
Searches haystack for needle.
Searches subject for a match to the regular expression given in pattern.
Second character position is 1, and so on.
Second character position is 1.
Second object in array
Second time through, it is in fact a call to extract, so we better handle merging the new information into the ActRec properly.
Second, this means that any precision beyond milliseconds will be lost when the document is sent to/from the database.
See D1663326
See Exceptions for more information about Exceptions in PHP.
See IANA's Operating System Names for the meaning of these values.
See List of Supported Protocols/Wrappers for more information about wrappers and their wrapper data.
See List of Supported Protocols/Wrappers for more information about wrappers.
See List of Supported Socket Transports for a list of builtin transports.
See Phar file format documentation for more information.
See SplFileObject constants for the available flags.
See above about fixing this.
See also Exceptions.
See also __CLASS__ object object  The current object.
See also __FILE__.
See also __FUNCTION__.
See also __LINE__.
See also an external in-depth tutorial titled Writing an OAuth Provider Service, which takes a hands-on approach to providing this service.
See also the official MySQL Refresh documentation.
See comments inline for explanation.
See context: https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/3653
See converting from strings.
See enum class ThreadType.
See git log 63e752f4f0bd141d4e401e7056b4850e7b9a4406 and git log faec990edc3e3e8f3b491070b0e8cd90e9df7a4d for the addition of the new ext_reflection-classes.php class.
See hphp/hhvm/fbmake_test_ext_wrapper.php.
See http://userguide.icu-project.org/strings/regexp
See https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/6624.
See https://github.com/leafo/lessphp/pull/549
See if framework is already installed.
See if we are using an internal development build
See if we can actually load it.
See include_path for more information.
See next 2 tests.
See php.ini options for the transition option of quieting this exception.
See table below.
See test/typecheck/array_heterogeneous.php
See the "See also" section for available methods.
See the ArrayObject::setFlags method for a list of the available flags.
See the FilesystemIterator constants.
See the GNU General Public License for more details.
See the List of Supported Protocols/Wrappers for links to information about what abilities the various wrappers have, notes on their usage, and information on any predefined variables they may provide.
See the Supported Protocols and Wrappers for links to information about what abilities the various wrappers have, notes on their usage, and information on any predefined variables they may provide.
See the example below for a better understanding.
See the example below for which statements provide information, and what the returned value may look like.
See the example below.
See the examples below on how to set those options.
See the examples below.
See the help for the syntax on how to run the tests in each available mode.
See the notes under the installation section for more information.
See the query section of this manual for information on distributing reads to secondaries.
See utf8ize.php
See where internal pointer is after adding more elements
Seeds the random number generator with seed or with a random value if no seed is given.
Seek and write a random byte
Seek to specific position in destination.
Seems that not all MySQL 6.0 installations use defaults that ignore the display widths.
Seems to work
Segfault when using the DB class which extends mysqli
Segmentation fault
Select a previously unused mark value.
Send Email to QA Team
Send an SQL query to MySQL without fetching and buffering the result rows.
Send off builds to jenkins
Send response back to the client
Send subsequent passes to C2::__call
Send the signal sig to the process with the process identifier pid.
Send to pagelet multiple times to ensure the previously set locale does not linger into the next request.
Sends a SITE EXEC command request to the FTP server.
Sends a command to the xdebug server.
Sends a response to the client of the current request indicating an error.
Sends an ALLO command to the remote FTP server to allocate space for a file to be uploaded.
Sends an arbitrary command to the FTP server.
Sends an email.
Sends an xbox message and waits for response.
Sends email.
Sends the specified data through the socket.
Separate port.
Sequence counter pattern...
Serializable
Serialize the handles and let them go.
Serialize this object to a string that can be used as a dictionary key to differentiate instances of this class.
Server might not support column type - skip it
Server might not support it - skip
Server needs some think-time sometimes
Server should be within five seconds of client
Session data should not be written.
Session system variables are reset to the values of the corresponding global system variables.
SessionHandler a special class that can be used to expose the current internal PHP session save handler by inheritance.
Set Framework information for install.
Set HTTP output encoding to ASCII
Set HTTP output encoding to EUC-JP
Set HTTP output encoding to JIS
Set HTTP output encoding to SJIS
Set HTTP output encoding to UTF8
Set a callback function that is called when php tries to exit.
Set a callback function to be called whenever a function is entered or exited.
Set a date according to the ISO 8601  standard - using weeks and day offsets rather than specific dates.
Set a handler to be called when a namespace is declared.
Set a handler to be called when leaving the scope of a namespace declaration.
Set a new pattern.
Set a new symbol value.
Set always chooses capacities that are 3 times a power of two, so it will grow to a capacity of 48.
Set and test
Set behavior flags.
Set collation attribute.
Set collation strength.
Set detection order by array
Set detection order by enumerated list
Set do not support iteration while elements are being added or removed.
Set formatter attribute.
Set formatting symbol.
Set given collation strength, then get it back and check if it's the same.
Set hex format
Set internal_encoding to empty and try again
Set invalid encoding.
Set is an ordered set-style collection.
Set it to our own class
Set new attribute value.
Set new attribute's value and see if it works out.
Set new classname
Set new flags
Set order by array
Set order by string
Set order to "auto"
Set pattern used by the formatter  Valid only if the formatter is using pattern and is not rule-based.
Set security preferences.
Set the alpha blending flag to use the bundled libgd layering effects.
Set the argument list to call the subject with.
Set the background to be red
Set the background to be white
Set the backgrund to be blue
Set the brush
Set the current active configuration setting of magic_quotes_runtime.
Set the default time zone
Set the effective group ID of the current process.
Set the flag so that the array keys can be used as properties
Set the iterator classname to the newly
Set the iterator position to index beyond the last character
Set the line thickness to 5
Set the list of arguments to be passed to the constructor
Set the list of function arguments to be one less that the number of mandatory arguments
Set the maximum allowed depth.
Set the names of the class constructor arguments.
Set the names of the mandatory and optional arguments to the method
Set the number of seconds a script is allowed to run.
Set the real group ID of the current process.
Set the real user ID of the current process.
Set the streams context for the next libxml document load or write
Set the token and secret for subsequent requests.
Set the type of the value.
Set the type of variable var to type.
Set the value of the global
Set this parameter to 0 when using UNIX domain sockets.
Set timezone
Set to '0' to loop continuously.
Set to -1 in the event of a timeout.
Set type of the data to "array" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to array type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "bool"/"boolean" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to bool/boolean type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "float"/"double" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to float/double type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "int"/"integer" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to interger/int type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "null" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable  set the type of the variable to "null type" dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "object" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to object type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "resource" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to resource type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set type of the data to "string" and verify using gettype Following are performed in the listed sequence: get the current type of the variable set the type of the variable to string type dump the variable to see its new data get the new type of the variable
Set up file
Set where the OAuth parameters should be passed.
Set/Get the HTTP output character encoding.
Set/Get the current language.
SetM and CGetM with an object base on the stack
SetM with array base on the stack
SetOpProp: use __get
SetOpProp: use __set and __get
SetProp for visible, accessible properties
Sets a busy handler that will sleep until the database is not locked or the timeout is reached.
Sets a hard breakpoint.
Sets a parameter.
Sets an attribute on the database handle.
Sets an attribute on the statement.
Sets an attribute with name name to the given value.
Sets an attribute with namespace namespaceURI and name name to the given value.
Sets an option in an XML parser.
Sets blocking or non-blocking mode on a stream.
Sets do not have "copy-on-write" semantics.
Sets do not support taking elements by reference.
Sets if the current connection can be recycled without any clean up.
Sets locale information.
Sets of removed fields must be compatible
Sets only support integer values and string values.
Sets or fetches the imap timeout.
Sets preserve insertion order of the elements.
Sets retval to the value of the specified option.
Sets the Gregorian Calendar change date.
Sets the OAuth timestamp for subsequent requests.
Sets the OAuth version for subsequent requests
Sets the RSA certificate.
Sets the Request Engine, that will be sending the HTTP requests.
Sets the automatic character encoding detection order to encoding_list.
Sets the buffering for write operations on the given stream to buffer bytes.
Sets the calendar used to the appropriate calendar, which must be  one of the constants defined above.
Sets the character data handler function for the XML parser parser.
Sets the connection limit of all connection pools using this client.
Sets the default handler function for the XML parser parser.
Sets the element handler functions for the XML parser.
Sets the external entity reference handler function for the XML parser parser.
Sets the file position indicator for handle to the beginning of the file stream.
Sets the file position indicator for the file referenced by handle.
Sets the file to output profiling information when processing a stylesheet.
Sets the include_path configuration option for the duration of the script.
Sets the input byte array whose encoding is to be guessed.
Sets the max number of connections new pools will be able to create.
Sets the name of a field, eg "era" in English for ERA.
Sets the nonce for all subsequent requests.
Sets the permissions on the specified remote file to mode.
Sets the request tokens path.
Sets the string which will be used to indent each element/attribute of the resulting xml.
Sets the timeout value on stream, expressed in the sum of seconds and microseconds.
Sets the transparent color in the given image.
Sets the value of one or more parameters to be used in subsequent transformations with XSLTProcessor.
Sets the value of the given configuration option.
Sets the value of the specified option to be newval.
Sets up data in order to skip or not the warmup phase.
Sets whether a client disconnect should cause a script to be aborted.
Setting a non-static key in nested shape-like array downgrades it to a map-like array.
Setting a non-static key in nested tuple-like array downgrades it to a vec-like array.
Setting a non-static key in shape-like array downgrades it to a map-like array.
Setting a non-static key in tuple-like array downgrades it to a vec-like array.
Setting an out-of range key in tuple-like array downgrades it to a vec-like array.
Setting certain environment variables may be a potential security breach.
Setting fields in a shape-like array with both string and class constants downgrades it to a map-like array.
Setting fields in a shape-like array with class constants from different classes downgrades it to a map-like array.
Setting new_cache_expire is of value only, if session.cache_limiter is set to a value different from nocache.
Setting this parameter to -1 disables automatic retry.
Setting this parameter to FALSE and retry_interval to -1 allows a failed server to be kept in the pool so as not to affect the key distribution algorithm.
Setting this to 0 means no limit.
Setting this to true will force YAMLDump to enclose any string value in quotes.
Setting this to true will force YAMLLoad to use syck_load function when possible.
Setting this value to a value less than or equal to zero, will turn off an already set timeout handler.
Setup internal transliterator object
Setup socket server
Several of the above functions can affect the variable environment of the their caller.
Several servers, especially on Win32, will still buffer the output from your script until it terminates before transmitting the results to the browser.
Shape field types in dynamically set nested positions are not overwritten, but grow.
Shape unification
Shape with unknown fields cannot be a subtype of a shape with known fields
Shape-like array inference algorithm is best-effort, and it's fairly easy to confuse it to give up and treat array as map-like, even when it was not the developer intention.
Shape-like arrays are subtypes of all the special interfaces that arrays are too.
Shape-like arrays preserve element types - usage that should report errors.
Shape-like arrays preserve element types - usage with no errors.
Shape-like arrays preserve element types when used with class constants - usage that should report errors.
Shape-like arrays preserve element types when used with class constants - usage with no errors.
Shape-like arrays remember key types
Shift a negative value right and left
Shift a negative value right and left using both in- and out-of-range counts
Shift a positive value right and left
Shift a positive value right and left using both in- and out-of-range counts
Shift all kinds of scalar values to see which are ints or can be implicirly converted
Shift_JIS SJIS, 932 Japanese EUC-JP EUCJP Japanese Any other character sets are not recognized and ISO-8859-1 will be used instead.
Short-style arguments
Shortcut for root-level values.
Should Issue Needs Rehash, Since Foo is cast to 0...
Should also include inherited properties from B.
Should be 2.x seconds
Should be fine
Should be ok.
Should be optimized.
Should be the end
Should be unresolved of those two afterwards.
Should catch these undefined methods here, but task 333319 is blocking their being caught.
Should cause a Server warning but no error
Should check this in nonstrict mode
Should dispatch to A::whoami2 but maintain the current "static" class.
Should fail
Should fail because bool constants not allowed
Should fail because it doesn't match
Should fail because the TLSv1.1 hello method is not supported
Should fail because the TLSv1.2 hello method is not supported
Should fail because the bool const is bogus
Should fail for mixing class const and string literal
Should fail for mixing int and string class consts
Should fail for using a non int/string key
Should fail.
Should find both
Should finish without errors
Should match
Should not be affected
Should not be found
Should not find
Should not match
Should only be needed when request parameters are being manipulated, such as in unit tests.
Should only have 'foo'
Should produce warning
Should reject this because it uses two classes
Should return error message when passed character count.
Should see the values printed after Done is printed.
Should still be able to recover and respond to a request over the port on a new TCP connection.
Should succeed because the SSLv23 handshake here is compatible with the TLSv1 hello method employed in the server
Should succeed because we use the same TLSv1 hello
Should succeed with CA file specified in context
Should succeed with peer verification disabled in context
Should throw a warning as extract expects NO arguments
Should throw a warning as seek expects only 1 argument
Should throw a warning as setExtractFlags expects only 1 argument
Should throw a warning as setPrefixPart expects 2 arguments
Should throw a warning as setPrefixPart expects argument 1 to be long integer
Should throw a warning as setPrefixPart expects argument 2 to be a string
Should work.
Shouldn't be displayed
Shouldn't be optimized, don't support the first arg being a string yet.
Shouldn't be optimized, types don't match.
Shouldn't have void as an argument type
Show file or result block
Show that after the first run we're returning the cached result
Show that we are using custom credentials
Show the error.
Show us all of file2.
Shows 42 correctly.
Shuffles the values of the Vector randomly in place.
Signifies we have provide a session handler
Silence the Naming phase errors so we see the unification error
Similar to nested_vm_exceptions, except throw intercepted functions into it also.
Similar to reading entries, attributes are also read one by one from a particular entry.
Similarly, it is often necessary to make a series of changes and to ensure that they all are possible before making any changes on disk, similar to the relational database concept of transactions.
Simple User definition
Simple callback function
Simple class method callback
Simple class with more than one member variables
Simple class with more than one property
Simple class with single member variable
Simple class with single property
Simple float array
Simple framework for running the benchmark suites and computing a score based on the timing measurements.
Simple language subtag
Simple resources can be of the following typos: string, integer, binary data field or integer array.
Simple string
Simple strings
Simple syntax
SimpleFunctionCall
Simply list all characters that you want to be stripped.
Since I get all the tests of a framework by foreaching over the frameworks vector, and then append those tests to a tests vector and then foreach the test vector to bucketize them, this will allow us to basically run the framework tests alphabetically.
Since PHP 5.1.0 you don't need to do this because PHP will do it for you.
Since PHP 5.4 only.
Since PHP does not provide raw POST/COOKIE data, it can only be used for GET data for now.
Since T cannot be overridden by sub-classes, we can pass in an int
Since minor version can change frequently, just test the major version
Since parameter type check is performed before detecting invocation of non-static method from a static context, the error message differs.
Since that must happen only once the return value should be equal.
Since this is a failed result wrapper, this always returns `false`.
Since this is a failed result wrapper, this always returns `true`.
Since this is a failed result wrapper, this always returns the exception thrown during the `Awaitable` operation.
Since this is a successful result wrapper, this always returns `false`.
Since this is a successful result wrapper, this always returns `true`.
Since this is a successful result wrapper, this always returns an `InvariantException` saying that there was no exception thrown from the `Awaitable` operation.
Since this is a successful result wrapper, this always returns the actual result of the `Awaitable` operation.
Since we know the exact type in this case, we use the assigned type.
Since we read in the environment variable on request init and we are changing default values only, we have to start a new process to test this
Since xdebug writes profiling results on request shutdown, we have to manually run a php process to test profiling output results
Single Argument
Single args
Single char
Single option
Single quoted strings
Skip duplicate commutative handlers
Skip empty servers
Skip issues not part of the linted file.
Skip useless constant handlers
Sleep 0.1s  to ensure the KILL gets recognized
Sleep 0.1s - the asynchronous query should have been processed after the wait period
Sleep for a while
Slow enough that incorrect stepping will time out.
Small utilities for wrapping tests to put output into fbmake.
So avoiding that if we test with PHP 5.x
So check for both and do the right thing
So found and used a sorted iterator class and sorted by the full path including file name.
So if you have a word that is larger than the given width, it is broken apart.
So in this case we want to write PNG but file should come out as JPEG
So it is easier to keep tabs on our progress when running ps or something.
So it is equivalent to reading an entry from the directory.
So should trailing whitespace
So the first element is 1, the second 2, etc.
So the first element is 1, the second 2.
So the performance impact on a `Pair` will be not be noticeable in the real world.
So this destructor should not run.
So we bail the run.
So, if that is the case, use this script to mark any files as binary that are not ASCII.
So...save the current position.
Some Invalid Tags:
Some arguments are literals.
Some cases, the server can deny the session that was set and the handshake will create a new one, in those cases this function will return `false`.
Some control flow within a catch block.
Some countries did not accept it until much later.
Some directory server hosts will be configured to return no more than a preset number of entries.
Some drivers have driver specific options that may be set at prepare-time.
Some drivers support the invocation of stored procedures that return data as output parameters, and some also as input/output parameters that both send in data and are updated to receive it.
Some encoding
Some engines and/or MySQL server versions might not support the data type
Some examples:
Some languages have more than one form for plural messages dependent on the count.
Some more typical cases
Some nice class.
Some objects
Some of the parameters actually passed to charset will request to use a default charset determined by the platform.
Some of them map to two unicode code points, not one.
Some operating systems support more than one type of hash.
Some parts have been translated directly, whereas others have been modified more aggresively to make it feel more like a JavaScript program.
Some possible uses for meta-data include passing a user/group that should be set when a file is extracted from the phar to disk.
Some versions of Microsoft Internet Explorer will only start to display the page after they have received 256 bytes of output, so you may need to send extra whitespace before flushing to get those browsers to display the page.
Some wrong parameters, no HTTP_USER_AGENT set
Sometime differential does not like some of the files that are included.
Sometimes not needed.
Sometimes the message is the same, depending on if there was an explicit normalized string provided by the MySQL client.
Sometimes when PHPUnit is done printing its post test info, hhvm fatals.
Somewhere in the middle
Sooner or later they will be moved to c-code.
Sort a non-ASCII array using ru_RU locale.
Sort an array in SORT_REGULAR mode using en_US locale.
Sort an array in SORT_STRING mode using en_US locale.
Sort an array using Lithuanian locale.
Sort and print the resulting array
Sort array maintaining index association.
Sort array using specified collator.
Sort array values
Sort array.
Sort arrays in the given list using specified locale.
Sort arrays using various locales.
Sort associative arrays using various locales.
Sort given array and the first copy of it.
Sort in en_US locale with SORT_STRING flag
Sort interfaces so that tests do not fail because of wrong order.
Sort the array and the first copy.
Sort the entries by key using user defined function.
Sort the entries by key.
Sort the entries by values using "natural order" algorithm.
Sort the entries by values using case insensitive "natural order" algorithm.
Sort the entries by values using user defined function.
Sort the entries by values.
Sort various arrays in specified locale.
Sorts an array by key in reverse order, maintaining key to data correlations.
Sorts an array by key, maintaining key to data correlations.
Soundex keys have the property that words pronounced similarly produce the same soundex key, and can thus be used to simplify searches in databases where you know the pronunciation but not the spelling.
Source Code: ext/standard/array.c
Source code : ext/session/session.c
Source code: Zend/zend_builtin_functions.c
Source code: Zend/zend_builtin_functions.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/curl/interface.c
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions: DateTime::setDate
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions: DateTime::setISODate
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions: DateTime::setTime
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions: date_date_set
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions: date_isodate_set
Source code: ext/date/php_date.c Alias to functions: date_time_set
Source code: ext/fileinfo/fileinfo.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/imap/php_imap.c
Source code: ext/imap/php_imap.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/mbstring/php_mbregex.c
Source code: ext/pcre/php_pcre.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/posix/posix.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/posix/posix.c Alias to functions: posix_errno
Source code: ext/spl/spl_array.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/array.c
Source code: ext/standard/array.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/basic_functions.c
Source code: ext/standard/browscap.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/data/php_date.c
Source code: ext/standard/dns.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/exec.c
Source code: ext/standard/exec.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/formatted_print.c
Source code: ext/standard/http.c
Source code: ext/standard/image.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/mail.c
Source code: ext/standard/math.c
Source code: ext/standard/pageinfo.c Alias to functions:
Source code: ext/standard/rand.c
Source code: ext/standard/string.c
Source code: ext/standard/string.c Alias to functions: none
Source code: ext/standard/uniqid.c
Source code: ext/xml/xml.c Alias to functions:
Source:        ext/curl/interface.c Documentation: http://wiki.php.net/qa/temp/ext/curl
Special case for ints
Special case varargs
Special characters can be encoded in several ways.
Special chars
Special chars white space chars
Special handling of a few types.
Special values for locales can be passed in - if null is passed for the locale, the default locale collation rules will be used.
Specialcasing of equality for hack collections.
Specialcasing of inequality for hack collections.
Specializing
Specifically, fatals vs.
Specifically, we want to ensure that an exception handler executing at the same stack depth in one continuation isn't seen as flow control for a step operation in a different continuation at that depth.
Specifies a substitution character when input character encoding is invalid or character code does not exist in output character encoding.
Specify a map containing autoload data.
Specify encoding_list character encoding by comma separated list
Specify the set of checks that will be performed by the check function.
Specify with a combination of following options.
Specifying the socket parameter will not explicitly determine the type of connection to be used when connecting to the MySQL server.
SplMaxHeap emtpy
SplMaxHeap non-emtpy
SplMinHeap emtpy
SplMinHeap non-emtpy
SplPriorityQueue empty
SplPriorityQueue non-empty
Splat unpacked and repacked
Splat unpacking and repacking with new args
Splay on the key to move the last node on the search path for the key to the root of the tree.
Splay on the key to move the node with the given key or the last node on the search path to the top of the tree.
Splay to make sure that the new root has an empty right child.
Splice this Vector in place.
Ssnv test 16-bit shorts
Staring from 0.
Start a child element
Start a user buffer
Start actual test
Start at the base of the array and move through it.
Start from self and work down tree.
Start out running the setup.
Start the FILE section of the test
Start the listening socket.
Start the test
Start the timer.
Start tracing function calls from this point to the file in the trace_file parameter.
Start with a default map of values for the pattern to make the parsing for the math simpler.
Starting from PHP 5, the input encoding is automatically detected, so that the encoding parameter specifies only the output encoding.
Starts a CDATA.
Starts a DTD attribute list.
Starts a DTD element.
Starts a DTD entity.
Starts a DTD.
Starts a client.
Starts a comment.
Starts a document.
Starts a local xbox task.
Starts a namespaced attribute.
Starts a namespaced element.
Starts a processing instruction tag.
Starts an artificial frame.
Starts an attribute.
Starts an element.
Starts per-interval usage tracking to allow peak usage to be tracked with more granularity than a per-script basis.
Starts sampling based xhprof profiling.
Starts xhprof network I/O profiling.
Starts xhprof profiling.
Statements that are not listed will return FALSE.
Static Methods
Static Properties
Static and instance array using class constants
Static and instance array using class constants with parent
Static and instance array using class constants with self
Static class members will not be shown.
Static functions shouldn't care about the parent class
Static methods
Static strings
StaticMember
Stay constraints do nothing
Stay optimization
Stemmed from https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/2082
Stemmed from https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/4505
Stemmed from https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/5025
Stems from https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/4892
Step 1: Find the two points with the min and max x positions.
Step 2: Use the line between the two points to divide the remaining points into two sets, one for each side of the line.
Step 3: Find the point that is farthest from the dividing line.
Step 4: Filter out all points inside the triangle formed by the new point.
Step 5: Using the two new lines, recursively create triangles to filter points until there are no more left.
Stepping into/over/out of throws, catches, stepping over calls that have throw/catch within, etc.
Stick this in a trait, so we get different copies for different data.
Stick to basics
Stop the timer.
Stop tracing function calls and closes the trace file.
Stops per-interval usage tracking to allow peak usage to be tracked with more granularity than a per-script basis.
Store parameters
Stores a value into the Map with the specified key, overwriting any previous value that was associated with the key.
Stores a value into the Vector with the specified key, overwriting the previous value associated with the key.
Stores each value produced by the specified KeyedIterable into the Map using its corresponding key, overwriting any previous value that was associated with that key.
Streams data from the source file pointer, apply encoding and write to the destination file pointer.
Strength constants.
Strengths are used to measure the relative importance of constraints.
Strengths cannot be created outside this class, so pointer comparison can be used for value comparison.
Strict SQL mode - 1366, Incorrect integer value: 'true' for column 'label' at row 1
Strictly speaking we should test more: character_set_client, character_set_results, and character_set_connection
String URLs will create a default cURL GET handle.
String argument
String array with default keys
String assert
String is static
String keys
String to parse
String type variations
String with control chars
String with curly braces, complex syntax
String with embedded NULL
String with escape characters
String with international characters
String with null character
String with quotes
String with special chars
String, Array and Object are accepted.
Strings and integers are stored as is, other types are stored serialized.
Strings, integers and binary data strings are returned as corresponding PHP types, integer array is returned as PHP array.
Strip out comments
Strip spaces, then look for the : separator
Structural subtyping of ad-hoc shapes
Structural subtyping of ad-hoc shapes in presence of optional fields
Structural subtyping of declared shapes
Structural subtyping of declared shapes in presence of optional fields
Subclasses may provide richer functionality.
Subscribe to a new mailbox.
Subsecond accuracy is supported.
Suites of benchmarks consist of a name and the set of benchmarks in addition to the reference timing that the final score will be based on.
Summarize results
Superglobals are JIT, phpdbg will not over-write whatever you set during bootstrap
Support for ZEND_USER_OPCODE
Support mashed together short flags.
Supported calendar values are CAL_GREGORIAN, CAL_JULIAN, CAL_JEWISH and CAL_FRENCH.
Supported calendars are CAL_GREGORIAN, CAL_JULIAN, CAL_JEWISH and CAL_FRENCH.
Supported charsets Charset Aliases Description ISO-8859-1 ISO8859-1 Western European, Latin-1 ISO-8859-15 ISO8859-15 Western European, Latin-9.
Supported target encodings are ISO-8859-1, US-ASCII and UTF-8.
Supports XPath 1.0
Supports non-negative indexes only.
Suppress constant with constant comparison warnings on windows
Suppress free_op1 warnings on Windows
Suppress recording of internal error recording to save memory.
Suppress warning messages.
Suppress warnings
Surprise flags are checked on backward branch.
Surprise flags are checked on function entry.
Suspend the currently executing task and return the next task control block to run.
Suspends execution of the current process until a child as specified by the pid argument has exited, or until a signal is delivered whose action is to terminate the current process or to call a signal handling function.
Suspicious "behavior" PHP5 32, allowed quietly, but does not change the original argument PHP5 64  allowed with warning "PHP Strict standards:  Only variables should be passed by reference", but does not change the original argument HHVM, allowed quietly, but does not change the original argument
Swap unix:// to file:// for parse_url usage like pecl does, if found
Switch on implicit flushing.
TCP and UDP are common protocols of this protocol family.
TCP guarantees that all data packets will be received in the order in which they were sent.
TEST: Complex path
TEST: async handle
TEST: basic ref count
TEST: dynamic props
TEST: multiple ref counted arrays
TEST: multiple ref counted nested arrays
TEST: multiple ref counted strings
TEST: nullifying variables removes their tracking
TEST: set with int and string keys
TEST: simple props
TEST: sizes of arrays
TEST: sizes of dynamic props
TEST: tracking works when enabled and not when disabled
THE MALFORMED ARRAY
THEY ARE FOR THE STREAM WRAPPER.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS TEST ISN'T ENTIRELY CORRECT.
TIFF intel byte order
TODO - determine this from SVN branche name
TODO - more report testing should go in here, but it's not really documented what behaviour is expected
TODO - read only PDO::ATTR_CONNECTION_STATUS PDO::ATTR_SERVER_INFO
TODO Areas for future improvement: - Key the cache by endpoint/hhconfig location, so that we correctly support more than one project per HHVM instance.
TODO I think we should bail out here.
TODO I'm using the procedural interface, this should not throw an exception.
TODO Once we have PS open working beef up this test to create a process and kill it for now start at a low pid and find first pid which does not exist.
TODO Unfortunately different server versions give you slightly different results.The test_mysqli_fetch_field_flags_table_1 does not yet fully reflect all server changes/bugs etc.
TODO move this to a expectf if we can
TODO no_index_used - difficult to simulate because server/engine dependent bad_index_used - difficult to simulate because server/engine dependent flushed_normal_sets flushed_ps_sets explicit_close implicit_close disconnect_close in_middle_of_command_close explicit_free_result implicit_free_result explicit_stmt_close implicit_stmt_close
TODO test something that will throw, make sure stack materialization worked.
TODO the results look wrong, why do we get 2014 with buffered AND unbuffered queries
TODO: Add more encoding, strings.....
TODO: Add more encoding.
TODO: Add more encodings
TODO: Do real test EUC-JP
TODO: Fix this to use ZendParamMode when it is available See D1359972 for context
TODO: HHVM doesn't support returning from a finally block, which `gen1` was testing.
TODO: Implement configuraiton file
TODO: Not enough info
TODO: Refactor Node so that it doesn't store the weight internally.
TODO: This is not a real test....
TODO: Workaround for large parameter list pending ActRec aPI
TODO: add proper codes
TODO: doesn't pass on ICU 3.6 because 'ru' and 'de' locales changed currency and percent formatting.
TODO: doesn't pass on ICU 3.6 because 'ru' and 'uk' locales changed currency formatting.
TODO: figure out better way to signal "specialized and not defined" than an extra lookup
TODO: find exact version
TODO: no way to check ATTR_TIMEOUT settings
TODO: remove this test after fix and enable the BIT test in pdo_mysql_types.phpt again
TODO: safe mode
TODO: should give a warning, but its PDO, let's ignore the missing warning for now
TODO: test more options
TODO: there's ReflectionClass::newInstance
TODO: this will need a hopt to enable throw
TRUE indicates that a field should be returned, FALSE indicates that it should not be returned.
TXT txt: Arbitrary string data associated with this record.
TYPE_DOUBLE is used by default.
TYPICAL FOREACH
Tahiti time
Tailable means cursor is not closed when the last data is retrieved.
Take only mandatory argument names.
Take out strings sequences and mappings
Takes a raw or base64 encoded string and decrypts it using a given method and key.
Takes a source file and outputs HTML source highlighting showing the number of hits on each line, highlights un-executed lines in red
Takes a well-formed XML string and returns it as an object.
Takes an input array and returns a new array with the order of the elements reversed.
Takes an input array and returns a new array without duplicate values.
Takes the filepointer, handle, and truncates the file to length, size.
Tallies a number for server stats.
Target: Append to array
Target: Integer array keys
Target: Non-static properties
Target: Static properties
Tells whether a file exists and is readable.
Tells whether namespaceURI is the default namespace.
Tells whether the filename is executable.
Tells whether the given file is a regular file.
Tells whether the given file is a symbolic link.
Tells whether the given filename is a directory.
Temporarily binds the closure to newthis, and calls it with any given parameters.
Temporary tables should be dropped
Test AKempty promotion affecting an array inside a collection
Test AKempty promotion affecting an array inside a collection with intermediate assignment
Test AKempty promotion if assignment happens inside an expression, not on statement level.
Test AKempty promotion in double-nested collection
Test AKempty promotion in double-nested collection with intermediate assignment
Test AKempty to AKvec upgrade when inside a nested type
Test AKempty to AKvec upgrade when inside typevar and unresolved type
Test Basic Functionality of iconv_substr with ASCII characters and multibyte strings.
Test Basic Functionality of mb_substr with ASCII characters and multibyte strings.
Test Basic functionality of iconv_get_encoding/iconv_set_encoding
Test Basic functionality of mb_regex_encoding
Test Basic functionality of mb_substr_count
Test Bcrypt Cost
Test Bcrypt Invalid Length
Test Error functionality of iconv_get_encoding
Test ImmMap's PHP-accessible public methods.
Test ImmMap's materialization methods.
Test ImmSet's methods.
Test Inheritence
Test Non-Bcrypt
Test Vectors from RFC 2104
Test a case where unset is supposed to define an uninitialized property.
Test a change in flags, there's only one class constant so it has to be another int value
Test acos with a different input values
Test acosh with a different input values
Test adding elements in various configurations
Test all frameworks
Test all kinds of scalar values to see which are ints or can be implicitly converted
Test array-like access.
Test array-like iteration for ImmVector.
Test array_combine with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_count_values with integer arguments
Test array_count_values with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_diff with less than the expected number of arguments
Test array_diff_uassoc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_diff_ukey with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_intersect_uassoc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_intersect_ukey with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_key_exists with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_pad with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_product with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_push when passed: 1.
Test array_rand with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_reduce with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_shift with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_slice when passed  1.
Test array_slice with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_udiff with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_udiff_assoc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_udiff_uassoc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_uintersect with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_uintersect_assoc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_uintersect_uassoc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_unique with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test array_values when: 1.
Test array_values with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test arrays whose size exceeds 65536
Test arsort with more than the expected number of arguments
Test asin with a different input values
Test asinh with a different input values
Test asort with more than the expected number of arguments
Test associative array with strings as keys and elements
Test associative array with strings as keys and integers as elements
Test atan with a different input values
Test atanh with a different input values
Test bad function calls
Test base64_decode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test base64_encode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test base64_encode with single byte values.
Test basename with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test basic PHP functions to check if it works with multi-byte chars
Test basic behaviour with existing class and non-existent class.
Test basic function of gzencode
Test basic functionality
Test basic functionality of array_diff
Test basic functionality of array_diff_assoc
Test basic functionality of array_push with indexed and associative arrays
Test basic functionality of iconv_strpos with ASCII and multibyte characters
Test basic functionality of mb_encode_mimeheader with different strings.
Test basic functionality of mb_ereg
Test basic functionality of mb_ereg_match
Test basic functionality of mb_internal_encoding
Test basic functionality of mb_stripos with ASCII and multibyte characters
Test basic functionality of mb_strpos with ASCII and multibyte characters
Test basic functionality of mb_strripos with ASCII and multibyte characters
Test basic functionality of mb_strtolower
Test basic functionality of mb_strtoupper
Test basic regex parsing functionality.
Test behavior around exceptions leaking out of destructors.
Test behaviour with interfaces.
Test behaviour with parameter variations
Test behaviour with various visibility levels.
Test binding params via emulated prepared query
Test case for inlining from FB's IPAddress class, removed real logic.
Test case pretty much stolen from www
Test casting ImmVector to array.
Test casting a ImmVector to bool.
Test chdir with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test chmod with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test class_exists with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test classes
Test closedir with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test code from: http://www.php.net/manual/en/splobjectstorage.getinfo.php
Test column fetching
Test confilicting AKempty promotions - in one branch it's promoted to AKvec, in another to AKmap.
Test constructing a ImmMap in different ways.
Test cos with a different input values
Test cosh with a different input values
Test count with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test crc32 with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test creating a ImmVector literal.
Test ctype_alnum with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_alpha with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_cntrl with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_digit with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_graph with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_lower with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_print with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_punct with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_space with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_upper with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test ctype_xdigit with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test current with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test date_sunrise with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test date_sunset with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test deg2rad with a different input values
Test deleting non-existent keys
Test destroy
Test destruction order for SetG.
Test destruction order for SetS.
Test dirname with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test each with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test end with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test equality of ImmMaps.
Test equality of ImmVectors.
Test error cases for gzencode
Test failed so we need to report details.
Test fetching into an object
Test file_exists with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test finfo_buffer with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test flow control around exceptions.
Test for handling of incorrect parameters.
Test for memory leaks
Test for single scaler
Test for the datefmt_format  function
Test for the datefmt_get_datetype  function
Test for the datefmt_get_locale  function
Test for the datefmt_get_timetype  function
Test for the datefmt_get_timezone_id  function
Test for the datefmt_localtime  function
Test for the datefmt_parse  function
Test for the datefmt_parse_localtime  function with parse pos
Test for the datefmt_parse_timestamp  function with parse_pos
Test for the datefmt_set_timezone_id  function
Test format and parse with a localtime :array
Test format and parse with a timestamp : long
Test format with input as a localtime :array
Test format with input as a timestamp : integer
Test get_class with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test get_class_methods with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test get_class_vars with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test get_headers with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test get_object_vars with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test get_parent_class with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test getdate with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gethostbyaddr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gethostbynamel with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test getimagesize with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gettimeofday with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gmdate with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gmmktime with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gmstrftime with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gzcompress with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gzdeflate with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gzencode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gzopen with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test gzuncompress with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test how array_diff compares arrays that 1.
Test how array_diff compares integers, floats and strings
Test how array_diff_assoc behaves 1.
Test how array_diff_assoc behaves when comparing  multi-dimensional arrays
Test how array_diff_assoc compares integers, floats and string
Test how array_shift when passed: 1.
Test how character classes match a multibyte string
Test how iconv_strpos behaves when passed an incorrect number of arguments
Test how mb_stripos behaves when passed an incorrect number of arguments
Test how mb_strpos behaves when passed an incorrect number of arguments
Test how mb_strripos behaves when passed an incorrect number of arguments
Test how the internal pointer is affected when two variables are referenced to each other
Test htmlspecialchars_decode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test https:// streams
Test iconv_strlen when passed an unknown encoding
Test iconv_strlen with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test iconv_strpos with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test iconv_strrpos with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test iconv_substr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test if the inner value type of AKvec is correctly inferred
Test if the typechecker understands attribute importation and can detect a type mismatch here
Test if the upgraded type is accepted with no errors by a compatible function
Test image_type_to_mime_type with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test imagecolorallocate with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test imap_close with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test imap_fetch_overview with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test imap_fetchbody with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test imap_fetchheader with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test indexed array with integers as elements
Test indexed array with strings as elements
Test inference handles things which have side effects that could change property types.
Test intercepts where callsites have already been bound to the pre-intercept function.
Test interface_exists with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test invalid arguments
Test ip2long with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test is_a with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test is_subclass_of with invalid last argument
Test is_subclass_of with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test iterating over a ImmVector with a "foreach".
Test krsort with more than the expected number of arguments
Test ksort with more than the expected number of arguments
Test log10 with a different input values
Test long2ip with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test magic methods for ImmVector.
Test magic methods for Pair.
Test mail with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test main function.
Test match for 32-bit code points.
Test mb_decode_mimeheader with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_ereg with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_ereg_match by passing an incorrect number of arguments
Test mb_ereg_match with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_ereg_replace with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_internal_encoding with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_regex_encoding with one more than expected number of arguments
Test mb_split with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_stripos with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_stristr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strlen when passed an unknown encoding
Test mb_strlen with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strpos with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strrchr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strrichr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strripos with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strrpos with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strstr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strtolower with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strtolower with zero arguments
Test mb_strtoupper with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_strtoupper with zero arguments
Test mb_substitute_character with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_substr with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mb_substr_count with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mcrypt_cbc with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mcrypt_decrypt with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mcrypt_ecb with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test mcrypt_encrypt with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test method_exists with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test miscellaneous methods of the ImmVector API.
Test mixed constructors from different traits, we are more strict about these cases, since that can lead to un-expected behavior.
Test name pattern can be different depending on the framework, although most follow the default.
Test names should have all characters before and including __DIR__ removed, so that specific user info is not added
Test natcasesort with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test native property handling with ReflectionExtension
Test next with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test nl2br with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test non-interned string
Test not passing in a subpatterns array.
Test ob_implicit_flush with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test object fetching
Test opendir with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test operator that was not overloaded
Test order of operations
Test parse_ini_file with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test parse_url with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test parsing float number as integer.
Test parsing float number.
Test popping elements from a sub-array and popping an array from an array
Test posix_getgrgid with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test preg_grep with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test preg_last_error with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test preg_match with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test preg_match_all with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test preg_quote with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test preg_split with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test prev with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test prototype of builtin classes
Test rad2deg with a different input values
Test rawurldecode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test rawurlencode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test readdir with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test regex caching functionality.
Test reset with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test returning matches functionality.
Test rewinddir with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test scandir with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test serialization/deserialization of ImmSets.
Test serialization/deserialization of ImmVectors.
Test serialize with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test setAttribute with ATTR_STATEMENT_CLASS.
Test showing async stacks in Xenon.
Test showing async stacks in the debugger.
Test showing breakpoints on async functions in the debugger.
Test sin with a different input values
Test sinh with a different input values
Test situations where traits cause duplicate property names when preparing the array for 86pinit setup.
Test sort with more than the expected number of arguments
Test sorting strings that have different length but otherwise equal.
Test specifying non-zero parsing start position.
Test sqrt with a different input values
Test ssl:// socket streams
Test starts here:
Test static content request after a HPHP session has terminated
Test static content request before the creation of any HPHP sessions
Test stepping with continuations and exceptions around throws.
Test stepping with exceptions in continuations.
Test str_split with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test strcspn with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test stream_get_meta_data with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test stream_set_timeout with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test strftime with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test string
Test string lifted from tests/intl/utf8.h
Test strip_tags with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test strspn with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test strval with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test subject strings.
Test syslog with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test tan with a different input values
Test tanh with a different input values
Test tcp:// socket streams with SSL enabled
Test that FS is immutable.
Test that FVs cannot be indexed with a non-int key.
Test that ImmMap correctly handled magic methods.
Test that ImmMap is immutable.
Test that ImmSet behaves properly when mixing namespaced and non-namespaced code.
Test that ImmSet can be accessed through its fully-qualified name.
Test that ImmSet is put in the HH namespace.
Test that ImmSets can be cast to bool.
Test that ImmSets can be compared for equality.
Test that ImmVector behaves properly when mixing namespaced and non-namespaced code.
Test that ImmVector can be accessed through its fully-qualified name.
Test that ImmVector is immutable.
Test that ImmVector is put in the HH namespace.
Test that Map behaves properly when mixing namespaced and non-namespaced code.
Test that Map can be accessed through its fully-qualified name.
Test that Map is put in the HH namespace.
Test that Pair behaves properly when mixing namespaced and non-namespaced code.
Test that Pair can be accessed through its fully-qualified name.
Test that Pair is put in the HH namespace.
Test that Set behaves properly when mixing namespaced and non-namespaced code.
Test that Set can be accessed through its fully-qualified name.
Test that Set is put in the HH namespace.
Test that array_diff behaves as expected for comparing: 1.
Test that concat binops with un-used results are not incorrectly optimized away if they can invoke side-effects.
Test that iterators for Vector and Map remain valid if an existing element is overwritten.
Test that multiline double-quoted strings with curly braces don't mess up line numbers in error messages.
Test that the JIT triggers COW.
Test that the auto-import mechanism also kicks in when the "nameless" namespace construct is used.
Test that the behavior is consistent with the existing handling of new and legacy constructors.
Test that the typechecker can correctly handle ImmVector.
Test that typechecks work when the underlying type is a typedef
Test that we autoload a class in another file
Test that we can clone a ImmSet.
Test that we can define our own custom ImmSet class as long as we're not in the top-level namespace.
Test that we can define our own custom ImmVector class as long as we're not in the top-level namespace.
Test that we can define our own custom Map class as long as we're not in the top-level namespace.
Test that we can define our own custom Pair class as long as we're not in the top-level namespace.
Test that we can define our own custom Set class as long as we're not in the top-level namespace.
Test that we can handle unserialization of Maps with and without namespaces.
Test that we can handle unserialization of Pairs with and without namespaces.
Test that we can handle unserialization of Sets with and without namespaces.
Test that we can handle unserialization of Vectors with and without namespaces.
Test that we can't append to a FV.
Test that we can't mutate a ImmVector array style.
Test that we check constraints after expand the type alias
Test that we do not attempt to autoload a bultin class
Test that we do not attempt to autoload an already loaded class
Test that we don't autoload an already loaded class
Test that when two variables are referenced to one another the internal pointer is the same for both
Test the ConstCollection interface.
Test the ConstIndexAccess interface
Test the KeyedIterable interface.
Test the deep copy mechanism that is triggered when collection literals are used as initializers for class properties.
Test the effectiveness of pre-coloring Shouldn't have any shuffling for concats
Test the following using async - Stepping over awaits.
Test the following: - Stepping over instructions that cause destructors to run.
Test the following: - Stepping over yeilds.
Test the position of the internal array pointer after a call to array_values
Test this by making sure that we don't constant propagate from values in object properties.
Test throwing on function entry
Test to confirm that we have the proper number of enter/exit profiling calls for async functions, and that they are balanced.
Test to make sure that a new object isn't reusing the results from the old object,
Test trait_exists with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test unserialize error idiom
Test urldecode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test urlencode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test uses RenameFunction to ensure that all arguments are retained
Test using database
Test usort with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test utf8_decode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test utf8_encode with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test var_export with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test vectors taken from a combination of NIST FIPS-202, Wikipedia reference vectors, and output from reference implementation
Test what happens when you override a non-memoized method with a memoized one and visa-versa
Test whether a string has a specific suffix
Test whether the constructor of the user-space stream wrapper is called when stream functions are called
Test with less arguments than required
Test with no arguments
Test with non integer parameters
Test with sigle "form encoding" Note: For some reason it complains, results are differ.
Test wrong number of arguments
Test wrong number of arguments.
Test xml_error_string with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_get_current_byte_index with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_get_current_column_number with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_get_current_line_number with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_get_error_code with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parse with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parse_into_struct with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parser_create with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parser_create_ns with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parser_free with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parser_get_option with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_parser_set_option with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_character_data_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_default_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_element_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_end_namespace_decl_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_external_entity_ref_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_notation_decl_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_object with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_processing_instruction_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_start_namespace_decl_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Test xml_set_unparsed_entity_decl_handler with one more than the expected number of arguments
Tested both with a string as an implode, no difference.
Testing 86pinit's effects on private property type inference.
Testing Binary safe
Testing Binary safe files
Testing Error Conditions
Testing Invalid type arguments
Testing a dir with trailing slash
Testing a file trailing slash
Testing a file with trailing slash
Testing array_combine with arrays having unequal number of elements
Testing array_combine with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_diff with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_diff_assoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_diff_key with no arguments
Testing array_diff_key with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_diff_uassoc with no arguments
Testing array_diff_uassoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_diff_ukey with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_intersect_assoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_intersect_key with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_intersect_uassoc with no arguments
Testing array_intersect_uassoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_intersect_ukey with no arguments
Testing array_intersect_ukey with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_key_exists with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_map with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_merge with zero arguments
Testing array_pad with less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_push with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_reduce with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_slice with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_udiff with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_udiff_assoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_udiff_uassoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_uintersect with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_uintersect_assoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_uintersect_uassoc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing array_unshift with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing basic file notation
Testing chmod with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing dir with double trailing slashes
Testing directories
Testing error conditions
Testing file with double slashes
Testing file with double trailing slashes
Testing file with trailing double slashes
Testing finfo_buffer with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing for Error conditions
Testing for error conditions
Testing get_class_vars with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing gzopen with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing how preg_grep reacts to being passed bad regexes
Testing how preg_grep reacts to being passed the wrong type of input argument
Testing how preg_match reacts to being passed the wrong type of regex argument
Testing how preg_match reacts to being passed the wrong type of subject argument
Testing how preg_match_all reacts to being passed the wrong type of input argument
Testing how preg_match_all reacts to being passed the wrong type of regex argument
Testing how preg_match_all reacts to being passed the wrong type of subpatterns array argument
Testing how preg_quote reacts to being passed the wrong type of input argument
Testing how preg_replace reacts to being passed the wrong type of regex argument
Testing how preg_replace reacts to being passed the wrong type of replacement argument
Testing how preg_replace_callback reacts to being passed the wrong type of regex argument
Testing how preg_split reacts to being passed the wrong type of input argument
Testing how preg_split reacts to being passed the wrong type of regex argument
Testing iconv_strpos with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing iconv_strrpos with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing iconv_substr with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing imagecolorallocate with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing imap_fetch_overview with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing imap_fetchbody with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing imap_fetchheader with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing is_a with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing is_subclass_of with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing library functions as comparison function
Testing mail with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_ereg with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_ereg_match with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_ereg_match with zero arguments
Testing mb_ereg_replace with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_split with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_stripos with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_stristr with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_strpos with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_strrchr with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_strrichr with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_strripos with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_strrpos with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_strstr with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_substr with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mb_substr_count with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mcrypt_cbc with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mcrypt_decrypt with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mcrypt_ecb with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing mcrypt_encrypt with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing method_exists with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing multiple invalid.
Testing normal directory notation
Testing ob_start, chunking and the debugger since the debugger actually swaps buffers sometimes.
Testing on hard links
Testing on soft links
Testing preg_grep withone less than the expected number of arguments
Testing preg_match withone less than the expected number of arguments
Testing preg_match_all withone less than the expected number of arguments
Testing preg_replace when the regex and the replacement are both arrays.
Testing preg_split withone less than the expected number of arguments
Testing serialization on all the objects through loop
Testing simple directory tree
Testing strcspn withone less than the expected number of arguments
Testing stream_set_timeout with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing strspn withone less than the expected number of arguments
Testing strval with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing syslog with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing that we don't crash due to xenon
Testing the following regular expression features match correctly: 1.
Testing uasort with ChildClass objects as elements of 'array_arg'
Testing uasort with EmptyClass objects as elements of 'array_arg'
Testing uasort with StaticClass objects as elements of 'array_arg'
Testing usort with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing variation in all argument values
Testing variation using use_include_path argument
Testing with homedir notation
Testing with inexistent column
Testing with language construct as comparison function
Testing with miscellaneous Permission
Testing with reference types for the arguments
Testing with unexpected argument types
Testing xml_parse with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_parse_into_struct with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_parser_get_option with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_parser_set_option with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_character_data_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_default_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_element_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_end_namespace_decl_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_external_entity_ref_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_notation_decl_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_object with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_processing_instruction_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_start_namespace_decl_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Testing xml_set_unparsed_entity_decl_handler with one less than the expected number of arguments
Tests a case where prepareFuncEntry throws in a nested VM context.
Tests a case where we are passing more args than a function takes to its reffiness guard.
Tests for end-of-file on a file pointer.
Tests for segfault if no connection available
Tests how array_diff_assoc compares 1.
Tests identity and basic helper functions
Tests if already/default namespace mappings can be overridden.
Tests taken from GMPs own test suite.
Tests that no strict warning is issued
Text nodes are generated by start/end tags and contain the text in between.
That class should extend the SimpleXMLElement class.
That is any Array or Object.
That is we cannot decrease visibility.
That is, if you have a string like "This is an example string" you could tokenize this string into its individual words by using the space character as the token.
That means it returns the next array value and advances the internal array pointer by one.
That means that you either need to put the code of examples/autoload.inc into your autoprepend file or that you have to point your ini setting auto_prepend_file to that file.
That means the E_NOTICE bit needs to be part of PHP's error_reporting level and that display_errors is set to 1.
That said, `Pair`s only have two elements.
That test should be added back in when HHVM adds support for this feature.
That this works at all in strict mode is probably a bug, but just making sure it doesn't give an empty position for now.
That way the consistency check will be transitive.
That's just a difference in our implementation of how we store exception messages
That's why we need to cause an error here.
The "distance" between the desired color and each color in the palette is calculated as if the RGB values represented points in three-dimensional space.
The "i" after the pattern delimiter indicates a case-insensitive search
The "root" locale is equivalent to "en_US_POSIX" in CLDR.
The "salt" is a 9-character string consisting of an underscore followed by 4 bytes of iteration count and 4 bytes of salt.
The 'G' modifier is available since PHP 5.1.0
The 'variant' and 'private' subtags can take maximum 15 values whereas 'extlang' can take maximum 3 values.e.g. Variants are allowed with the suffix ranging from 0-14.
The .gitignore will ensure that the frameworks aren't added to the official repo.
The .inc files are not included automatically because they are sooner or later integrated into the extension.
The .opts file for this test sets JitGlobalTranslationLimit in a way such that the second foreach loop's IterInit instruction gets jitted but its IterNext instruction gets interpreted.
The / is the most commonly used delimiter.
The 2-legged flow, or request signing.
The DOMImplementation interface provides a number of methods for performing operations that are independent of any particular instance of the document object model.
The DOMText class inherits from DOMCharacterData and represents the textual content of a DOMElement or DOMAttr.
The DeltaBlue planner
The Equinox is assumed to always fall on 21st March, so the calculation reduces to determining the date of the full moon and the date of the following Sunday.
The GMT offset is calculated with the timezone information contained in the DateTimeZone object being used.
The IMAP specification requires that these messages be passed to the user.
The Jewish calendar has been in use for several thousand years, but in the early days there was no formula to determine the start of a month.
The Levenshtein distance is defined as the minimal number of characters you have to replace, insert or delete to transform str1 into str2.
The Memcached::getResultCode will return Memcached::RES_END if result set is exhausted.
The Memcached::getResultCode will return Memcached::RES_NOTFOUND if the key does not exist.
The Mongo database server runs a JavaScript engine.
The MongoCursor class has several methods for setting flags on the query object.
The MongoDB aggregation framework provides a means to calculate aggregated values without having to use MapReduce.
The MongoSomething object has not been correctly initialized by its constructor  Code: 0  Probably your Mongo object is not connected to a database server.
The MySQL server version associated with the current connection.
The OAuth extension provides a simple interface to interact with data providers using the OAuth HTTP specification to protect private resources.
The PHP IntlBreakIterator serves as the the base class for all types of ICU break iterators.
The PHP casting will fouls us otherwise.
The PHP driver uses the "native" error code wherever possible.
The PHP group is in the process of depracating this behavior.
The Phar extension supports reading API version 1.0.0 or newer.
The REPLACE statement first deletes the record with the same primary key and then inserts the new record.
The ROT13 encoding simply shifts every letter by 13 places in the alphabet while leaving non-alpha characters untouched.
The ReflectionTypeAlias class reports information about a type alias.
The ReflectionTypeConstant class reports information about an object.
The Richards benchmark simulates the task dispatcher of an operating system.
The Simple PHP YAML Class.
The TCP protocol is based on this socket type.
The TEST_WEB_BASE_URL setting should be the base url to access this path.
The Types of filters manual page lists the available filters.
The UDP protocol is based on this socket type.
The URL to POST to
The XSLTProcessor class.
The Xdebug extension is not loaded.
The `Iterable` returned is one that produces the values from the current `Pair`.
The `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` values in the `Map` of the returned `Awaitable` are not available until you `await` or `join` the returned `Awaitable`.
The `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`s in the `Map` of the returned `Awaitable` are not available until you `await` or `join` the returned `Awaitable`.
The `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`s in the `Vector` of the returned `Awaitable` are not available until you `await` or `join` the returned `Awaitable`.
The actual `ResultOrExceptionWrapper` in the returned `Awaitable` will only be available after you `await` or `join` the returned `Awaitable`.
The actual meanings of these flags are described in the predefined constants.
The actual meanings of these modes are described in the predefined constants.
The actual meanings of these modifiers are described in the predefined constants.
The actual values are arbitrary.
The advantage is that it allows a faster array implementation.
The advantages of a string assertion are less overhead when assertion checking is off and messages containing the assertion expression when an assertion fails.
The algorithm attempts to resatisfy that constraint using some other method.
The algorithm used here was introduced around the year 532 by Dionysius Exiguus.
The analysis used to reject code like this is performed by generating expression dependent types
The area is amount of pixels divided by three.
The arg parameter is in radians.
The array is passed by value, so this shouldn't have any visible effect.
The array parameter's value being the first, and the key/index second.
The array represents each row as either an array of column values or an object with properties corresponding to each column name.
The array-index operation calls into array_getm_s_fast, which will raise a notice because the index is undefined.
The associativity is preserved.
The attribute index is converted to lowercase.
The available behavior flags are listed below.
The available error level constants and the actual meanings of these error levels are described in the predefined constants.
The available flags are listed below.
The available modes are listed below.
The base exception class for any issues arising from the use of async MySQL.
The base in which number is given is specified in frombase.
The behaviour is undefined.
The behaviour of these constants is described on the JSON constants page.
The behaviour on windows is to select an arbitrary timezone name from the current system settings.
The benchmark score is computed later once a full benchmark suite has run to completion.
The benchmark was originally implemented in BCPL by Martin Richards.
The blend method uses the background color as any other colors.
The blocked task will not be made runnable until it is explicitly released, even if new work is added to it.
The bzip2 or zlib extension must be enabled to take advantage of this feature.
The cachedump command ties up the server and is strictly to be used for debugging purposes.
The calendar was created in 46 B.C., but the details did not stabilize until at least 8 A.D., and perhaps as late at the 4th century.
The call method does not take a scope parameter.
The call to a builtin is needed to invoke the code that saves the VM's hardware registers to ExecutionContext, and gives them values that will be bogus below.
The callback can be from creating a connection, inducing an error condition, executing a query, etc.
The callback is run before failover is attempted.
The callback should return the replacement string.
The callback will be called with all the invariant parameters after the condition.
The caller is expected to make the appropriate add/addAll calls to fill that reserved capacity.
The caller is expected to make the appropriate add/set/addAll/setAll calls to fill this reserved capacity.
The case will be ignored.
The center of rotation is the center of the image, and the rotated image may have different dimensions than the original image.
The change depends on the last optional case parameter.
The channel argument affects only if Imagick is compiled against ImageMagick version 6.4.4 or greater.
The check is done using the real UID/GID instead of the effective one.
The checker should start in any-case mode.
The children of this parent are the same children as one above
The class can be used to save 32-bit integers to the database on a 64-bit system.
The class can be used to save 64-bit integers to the database on a 32-bit system.
The class name passed to this method must be derived from SplFileInfo.
The class name passed to this method must be derived from SplFileObject.
The class oop_test uses a static reference to a oop_class instance.
The class uses the formatting specifications for the fragments to assemble them into a message that is contained in a single string within a resource bundle.
The client IP and port will be null if the connection is local.
The code for this function was originally drawn from the Independent JPEG Group library code, which is excellent.
The code has been modified to preserve as much alpha channel information as possible in the resulting palette, in addition to preserving colors as well as possible.
The code passed to the constructor
The codepoint specific integer property value.
The colors parameters are integers between 0 and 255 or hexadecimals between 0x00 and 0xFF.
The commit hash has changed and we need to download new code
The comparison function must return an integer less than, equal to, or greater than zero if the first argument is considered to be respectively less than, equal to, or greater than the second.
The comparison of arrays' data is performed by using an user-supplied callback : data_compare_func.
The comparison of arrays' data is performed by using an user-supplied callback.
The configuration option will keep this new value during the script's execution, and will be restored at the script's ending.
The connection pool will either create a new connection or use one of the recently available connections from the pool itself.
The contents of the file are pulled out of MongoDB on the fly, so that the whole file does not have to be loaded into memory first.
The contents of the section will be decoded according to their transfer encoding - base64, quoted-printable and uuencoded text are supported.
The converse would not make sense, though.
The conversion is done byte-wise with the high-nibble first.
The coordinates refer to the upper left corner.
The corresponding public portion of the key will be used to sign the CSR.
The cost in this case is, of course, very low.
The coverage information is cleared.
The data is compared by using a callback function.
The data returned by this method will be decoded internally by PHP using the unserialization method specified in session.serialize_handler.
The database cleans up a cursor once all of its results have been sent to the client, but if the client doesn't request all of the results, the cursor will languish there, taking up resources.
The database profiler tracks query execution times.
The database sends responses in batches of documents, up to 4MB of documents per response.
The date of Easter Day was defined by the Council of Nicaea in AD325 as the Sunday after the first full moon which falls on or after the Spring Equinox.
The date time format is a message format pattern used to compose date and time patterns.
The decimal value is used in formatting fractions of seconds.
The default character set is ISO-8859-1.
The default entity may be NULL.
The default fill character is space.
The default is 1.
The default is 4 seconds.
The default is 50.
The default is 5000.
The default is 60 seconds.
The default is SIGTERM.
The default is `'Age'`.
The default is read only.
The default is the actual locale.
The default is to convert everything.
The default is to pad with spaces.
The default is to read until end of file is reached.
The default limit is 30 seconds or, if it exists, the max_execution_time value defined in the php.ini.
The default mode, ENT_COMPAT, is the backwards compatible mode which only translates the double-quote character and leaves the single-quote untranslated.
The default number of rounds is 5000, there is a minimum of 1000 and a maximum of 999,999,999.
The default priority is 0 while a lower numerical value causes more favorable scheduling.
The default value is NULL, which corresponds to IntlDateFormatter::GREGORIAN.
The default value is OPENSSL_KEYTYPE_RSA which is currently the only supported key type.
The default value is the largest of the length of the str compared to the length of main_str less the offset.
The default value of 0 means no restriction.
The default value of a static class property can not be tracked when using this method on user defined classes.
The default value of notext is TRUE.
The destructor.
The detector has no idea what to do with this.
The detector only handles UTF-16 if there's a BOM at the front.
The directory must be empty, and the relevant permissions must permit this.
The distinct command returns a list of distinct values for the given key across a collection.
The easiest way is to create a field in the current document.
The end time for the specific MySQL operation, in seconds since epoch.
The end time of the connection operation, in seconds since epoch.
The end time when the error was produced, in seconds since epoch.
The end time when the successful query began, in seconds since epoch.
The entry specified by dn is renamed/moved.
The envelope key is generated when the data are sealed and can only be used by one specific private key.
The environment variable will only exist for the duration of the current request.
The error can be  avoided by choosing the __toString magix method as follows:
The error code consists of five characters.
The exact layout of the payload data carried by a packet is not importaint, and neither is the nature of the work performed on packets by the tasks.
The exception associated with a MySQL connection failure.
The exception associated with a MySQL query failure.
The exception message
The extension of the filename defines the type of the file.
The extra backslash is required because the string is in double quotes.
The fetch_style parameter determines how PDO returns the row.
The field contains a comma separated list containing the user's full name, office phone, office number, and home phone number.
The field, however, lives on, and its contents have been formalized by POSIX.
The field_offset starts at 0.
The file descriptor numbers are not limited to 0, 1 and 2 - you may specify any valid file descriptor number and it will be passed to the child process.
The file does not need to exist, or be readable.
The file is opened and streamed through the parser.
The file is streamed through the parser.
The file name where the exception was instantiated
The file name's extension must contain .phar.
The file pointed to by handle is closed.
The file protocol is disabled by cURL if open_basedir is set.
The file will be stored in the archive with localname as its path.
The filename argument may be a directory name allowing you to check if a directory is writable.
The filenames are returned in the order in which they are stored by the filesystem.
The final crlf was removed.
The final node in the priority queue is the root.
The final option MYSQLI_BOTH will create a single array with the attributes of both.
The final stats will generally be the last line before we hit null returned from line retrieval.
The findAndModify command atomically modifies and returns a single document.
The first argument will contain the file the assertion failed in.
The first byte suggests this is a three-byte UTF-8 sequence, but it's not valid.
The first call creates the message queue with the optional perms.
The first character's position is 0, the second character position is 1, and so on.
The first element in this array has count key and represents the number of returned values, next elements are numerically indexed DN components.
The first element is the descriptor type and the second element is an option for the given type.
The first element will be used.
The first four bytes are a timestamp, the next three are a hash of the client machine's hostname, the next two are the two least significant bytes of the process id running the script, and the last three bytes are an incrementing value.
The first index is 0.
The first of December 2008 is a Monday.
The first successful activity of the current connection is its creation.
The first time through this loop, we know it is an array and therefore can't be a call to extract.
The following 3 members override those in class M
The following constants are used to specify different formats in the constructor.
The following enum values are replicated in hphp/runtime/base/type-structure.h
The following flags are reported, if your version of MySQL is current enough to support them: "not_null", "primary_key", "unique_key", "multiple_key", "blob", "unsigned", "zerofill", "binary", "enum", "auto_increment" and "timestamp".
The following int constants are used to specify the calendar.
The following is a BC break with PHP 4 where it would  call foo::fail.
The following is a list of common errors, codes, and causes.
The following keys, if present in configargs behave as their equivalents in the openssl.conf, as listed in the table below.
The following line only operates on classes which are converted to c already.
The following line will give a Fatal error: Call to private ...
The following members are overridden in class P
The following options are available: XML parser options Option constant Data type Description XML_OPTION_CASE_FOLDING integer Controls whether case-folding is enabled for this XML parser.
The following static members are used with the getLocale methods of the various locale affected classes, such as numfmt.
The format is defined by the formatter, returns both number and currency code.
The frame color is that of the thumbnail's matte color.
The function also returns TRUE/FALSE for INSERT/UPDATE/DELETE queries to indicate success/failure.
The function does not distinguish between static and non static properties and does not take visibility modifiers into account.
The function may be any PHP callable, either a string function name, an array of object instance and method, or array of classname and static class method.
The function modifies this object.
The function must return TRUE in order to continue iterating over the iterator.
The function named by handler must accept four parameters, and should return an integer value.
The function named by handler must accept three parameters, and should return an integer value.
The function parses the HTML contained in the string source.
The function parses the HTML document in the file named filename.
The function returns 1 if it matches with the empty string.
The function takes two parameters, the hostname and port of the failed server.
The function tries to avoid breaking words.
The function will fail and return an integer value corresponding to MSG_ENOMSG.
The function will leave number indices as is.
The function will return an error if the uncompressed data is more than 32768 times the length of the compressed input data or more than the optional parameter length.
The fuzz member of image defines how much tolerance is acceptable to consider two colors as the same.
The given arguments are passed to the class constructor.
The goal is to provide insight into the perf costs of simple constructs to aid early design choices for writing performant PHP/Hack.
The group ID is returned in numerical format.
The handle must be open for writing.
The handlers for the configured events are called as many times as necessary.
The hard limit acts as a ceiling for the soft limit.
The hash is a 32-character hexadecimal number.
The hash type is triggered by the salt argument.
The hostname associated with the current connection.
The idea for this function was taken from Perl and all formatting codes work the same as in Perl.
The impetus for this file is the "OSS Parity" snapshot on our team TV screen.
The implicit COMMIT will prevent you from rolling back any other changes within the transaction boundary.
The index comparison is done by a user supplied callback function.
The indices of the hash are: ticks - the number of clock ticks that have elapsed since reboot.
The information about icons are retrieved from the icon with the highest bitrate.
The information that is collected consists of an two dimensional array with as primary index the executed filename and as secondary key the line number.
The input parameter's value being the first, and the key/index second.
The iterator interface to normalizer is rarely used, so is not provided here.
The key is encrypted with each of the public keys associated with the identifiers in pub_key_ids and each encrypted key is returned in env_keys.
The key is the argument name and the value is the xdebug-specific serialization of the argument value.
The key specification can either be just a single field name as string, or an array containing one or more field names with their sort direction.
The key to each array element is an option listed above, while the value is an `int` or `string`, depending on the option.
The key to entry correlations will be maintained.
The keys and values in the `Map` of the returned `Awaitable` are not available until you `await` or `join` the returned `Awaitable`.
The keys are 0 and 1.
The lack of alpha component support does not allow an alpha based antialiasing method.
The language-neutral way to create messages keeps each part of the message separate and provides keys to the data.
The largest number that can be converted is 4294967295 in decimal resulting to "37777777777".
The largest number that can be converted is 4294967295 in decimal resulting to "ffffffff".
The last ID inserted, if one existed, for the query that produced the current result.
The last buffer content is sent to next buffer  Source code: main/output.c Alias to functions:
The last chunk may contain less than size elements.
The last node should be identical with the last entry in the children array
The last provision is for past states of history variables, which are not stay but which are also not computed by any constraint.
The latest SHA at the time was used for the value.
The latter restriction is necessary because it would be impossible to determine the parameter type.
The latter will also emit a warning, which we don't care about, so suppress it.
The left child of the dummy node will hold the R tree of the algorithm.
The length of array increases by the number of variables pushed.
The length of salt to generate
The length required in the final serialization
The library must be located in the directory specified in the configure option sqlite3.extension_dir.
The line number where the exception was instantiated
The line returned has the ending newline removed.
The list of valid identifiers is available in the List of Supported Timezones.
The locales are comma-separated if there is more than one.
The locales are syntactically like those from the HTTP Accept-Language header.
The logging mechanism as used by MongoLog emits all log messages as a PHP notice.
The loop to ouput the test coverage info Should output: Extension, Class Name, Method/Function Name, Test Status, Test Files
The main body of a script is level 0 and each include and/or function call adds one to the stack depth level.
The main code, pull requests, and dependencies have been fetched at this point, and the autoload map will have been generated.
The main differences between a SplFixedArray and a normal PHP array is that the SplFixedArray is of fixed length and allows only integers within the range as indexes.
The majority of the Redis API is implemented by __call which references this list for how the individual command should be handled.
The markers are legal only in certain places in SQL statements.
The maximum number passed to the backlog parameter highly depends on the underlying platform.
The maximum size of a single object that can be inserted into the database is 16MB.
The message will be unserialized and then returned to your script.
The metaphone generated keys are of variable length.
The method 'bar' does not exist but that's ok
The method serialize is called whenever an instance needs to be serialized.
The method serialized is called whenever an instance needs to be serialized.
The methods supplied in this class are used to build all the messages that are seen by end users.
The modifiers are listed below.
The multi-byte encodings are not supported
The mysqli exception handling class.
The name "system" is also reserved.
The name and port must be passed by reference.
The name is matched in a case-insensitive manner.
The name will only be effective for the upcoming I/O and it will be reset immediately after.
The names of the different calendars which can be used as calendar are as follows: 0 or CAL_GREGORIAN - Gregorian Calendar 1 or CAL_JULIAN - Julian Calendar 2 or CAL_JEWISH - Jewish Calendar 3 or CAL_FRENCH - French Revolutionary Calendar  If no calendar is specified information on all supported calendars is returned as an array.
The new position, measured in bytes from the beginning of the file, is obtained by adding offset to the position specified by whence.
The next entries are the decoded uuencoded files.
The null or empty string obtains the "root" locale.
The number of database rows affected in the current result.
The number of errors, warnings, and notes returned during execution of the previous SQL statement.
The number of rows in the current result.
The number of values can be found by indexing "count" in the resultant array.
The object has the following properties: messages, recent, unseen, uidnext, and uidvalidity.
The object will be formatted using the formater's configured timezone.
The object will only define a property if it exists.
The old archive is not removed from disk, and should be done manually after the process has finished.
The old implementation treated this as three code points.
The only cases where this would not be true is if, for some rare reason, stat information is part of the information provided for a given test error -- or -- we have hit a fatal at the very end of running PHPUnit.
The only purpose of this is to check if emulated and native PS return the same.
The only way to specify this default value is to leave it out of the parameter list.
The optional parameters allow optional control over which files are extracted, and whether existing files on disk can be overwritten.
The optional parameters must be passed by reference.
The optional setup and tearDown arguments are functions that will be invoked before and after running the benchmark, but the running time of these functions will not be accounted for in the benchmark score.
The origin charset must have at most 256 code points.
The original listening socket socket, however, remains open and may be reused.
The output_callback parameter may be bypassed by passing a NULL value.
The owner ID is returned in numerical format.
The parent of this last node is the root again
The path of this linter
The path where the binary is located.
The paths that we actually want to report on.
The pattern string has its component parts replaced in a locale-sensitive manner using items in the arguments array.
The period of this function is equal to the product of both primes.
The persistence SOAP_PERSISTENCE_SESSION makes only objects of the given class persistent, but not the class static data.
The point of this unit test is to detect regressions if/when we fix either of those issues, though.
The port on which the MySQL instance is running.
The portion defined will be copied onto the x,y coordinates, dst_x and dst_y.
The position  returned is still relative to the beginning of haystack.
The position is represented by bytes from the head of string.
The position returned is still relative to the beginning of haystack.
The possible properties are: subject - the messages subject from - who sent it to - recipient date - when was it sent message_id - Message-ID references - is a reference to this message id in_reply_to - is a reply to this message id size - size in bytes uid - UID the message has in the mailbox msgno - message sequence number in the mailbox recent - this message is flagged as recent flagged - this message is flagged answered - this message is flagged as answered deleted - this message is flagged for deletion seen - this message is flagged as already read draft - this message is flagged as being a draft
The possible value for the format and the resultant outputs are listed below.
The possible values for this parameter are the constants MYSQLI_ASSOC, MYSQLI_NUM, or MYSQLI_BOTH.
The precision specifier stands for the number of digits after the decimal point since PHP 5.2.1.
The probability is relative to the total weight of all servers.
The properties of the object are:      name - column name     table - name of the table the column belongs to, which is the alias name if one is defined     max_length - maximum length of the column     not_null - 1 if the column cannot be NULL     primary_key - 1 if the column is a primary key     unique_key - 1 if the column is a unique key multiple_key - 1 if the column is a non-unique key     numeric - 1 if the column is numeric     blob - 1 if the column is a BLOB     type - the type of the column     unsigned - 1 if the column is unsigned zerofill - 1 if the column is zero-filled
The proxy could make things a bit adventurous, so we will see how this works out after some time to test it out
The purpose of this test is to make sure that '/tmp/foo/http://example.com' is treated as a file path, not a URI with a scheme of /tmp/foo/http - if it is, an unknown stream type warning will be raised.
The range is specified by two non-negative integers: a starting position and a length.
The reason for this conversion is that the memory stream has an ugly but working mechanism to prevent being double freed when it's encapsulated, while STDIO streams don't.
The removed node is returned.
The result array will contain only found key-value pairs.
The result of a successfully executed MySQL query.
The result will be PHP value for simple resources and ResourceBundle object for complex ones.
The resulting file can be processed with the gunzip command/bunzip command, or accessed directly and transparently with the Phar extension.
The resulting header is "folded" to a set of multiple lines in case the resulting header field would be longer than the value of this parameter, according to RFC2822 - Internet Message Format.
The resulting path will have no symbolic link, '/./' or '/../' components.
The resulting pixel is opaque.
The results are different for HHVM and PHP 5 due to the following reason.
The return value is cast to an integer.
The return value will be casted to boolean if non-boolean was returned.
The return values are equally processed internally by PHP.
The return will always be 0 since a `Pair` only has two keys, 0 and 1.
The return will always be 1 since a `Pair` only has two keys, 0 and 1.
The returned `Vector` will, of course, be mutable.
The returned crypttext can be larger than the size of the data that was given by data.
The returned data may be binary.
The returned name returned matches the name of the matching token constant.
The returned string will be the same as the name of the error code constant.
The root of the project.
The row has values associated with each column.
The row is returned as an array.
The rows are returned as a `Vector` of `Map` objects.
The runtime sees that x exists, but is invisible, so it calls __get to search for a dynamic property of that name, which fails.
The runtime will attempt to get a backtrace, which will crash because m_fp is out of sync and points at something that isn't an ActRec.
The safe_mode_allowed_env_vars directive contains a comma-delimited list of prefixes.
The same IV must be used for encryption/decryption.
The same for aliases
The same is true for the insteadof operator to resolve conflicts
The same options are supported through the options array as well, and are therefore redescribed there.
The scope is a associative array of variable name/value pairs.
The second arg is supposedly required.
The second copy should remain unsorted.
The second parameter files can be either the name of a file or directory to extract, or an array of names of files and directories to extract.
The second parameter to the constructor is a hint in how to interpret the first, if it can't figure it out.
The second special case is the "Location:" header.
The second statement is always executed.
The sender is assumed to have marked the inputs of the given constraint with the given mark.
The sent data completes the record.
The sent data completes the transaction.
The serialization method used is specified in the session.serialize_handler setting.
The server currently 02.09.2011 can't handle data sent in utf16le
The server currently 16.08.2010 can't handle data sent in utf16 and utf32
The server currently 17.07.2007 can't handle data sent in ucs2
The server only accepts once, but the client will call stream_socket_client multiple times with the persistent flag.
The server part is mandatory in all mailbox parameters.
The session id of a process is the process group id of the session leader.
The session is set by MySSLContextProvider.
The session name can't consist of digits only, at least one letter must be present.
The settings xdebug.collect_includes, xdebug.collect_params and xdebug.collect_return influence what information is logged to the trace file and the setting xdebug.trace_format influences the format of the trace file.
The shutdown callbacks are executed as the part of the request, so it's possible to send output from them and access output buffers.
The size values are a bit of a difficult thing to check so we use them as sort of a lower bound.
The soft limit is the value that the kernel enforces for the corresponding resource.
The special name INBOX stands for the current users personal mailbox.
The stack trace
The start time for the connection operation, in seconds since epoch.
The start time for the specific MySQL operation, in seconds since epoch.
The start time when the error was produced, in seconds since epoch.
The start time when the successful query began, in seconds since epoch.
The static invocation may be used when no DOMDocument properties need to be set prior to loading.
The step parameter was introduced in 5.0.0
The storage object will never contain more than one object with the same identifier.
The strategy is to first look whether there's an existing compilation database and use that if it's exhaustive.
The stream will by default be opened in blocking mode.
The string after the last space in actual_test_command is the file that is run in phpunit.
The string of code must be valid JavaScript.
The string representations as generated during construction
The string returned will be either `'TimedOut'`, representing a timeout, or `'Failed'`, representing the server rejecting the connection or query.
The string will be tokenized when any one of the characters in the argument are found.
The strings will be compared using the options already specified.
The structure of the array is as follows.
The structure of the ini file is the same as the php.ini's.
The structure of the ini string is the same as the php.ini's.
The structure of this shape is specified in reflection.hhi.
The subclass value '000' in any class indicates that there is no subclass for that SQLSTATE.
The supplied value must be between 0 and 1.
The supported encodings are ISO-8859-1, UTF-8 and US-ASCII.
The target may not be the real path on the filesystem.
The task has packets left to process.
The task is blocked and cannot be run until it is explicitly released.
The task is not blocked as such and may be started by the scheduler.
The task is not currently running.
The task is running and is currently scheduled.
The term "Monday December 2008" will be parsed as the first Monday in December 2008.
The test is about checking the fallback to emulation
The tested node have to be an XML_ELEMENT_NODE.
The tests files file would have the wrong path information then.
The text node is determined to contain whitespace in element content during the load of the document.
The time is measured to change a variable on either side of the mapping and to change the scale and offset factors.
The time is returned as a Unix timestamp.
The time returned is a Unix timestamp.
The timezone of the formatter will only be kept if an IntlCalendar object is not passed, otherwise the new timezone will be that of the passed object.
The total number of row blocks makes up the entire result of the successful query.
The total time for the MySQL error condition to occur, in microseconds.
The total time for the establishment of the MySQL connection, in microseconds.
The total time for the specific MySQL operation, in microseconds.
The total time for the successful query to occur, in microseconds.
The two failing frameworks are Monolog and ZF2.
The type known at compile-time
The type not known at compile-time
The type of failure that produced this result.
The type of returned array depends on how result_type is defined.
The type of socket created is determined by the transport specified using standard URL formatting: transport://target.
The typechecker intentionally does not recognize this, however, you can use it in combination with // UNSAFE if absolutely required.
The typechecker won't like this but we shouldn't care
The types are not statically knowable.
The types of confusability to be tested - single script, mixed script, or whole script - are determined by the check options set for this instance.
The typical effect is that each web server child will retry the connection about every retry_interval seconds when serving a page.
The unit depends on the type of the resource being limited.
The use of the dummy node is a bit counter-intuitive: The right child of the dummy node will hold the L tree of the algorithm.
The use of this parameter should therefore be considered good practice.
The user supplied callback function is used for comparison.
The valid ones are supposed to have only 2 entries, the first of which is an object or a string, and the second a string.
The value FALSE can also be returned on failure.
The value can be between 0 and 250 with 0 being a special case.
The value in the elements represents how many times a line has been executed.
The value is a bit set, obtained by OR-ing together the constant values in this class.
The value of options is the value of zero or more of the following two constants OR'ed together: Possible values for options WNOHANG Return immediately if no child has exited.
The value of this item may be either "B" or "Q", where "B" stands for base64 encoding scheme and "Q" stands for quoted-printable encoding scheme.
The value returned should be read in minutes, defaults to 180.
The values 0 to 63 are encoded as "./0-9A-Za-z".
The values in the `Vector` of the returned `Awaitable` are not available until you `await` or `join` the returned `Awaitable`.
The values in the array will be strings for uniquely specified headers, but arrays where a header was specified more than once.
The values in the entries are indexed by individual attributes.
The values of the provided `Traversable` is concatenated to the end of the current `Pair` to produce the returned `ImmVector`.
The variable is still present in the shared memory.
The variables of constraints that have been processed are marked with a unique mark value so that we know where we've been.
The wait function suspends execution of the current process until a child has exited, or until a signal is delivered whose action is to terminate the current process or to call a signal handling function.
The way we test the INSERT and data types overlaps with the mysqli_stmt_bind_result test in large parts.
The wrapper used in oldname must match the wrapper used in newname.
The xbox thread would reset when this amount of time has passed since the previous reset.
The zlib extension must be enabled to compress with gzip compression, the bzip2 extension must be enabled in order to compress with bzip2 compression.
The zlib extension must be enabled to decompress an archive compressed with gzip compression, and the bzip2 extension must be enabled in order to decompress an archive compressed with bzip2 compression.
The zlib or bzip2 extensions must be enabled to take advantage of this feature.
Then all values in the input array are filtered by this filter.
Then if the input skeleton is "MMMdhmm", there is not an exact match, so the input skeleton is broken up into two components "MMMd" and "hmm".
Then it compares the parts starting from left to right.
Then prefix, serialie, and cast as needed
Then reset to PDOStatement.
Then that pattern is used, plus the G.
Then when you `await` or `join` on the returned `Awaitable`, you will get a `Vector` of `AsyncMysqlQueryResult`, one result for each query.
Then, any changes made to those elements will be made in the original array itself.
There are a number of possible error messages to help you diagnose the connection problem.
There are also OAuth provider examples within the OAuth extensions sources.
There are close matches for those two skeletons, so the result is put together with this pattern, resulting in "d-MMM h:mm".
There are some rare cases where the normal search returns FALSE while the parallel search returns an identifier.
There are three regions to test:, before cut, the cut and after the cut.
There are two cases.
There are two special-case header calls.
There exists a canonicalization function to make case match the specification.
There is a default of 60 seconds to run each test, but this can be shortened or lengthened as desired.
There is a list of predefined classes in the Predefined Classes section of the appendices.
There is no constructor in this trait-- It should be possible to extend Exception and add a PHP4 constructor, traits play poorly with PHP4 constructors.
There is no element 3 in a `Pair`, but if you specify an element greater than 2, it will just return all elements in the `Pair`.
There is no element 3 in a `Pair`, but if you specify an element greater than or equal to 2, it will just return empty.
There is no particular difference in how the driver or server interpret different types, so by and large they are irrelevant for now.
There is no semantics for traits in the inheritance chain.
There is no standard provision to find out the actual backlog value on this platform.
There is one exception, if var is NULL, 0 will be returned.
There is only one difference.
There is some duplication with this class.
There might still have occurred problems on individual transfers even when this function returns CURLM_OK.
There was a weird bug in Typing_generic.rename, that was reproduced with this case.
There's gotta be a cleaner way to do this...
Therefore adding an explicit skip, remove it to run this test.
Therefore, TCP applications must allow for the possibility of partial record transmission.
Therefore, it is impossible to mix encoding in single array or object.
Therefore, there will be no data in the buffer.
These APIs are listed as "subject to change", avoid for now
These are encoded as printable characters, 6 bits per character, least significant character first.
These are in a separate file so they can be loaded before the things that use them
These are in a separate test so that Zend can still generate param_tostring_zendcompat.php.expect
These are less than 80 width, but the pretty newlines are preserved.
These are not in our custom ini file for this test, but should be bound to a default value
These are set in our custom ini file for this test
These are tests for dates outside the 32-bit range.
These are the five necessary properties for a proper install, with pull_requests being optional.
These arrays contain a MySQL link identifier in the 0'th position, and any other values in the remainder of the array.
These calendars are all based directly on the Gregorian calendar  Non-Gregorian calendars need to be specified in locale.
These calls fail
These constants define formatter/parser argument type - integer, floating point or currency.
These don't work in HHVM, and are unlikely to be fixed.
These effects occur even if the user didn't change.
These exercise direct property setting and getting.
These files are binary data arrays which ICU uses to store the localized data.
These last two parameters must be passed by reference.
These parameters are integers between 0 and 255 or hexadecimals between 0x00 and 0xFF.
These parse, but don't work at runtime currently:
These should be fine
These should be visible through C
These should fail
These two constants specify how many times a packet is queued and how many times a task is put on hold in a correct run of richards.
These types will be automatically detected if your build of PHP supports them: JPEG, PNG, GIF, WBMP, and GD2.
These values do not get implicitly converted to objects
These values get implicitly converted to objects
These variables will be protected even if safe_mode_allowed_env_vars is set to allow changing them.
These will be moved out of Collator when Locale class is created.
They are in the stats file as context for the numbers
They are useful for handling such things as file permissions and group membership.
They can be implemented as module functions, but there won't be many users need them.
They don't have any meaning a such but are characteristic of a correct run so if the actual queue or hold count is different from the expected there must be a bug in the implementation.
They should all return false
They will end up in an arbitrary relative position.
They will now be removed with the array_diff
Thickness and styled are not supported.
Think twice before changing the default value of 1 second - you can lose all the advantages of caching if your connection is too slow.
This ID must be a valid identifier on ICU's database or an ID representing an explicit offset, such as GMT-05:30.
This Set will have an initial capacity of 3
This allows complex arrays and objects to be sent to other PHP scripts, or if you are using the WDDX serializer, to any WDDX compatible client.
This allows iteration over all elements using foreach or an appropriate while construct, just like SimpleXMLElement does.
This allows multiple-row inserts to be reproduced correctly on other servers in a replication setup.
This allows related items to be grouped together on a single server for efficiency with multi operations.
This allows related items to be grouped together on a single server for efficiency with multi operations..
This allows the algorithm to avoid getting into an infinite loop even if the constraint graph has an inadvertent cycle.
This allows you to easily receive arrays or complex object structures from other PHP scripts, or if you are using the WDDX serializer, from any WDDX compatible source.
This allows you, for example, to intercept the read and write methods to encrypt/decrypt the session data and then pass the result to and from the parent class.
This allows your script to interoperate with other scripts that run as "co-processes".
This also helps us prepare for incorporating this with our official test suite.
This also occurs if you use this parameter to limit the count of fetched entries.
This also prevents from calling autoloader if the class doesn't exist.
This array has 25 elements, but only 3 unique values
This array is passed by reference because it is modified by the function.
This attempts to push current output all the way to the browser with a few caveats.
This basically copies zend/ext/spl/tests/SplFixedArray_setSize_param_null.php but changes the expectf to match hhvm's var_dump output
This benchmark is based on a JavaScript log processing module used by the V8 profiler to generate execution time profiles for runs of JavaScript applications, and it effectively measures how fast the JavaScript engine is at allocating nodes and reclaiming the memory used for old nodes.
This better not iterate the dataflow algorithm forever:
This calculations requires walking the preclasses in the hierarchy and should not be getting performed repeatedly.
This call needs a result_entry_identifier, so needs to be preceded by one of the ldap search calls and one of the calls to get an individual entry.
This can also be an IntlTimeZone or a DateTimeZone object.
This can be called before or after the query.
This can be for example RGB.
This can be omitted and skipped with -1 for transports that do not use ports, such as unix://.
This can be one of OPENSSL_KEYTYPE_DSA, OPENSSL_KEYTYPE_DH or OPENSSL_KEYTYPE_RSA.
This can be used to see the log level.
This can be used to select a name from a WSDL file.
This can be useful if you want touch a number of collections lightly, or process some results on the database side to reduce the amount that has to be sent to the client.
This can be useful to report progress.
This can cause some unintuitive behavior.
This can either be one of the IntlDateFormatter calendar constants or an IntlCalendar.
This can only be called when handling a request.
This can only happen if bad arguments are passed in.
This cannot be implemented in __construct, because a derived class may implement its own __construct, losing the stacktrace.
This causes a seg fault.
This causes hash collisions if the string hash is case-insensitive.
This causes that flushing and cleaning functions would issue a notice and return FALSE if called.
This causes the previously undefined variable to now be defined with a value of NULL.
This causes the previously undefined variable to now be defined.
This changes the current database profiling level.
This charset is supported in 4.3.2.
This choses a random secondary for a connection to read from.
This class allows you to asynchronously connect to a MySQL client.
This class allows you to turn on specific levels of logging for specific parts of the driver.
This class and its methods are therefore deprecated and should not be used.
This class can be used to create lightweight links between objects in different collections.
This class can be used to create regular expressions.
This class can be used to read a YAML file and convert its contents into a PHP array.
This class consists only of static methods.
This class contains exclusively static methods for manipulating database references.
This class extends MongoClient and provides access to several deprecated methods.
This class fulfills the constraints of quickly generating a value that is unique across shards.
This class holds the SSL Context Provider that MySQL client will use to establish a SSL connection.
This class implements Traversable.
This class implements access to ICU resource data files.
This class is `abstract` and cannot be instantiated, but provides the methods that concrete classes must implement, which are timing information methods regarding a query, connection or a resulting error.
This class is loosely based on the Symfony UniversalClassLoader.
This class is not for measuring time, creating a timestamp on a document or automatically adding or updating a timestamp on a document.
This class is used to create and manage connections.
This class may only be instantiated by ::create or ::createFromRules
This class provides a mechanism to create a pool of connections to a MySQL client that can be utilized and reused as needed.
This class provides round-trip and callback timing information for various operations on the MySQL client.
This class represents iterator objects throughout the intl extension whenever the iterator cannot be identified with any other object provided by the extension.
This class represents the ICU date formatting functionality.
This class represents the ICU number formatting functionality.
This class should be extended to implement custom filters.
This class should be extended to implement custom iterator filters.
This class should be used to save dates to the database and to query for dates.
This command is identical to running:
This comparison is done by a user supplied callback function.
This constant is mapped to ::RS for BC
This controls the probability of the server being selected for operations.
This could be a php.net bug on windows or a windows querk.
This could probably wouldn't be problematic to allow but it is dumb, so.
This covers a bunch of different error conditions that may eventually be moved to more specific exceptions, but will always extend MongoException.
This creates a fresh copy of all database data.
This creates a new token incase the current one does not exist.
This creates a standalone phar file with all of the PHP source included.
This current working directory might be different than you expect it to be, so please use an absolute path in case you specify a file name.
This defers from the PHP behavior.
This defines the character set used in conversion.
This disables mongodb support
This disallows untemplated arrays
This doc comment block generated by idl/sysdoc.php
This doc comment is so helpful and descriptive.
This does not indicate whether the user accepted the cookie.
This does not work as well as might be hoped.
This does not.
This doesn't
This doesn't work for windows, time, atime usage results in very different output to linux.
This drops the database currently being used.
This dual purpose can be useful in many cases involving the need to uniquely identify objects.
This error handler swallows typehint errors, which is disallowed in RepoAuthoritative mode.
This error probably indicates a network error or database corruption.
This essentially means if you specify a key other than 0 or 1, you will get an exception.
This example is from https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/3440
This exception is thrown when exceptional errors occur while using the OAuth extension and contains useful debugging information.
This exception occurs if the driver has already passed your request's response and cannot find your response in its cache.
This expects a number between 0 and PHP_INT_MAX.
This fails, because the return value was discarded
This fails.
This feature must be enabled at compile time using --enable-filehits .
This file is automatically generated.
This file is included in the output.
This file is meant to be used with a benchmarking harness that repeatedly generates include.php to include different subsets of benchmarks  with each invocation of harness-run.php.
This file is part of Composer.
This file is part of PHP-FastCGI-Client.
This file is strict, so the typecheck should complain about an unbound name
This file prints to stdout the contents of ext/standard/html_tables.h
This file was causing an infinite loop in an earlier implementation of --color.
This file will be binary after this point.
This file will be opened from the filesystem and its contents written to standard output.
This finds the address of the secondary currently being used for reads.
This flag was implemented in MongoDB version 1.7.5, so will only work with that version and higher.
This formatter would be used to format or parse numbers.
This function adds another name/value pair to the URL rewrite mechanism.
This function allow you to stream portions of a file at a time, rather than read and parse the whole thing.
This function allows explicitly resetting the error code value either of a socket or of the extension global last error code.
This function allows saving data between requests in a PHP session.
This function allows to use parser inside object.
This function allows you to override the current domain for a single message lookup.
This function allows you to override the current domain for a single plural message lookup.
This function also returns FALSE if the reading of the result set failed.
This function always returns TRUE value.
This function appears in the php source in spl_iterators.c as spl_dual_it_fetch.
This function assigns new keys to the elements in array.
This function calculates and returns the bounding box in pixels for a FreeType text.
This function calculates and returns the bounding box in pixels for a TrueType text.
This function can also be used to open streams to POP3 and NNTP servers, but some functions and features are only available on IMAP servers.
This function can be used e.g. to encrypt message which can be then read only by owner of the private key.
This function can be used to manually search for a class or interface using the registered __autoload functions.
This function can be used to see which parts of the driver's functionality are being logged.
This function can be used to set how verbose logging should be and the types of activities that should be logged.
This function can be used to set which parts of the driver's functionality should be logged.
This function causes a store to delete the specified flag to the flags set for the messages in the specified sequence.
This function checks if the attribute is a defined ID.
This function checks if the node has children.
This function clears the error code on the given socket or the global last socket error if no socket is specified.
This function compress the given string using the Snappy data format.
This function compresses the given string using the lz4lib data format, which is primarily used for compressing and uncompressing memcache values.
This function compresses the given string using the nzlib data format, which is primarily used for compressing and uncompressing memcache values.
This function controls various runtime options for the specified FTP stream.
This function converts Unicode domain name to IDNA ASCII-compatible format.
This function converts number from degrees to the radian equivalent.
This function converts number from radian to degrees.
This function creates a new element node with an associated namespace.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMAttr.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMCDATASection.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMComment.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMDocumentFragment.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMElement.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMEntityReference.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMProcessingInstruction.
This function creates a new instance of class DOMText.
This function decodes data, assumed to be UTF-8 encoded, to ISO-8859-1.
This function discards the contents of the output buffer.
This function discards the contents of the topmost output buffer and turns off this output buffering.
This function doesn't close persistent connections, which are closed only during web-server shutdown/restart.
This function doesn't count overlapped substrings.
This function encodes the string data to UTF-8, and returns the encoded version.
This function fetch all the descendant elements with a given localName and namespaceURI.
This function fetches mail headers for the given sequence and returns an overview of their contents.
This function forces a write of all buffered output to the resource pointed to by the file handle.
This function gets the type of the given resource.
This function has been added to Memcache version 2.0.0.
This function has been added to Memcache version 2.1.0.
This function implements a comparison algorithm that orders alphanumeric strings in the way a human being would, this is described as a "natural ordering".
This function implements a comparison algorithm that orders alphanumeric strings in the way a human being would.
This function implements a sort algorithm that orders alphanumeric strings in the way a human being would while maintaining key/value associations.
This function indicates if two nodes are the same node.
This function inserts a new node right before the reference node.
This function is called `m` because we are returning a `m`ap of `Awaitable`.
This function is called `mf` because we are returning a `m`ap, and we are doing a `f`apping operation.
This function is called `mfk` because we are returning a `m`ap, doing a a `f`iltering operation that includes `k`eys.
This function is called `mfkw` because we are returning a `m`ap, doing a `f`iltering operation on `k`eys and values, and each value member in the `Map` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `mfw` because we are returning a `m`ap, doing a `f`iltering operation and each value member in the `Map` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `mm` because we are returning a `m`ap, and doing a `m`apping operation.
This function is called `mmk` because we are returning a `m`ap and doing a a `m`apping operation that includes `k`eys.
This function is called `mmkw` because we are returning a `m`ap, doing a `m`apping operation on `k`eys and values, and each value member in the `Map` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `mmw` because we are returning a `m`ap, doing a `m`apping operation and each value member in the `Map` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `mw` because we are returning a `m`ap of `Awaitable` `w`rapped into `ResultofExceptionWrapper`s.
This function is called `v` we are returning a `v`ector of `Awaitable`.
This function is called `vf` because we are returning a `v`ector, and we are doing a `f`apping operation.
This function is called `vfk` because we are returning a `v`ector, doing a a `f`iltering operation that includes `k`eys.
This function is called `vfkw` because we are returning a `v`ector, doing a `f`iltering operation that includes both `k`eys and values, and each member of the `Vector` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `vfw` because we are returning a `v`ector, doing a `f`iltering operation and each member of the `Vector` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `vm` because we are returning a `v`ector, and we are doing a `m`apping operation.
This function is called `vmk` because we are returning a `v`ector and doing a `m`apping operation that includes `k`eys.
This function is called `vmkw` because we are returning a `v`ector, doing a `m`apping operation that includes both `k`eys and values, and each member of the `Vector` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `vmw` because we are returning a `v`ector, doing a `m`apping operation and each member of the `Vector` is `w`rapped by a `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
This function is called `vw` because we are returning a `v`ector of `Awaitable` `w`rapped into `ResultofExceptionWrapper`s.
This function is case-sensitive.
This function is deprecated.
This function is equivalent to running:
This function is especially useful for filenames, but may also be used on regular strings.
This function is guaranteed to return a color index for a requested color, either the exact color or the closest possible alternative.
This function is identical to the backtick operator.
This function is intended to be private.
This function is invoked by the xbox facility to start an xbox call task.
This function is meant to ease the task of creating a new socket which only listens to accept new connections.
This function is not intended to be called directly by user code.
This function is only available if your system supports it and you're using the CLI, CGI or Embed SAPI.
This function is only used by PHP internally, it shouldn't need to ever be called by the user.
This function is only useful for Japanese.
This function is similar to DOMDocument::getElementsByTagName but searches for an element with a given id.
This function is specific to sockets and cannot be used on any other type of resources.
This function is used to set any of the formatter attributes.
This function is useful in preventing user-supplied text from containing HTML markup, such as in a message board or guest book application.
This function is useful to check if the SOAP call failed, but without using exceptions.
This function is usually called after building a new dom document from scratch as in the example below.
This function makes it possible to run PHP applications designed to run off of a hard disk as a phar application.
This function makes the debugger break on the specific line as if a normal file/line breakpoint was set on this line.
This function may also be called statically to load and create a DOMDocument object.
This function only works with UTF-8 encoded strings.
This function replaces the child oldnode with the passed new node.
This function returns a copy of str, translating all occurrences of each character in from to the corresponding character in to.
This function returns a copy of the node to import and associates it with the current document.
This function returns a new instance of class DOMNodeList containing the elements with a given tag name.
This function returns a new instance of the class DOMNodeList of all descendant elements with a given tag name, in the order in which they are encountered in a preorder traversal of this element tree.
This function returns a string or an array with all occurrences of search in subject replaced with the given replace value.
This function returns a string with whitespace stripped from the beginning and end of str.
This function returns a string with whitespace stripped from the end of str.
This function returns a unique identifier for the object.
This function returns an array with the current available SPL classes.
This function returns an array with the name of the parent classes of the given class.
This function returns an array with the names of the interfaces that the given class and its parents implement.
This function returns an array with the names of the traits that the given class uses.
This function returns low level raw pointer the object.
This function returns the UID for the given message sequence number.
This function returns the filename that contains the function/method that called the current function/method.
This function returns the line number that contains the function/method that called the current function/method.
This function returns the name of the class from which the current function/method was called from.
This function returns the name of the function/method from which the current function/method was called from.
This function returns the names of all the functions defined in the module indicated by module_name.
This function returns the names of all the modules compiled and loaded in the PHP interpreter.
This function returns the number of deleted records plus the number of inserted records.
This function returns the offset to GMT for the date/time specified in the datetime parameter.
This function returns the portion of haystack which starts at the last occurrence of needle and goes until the end of haystack.
This function returns the soap version that is currently active.
This function returns the time when the data blocks of a file were being written to, that is, the time when the content of the file was changed.
This function returns the value for the requested option from the specified FTP connection.
This function returns the value of a database connection attribute.
This function returns this object if present, or NULL.
This function sets whether or not to use the SOAP error handler in the SOAP server.
This function should be used to escape individual arguments to shell functions coming from user input.
This function simplifies the common pattern of checking for an index in an array and selecting a default value if it does not exist.
This function sorts an array such that array indices maintain their correlation with the array elements they are associated with, using a user-defined comparison function.
This function sorts an array such that array indices maintain their correlation with the array elements they are associated with.
This function sorts an array.
This function starts gathering the information for code coverage.
This function starts running a suite, but stops between each individual benchmark in the suite and returns a continuation function which can be invoked to run the next benchmark.
This function stops collecting information, the information in memory will be destroyed.
This function takes a node of a DOM document and makes it into a SimpleXML node.
This function takes a string as a parameter and should return a string.
This function takes the node node of class SimpleXML and makes it into a DOMElement node.
This function throws an exception if this Vector is empty.
This function tries to return a string with all NUL bytes, HTML and PHP tags stripped from a given str.
This function uncompress a compressed string.
This function will not return configuration information set when the PHP was compiled, or read from an Apache configuration file.
This function will recur into deeper arrays.
This function will return -1 on error.
This function will return FALSE for symlinks pointing to non-existing files.
This function will return the number of days in the month of year for the specified calendar.
This function will set a callback function to be called for MongoLog events instead of triggering warnings.
This function will sort an array by its values using a user-supplied comparison function.
This function will turn output buffering on.
This function's behavior is controlled by the url_rewriter.tags php.ini parameter.
This functions appends a child to an existing list of children or creates a new list of children.
This functions removes a child from a list of children.
This functions returns the input string padded on the left, the right, or both sides to the specified padding length.
This geometry defines a subregion of the image to crop.
This geometry defines the final size of the image.
This gets converted to string
This gets the bitwise `OR` of the flags that are set for a given column.
This handler function needs to accept one parameter, which will be the exception object that was thrown.
This handler is used by other handlers.
This has no effect on the query if all shards are reachable.
This however will fail with no connection.
This id can be used as a hash key for storing objects or for identifying an object.
This implementation detail may, at any time, change without prior notice.
This implementation detail should not be relied upon, as it may change.
This implementation is not compatible with PHP's.
This implementation of the DeltaBlue benchmark is derived from the Smalltalk implementation by John Maloney and Mario Wolczko.
This implies that the output format is human-readable.
This indicated that the server string was malformed.
This information can be used to know how the performance of the MySQL client may have affected a given result.
This information can be used to know how the performance of the MySQL client may have affected the connecting operation.
This information can be used to know how the performance of the MySQL client may have affected the operation that produced the error.
This information can be used to know how the performance of the MySQL client may have affected the query operation.
This information can be used to know how the performance of the MySQL client may have affected the result.
This interface represents a known entity, either parsed or unparsed, in an XML document.
This invalid UTF-8 subsequence prevents users from entering this string to prevent accidental collisions.
This is B's doc comment.
This is a JavaScript implementation of the Richards benchmark from:
This is a a string where each character is an option.
This is a case where global dce can change the type of locals across blocks.
This is a copy of zend/bad/ext/pcntl/tests/003.php 003.php.skipif is overly-cautious, so skips this test
This is a debug function, which dump directly the data on the normal output.
This is a fairly aggressive test that looks at user streams and also gives the seek/gets/buffer layer of streams a thorough testing
This is a fairly serious error and may not have a stack trace.
This is a generated file, do not modify
This is a generated file.
This is a limitation of the current approach to checking switch case labels.
This is a micro-test for a specific, tricky bug in the jit.
This is a modified version of zend test DOMDocument_saveHTML_error2.php.
This is a no-op for heaps as the iterator is virtual and in fact never moves from the top of the heap.
This is a noop fallthrough so we should not do an intersect
This is a short, usually less than 16 character "handle" of the group, not the real, full name.
This is a short, usually less than 16 character "handle" of the user, not the real, full name.
This is a static method.
This is a synchronous function.
This is a test that checks that CGetM in the IR properly cleans the stack before operations that can throw.
This is a tricky function to use and we are actually thinking of deprecating it.
This is a valid comment inside a method
This is a very simple test which simply confirms that exceptions flowing around continuations don't disturb step over.
This is a very slow operation on a large database.
This is a wrapper for a database command.
This is a wrapper function as lz4compress is now lz4_compress  https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/pull/3169 - 11/07/2014
This is a wrapper function as lz4hccompress is now lz4_hccompress  https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/pull/3169 - 11/07/2014
This is a wrapper function as lz4uncompress is now lz4_uncompress  https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/pull/3169 - 11/07/2014
This is a wrapper function as sncompress is now snappy_compress  https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/pull/3258 - 23/07/2014
This is a wrapper function as snuncompress is now snappy_uncompress  https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/pull/3258 - 23/07/2014
This is actually fine.
This is also useful if a builtin is renamed - a wrapper class/function can be added.
This is an HHVM only function that gets the raw text associated with a default parameter.
This is an advanced function and should not be used unless you know what you're doing.
This is an interface.
This is an internal engine interface which cannot be implemented in PHP scripts.
This is as unmistakably UTF-8 as it gets.
This is because Zend is more liberal about passing in the current instance to the callee.
This is because the SPL implementation does not fetch when it's walking the iterator - it only fetches when it reaches the right position.
This is beyond the control of the driver...
This is bogus and should produce warning
This is bogus but will work fine
This is called "stay optimization".
This is deliberately an unconfigurable convenience wrapper.
This is described as a "natural ordering".
This is done so that you can pick random keys as well as values out of the array.
This is due to the fact that zip support in PHP is read only access.
This is either the first time we run the unit tests, and all pass because we are establishing a baseline.
This is equivalent to searching the entire directory.
This is expected to fatal due to embedded newline in the cookie domain.
This is expected to fatal due to embedded newline in the cookie name.
This is expected to fatal due to embedded newline in the cookie path.
This is expected to fatal due to embedded newline in the header.
This is expected to pass.
This is expected: see bug 46900.
This is f's doc comment.
This is g's doc comment.
This is going to take the strTestResult branch.
This is hacky, but it works in all cases and doesn't require parsing xml.
This is handled in the JIT, and should it trigger COW.
This is hardcoded and can not be changed with allowable_tags.
This is how privates are handled in normal inheritance
This is how publics are handled in normal inheritance
This is identical to running:
This is identical to the function:
This is in the default stub, but lets ignore it for now
This is intended for use much like the __FILE__ magic constant, and only has effect inside an executing phar archive.
This is largely a copy of '/hphp/system/php/collections/collections.ns.php' it has been modified to work with php.
This is more general and adaptive than variant one, but not as efficient.
This is most likely due to a problem initializing the socket.
This is most likely not implemented on your operating system.
This is most useful for assigning an alias to a phar so that subsequent references to the phar can use the shorter alias, or for loading Phar archives that only contain data and are not intended for execution/inclusion in PHP scripts.
This is non-standard
This is not good, but it currently happens nonetheless.
This is not the class you are looking for.
This is not to be confused with the API version that the loaded phar extension will use to create new phars.
This is null when retrieving the type constant for a type alias.
This is of interest to people concerned about security whose input is from a string.
This is okay because we reuse the xml namespace from the document
This is okay since we are in partial mode
This is one of the IntlDateFormatter constants.
This is only applicable when running a sharded MongoDB cluster and connecting to a mongos.
This is only meaningful in a pagelet thread.
This is parsed as the "first following Monday OR the current day if it is a Monday"
This is parsed as the "first following Monday after the first Monday in December"
This is parsed as the "second following Monday OR the first following  Monday if the current day is a Monday"
This is parsed as the "second following Monday after the first Monday in December"
This is parsed as the "third following Monday OR the second following  Monday if the current day is a Monday"
This is parsed as the "third following Monday after the first Monday in December"
This is particularly useful for `INSERT`, `DELETE`, `UPDATE` statements.
This is particularly useful for `SELECT` statements.
This is particularly useful for counting all the elements of a multidimensional array.
This is probably the more common of the two query methods, given its flexibility and automatic escaping in most string cases.
This is sweeping the problem under the rug.
This is test 36 from the pecl extension.
This is the PDO way to close a connection
This is the cleanest way of getting a database.
This is the default option.
This is the easiest way of getting a collection from a database object.
This is the first method called when starting a foreach loop.
This is the handler signature:    voidhandler Exceptionex NULL may be passed instead, to reset this handler to its default state.
This is the most derived class in which the type constant is declared.
This is the only message type where the fourth parameter, extra_headers is used.
This is the optimal way of parsing a mail file that you have on disk.
This is the point when the switch from Julian dates to Gregorian dates occurred.
This is the problematic case, setImageFormat doesn't really affect writeImageFile.
This is the runtime version of DomainException.
This is the same as the skeleton, except that differences in length are minimized so as to only preserve the difference between string and numeric form.
This is the standard DeltaBlue benchmark.
This is the static implementation.
This is to trigger a specific refcounting bug in the VM, to do with object initialization templates.
This is typically "could not find hhconfig", which of course uses the same exit code as "type error".
This is typically used to add extra headers.
This is used by some of the static creation methods to bypass unnecessary iteration.
This is used for local files, not URLs.
This is used mainly when sorting associative arrays where the actual element order is significant.
This is used only with consistent distribution option and usually corresponds to the amount of memory available to memcache on that server.
This is used when the input skeleton contains both date and time fields, but there is not a close match among the added patterns.
This is useful because SplFileObject contains additional methods for manipulating the file whereas SplFileInfo is only useful for gaining information, like whether the file is writable.
This is useful for creating flood-fill-like effects in palleted images without the overhead of performing the actual flood-fill.
This is useful for diagnose why server crashed.
This is useful for escaping the delimiter that is required by the PCRE functions.
This is useful for gracefully displaying something helpful information to end users when a fatal error has happened.
This is useful for polling.
This is useful for typing deserialized enum values.
This is useful if a locale is known under different names on different systems or for providing a fallback for a possibly not available locale.
This is useful if you would like to write programs working only on some versions of PHP.
This is useful mainly for associative arrays.
This is useful to help ensure that a malicious user hasn't tried to trick the script into working on files upon which it should not be working--for instance, /etc/passwd.
This is useful to quickly determine the version of the client library to know if some capability exits.
This is useful when handling a fatal error.
This is useful when trying to optimize calls for statistics gathering.
This is useful when using PHP as a mail client for multiple users.
This is useful when xdebug.auto_trace is enabled.
This is useful, for example, to determine which process sent the message that was just received.
This is usually a string, with possible placeholders.
This is usually run from the shell or the command line, not the driver.
This is usually used to validate the integrity of data being transmitted.
This is very much like the value normally returned, except that a result identifier is always returned when a search was made.
This is weird.
This is why we need to use sockets.
This isn't because the xml namespace isn't there and we can't create it
This isn't really a difference method, it lies
This kind of exceptions should directly lead to a fix in your code.
This line will trigger fromUCallback
This line will trigger toUCallback
This list is traversed by constraint strength, strongest first, as a heuristic for avoiding unnecessarily adding and then overriding weak constraints.
This looks like something we could detect as an error, but doing it would require a lot of special casing, manual expanding of typedefs and traversing of Tunresolved to ban this case but allow the above ones.
This may be a Pear thing, a PHPUnit running phpt thing, or or something else.
This may be useful to detect within a part of the application if an error occurred or not.
This may result in unexpected behavior when using an object or NULL replacement.
This may work on FreeBSD but has not been tested.
This means any string or int will be accepted.
This means it will also check the types of the needle in the haystack, and objects must be the same instance.
This means that dates do not contain timezone information.
This means that in i.e. the default "C" locale, characters such as umlaut-A will not be converted.
This means that the driver couldn't get a response from the connection.
This means that the same number has different monetary values depending on the currency locale.
This means that they cannot be declared inside functions, loops or if statements.
This means that when a character can't be represented in the target charset, it can be approximated through one or several similarly looking characters.
This means that you will not be able to define your own classes using these names.
This means we do not need to generate expression dependent types for these classes
This means you must pass it a real variable and not a function returning an array because only actual variables may be passed by reference.
This method accepts either a variable amount of pipeline operators, or a single array of operators constituting the pipeline.
This method acts as if you saved and then loaded the document, putting the document in a "normal" form.
This method acts as the constructor of the object.
This method acts as the destructor of the object.
This method allows you to register your own extended DOM class to be used afterward by the PHP DOM extension.
This method allows you to run arbitrary JavaScript on the database.
This method automatically sets the iterator mode to SplDoublyLinkedList::IT_MODE_LIFO.
This method cannot be called when the ArrayObject was constructed from an object.
This method causes its connection to be authenticated.
This method checks if the database has more batches or if the result set has been exhausted.
This method checks if the node has attributes.
This method counts the number of children of an element.
This method creates an index on the collection and the specified fields.
This method determines if HHVM was built with the EXSLT library.
This method does not actually follow the reference, so it does not determine if it is broken or not.
This method does not affect the state of the cursor: if you haven't queried yet, you can still apply limits, skips, etc.
This method enables the ability to use PHP functions as XSLT functions within XSL stylesheets.
This method enables the ability to use PHP functions within XPath expressions.
This method implements a sort algorithm that orders alphanumeric strings in the way a human being would while maintaining key/value associations.
This method imports the stylesheet into the XSLTProcessor for transformations.
This method is available in case the MongoDB wire protocol has acquired a new flag, and the driver has not been updated with a method for this new flag.
This method is basically: MongoDB implies a return statement if you have a single statement on a single line.
This method is called after each foreach loop.
This method is called by PHP itself when the session is started.
This method is equivalent to:
This method is identical to running:    Once a connection has been authenticated, it can only be un-authenticated by using the "logout" database command:
This method is identical to:
This method is identical to:    Each index, when created, is given a unique name.
This method is not meant to be called directly.
This method is not part of the DOM standard.
This method is not used in normal operations.
This method is not very useful for normal MongoDB use.
This method is only useful with a connection to a replica set.
This method is to be used with tailable cursors.
This method is used to create capped collections and other collections requiring special options.
This method is useful for database drivers that do not support executing a PDOStatement object when a previously executed PDOStatement object still has unfetched rows.
This method may also be called statically to load and create a DOMDocument object.
This method may not return a meaningful or consistent result across different PDO drivers, because the underlying database may not even support the notion of auto-increment fields or sequences.
This method only works for database drivers that support transactions.
This method only works for static properties when used on internal classes.
This method overwrites the MongoClient constructor and turns off acknowledged writes.
This method returns a stream resource that can be used with all file functions in PHP that deal with reading files.
This method returns the last database error that occurred and how many operations ago it occurred.
This method sets the batchSize value to configure the amount of documents retrieved from the server in one data packet.
This method should be used to convert a tar archive to zip format or vice-versa.
This method should retrieve the session data from storage by the session ID provided.
This method will destroy the current `AsyncMysqlConnection` object and give you back a vanilla, synchronous MySQL resource.
This method will return an `ImmVector` with keys 0 and 1, and values 0 and 1, since the keys of a `Pair` are 0 and 1.
This more than covers the period when the calendar was in use.
This must be a one character string.
This must be an integer greater than 0.
This must be the public key corresponding to the private key used for signing.
This name can then be used with admin commands to retrieve stats while server is running.
This needs to be cleaned up in a follow up before the following will work
This needs to be fixed.
This new object can then be used as a native DOMElement node.
This new object can then be used as a native SimpleXML element.
This one should fail.
This only returns errors regarding the whole multi stack.
This option allows mongos to send partial query results if a shard is unreachable.
This option is disabled by default because there are a lot of broken mail user agents that don't follow the specification and don't produce correct MIME headers.
This pair is returned in a four-element array, with the keys 0, 1, key, and value.
This parameter can NOT override server-side preset sizelimit.
This parameter can NOT override server-side preset timelimit.
This parameter can be also an integer holding a filter constant.
This parameter is case-insensitive.
This parameter is defaulted to FALSE.
This parameter is ignored.
This parameter is not automatically encoded.
This parameter is not normally needed, but can be useful for working around problems with some ODBC drivers.
This parameter is typically 0.
This parameter may also specify other transports like unix:///path/to/memcached.sock to use UNIX domain sockets, in this case port must also be set to 0.
This parameter may be an , with the name of the class, and the method, or a , with a function name.
This parameter may be an array, with the name of the class, and the method, or a string, with a function name.
This parameter may be omitted when inside a class.
This parameter only applies when not making asynchronous connection attempts.
This parameter represents the variation on the quantum range.
This parameter was added in Imagick version 2.0.1.
This parser uses DOUBLE type by default.
This particular soundex function is one described by Donald Knuth in "The Art Of Computer Programming, vol.
This procedure created problems for localizers because the sentence structure, word order, number format and so on are very different from language to language.
This process is most important when text needs to be compared for sorting and searching, but it is also used when storing text to ensure that the text is stored in a consistent representation.
This produces the
This property has a comment.
This provokes a difference in behaviour when changing the number of elements in the array while iterating over it.
This represents errors that cannot be detected at compile time.
This represents errors that should be detected at compile time.
This returns a specific error message to help diagnose the problem and a numeric error code associated with the cause of the exception.
This returns an exponentially-smoothed average.
This returns the current database profiling level.
This returns the hostname MongoId is using to generate unique ids.
This script allows us to more easily test the key OSS PHP frameworks that is helping bring HHVM closer to parity.
This script creates zend_vm_execute.h and zend_vm_opcodes.h from existing zend_vm_def.h and zend_vm_execute.skl
This script is used by hhvm debugger to initiate a php-only dummy connection to itself so that it can perform global php evaluation from console window.
This script lists extension-, class- and method names that contain any underscores.
This script will generate a Seg Fault on Linux
This serialization matches the output of xdebug_var_dump, but isn't useful because there isn't a way to unserialize the string.
This serves as a baseclass for iterators for all the containers.
This sets the specified index in the palette to the specified color.
This should be a different expression id since the case may fallthrough
This should be a value between 0 and PHP_INT_MAX.
This should be an error, because parent
This should be an error, but it's broken for shapes too...
This should be disallowed -- PHP will parse it wrong.
This should be fine, although somewhat silly.
This should be reset to 0 when replacement starts.
This should be the same as the name parameter used when calling the function, and hence redundant.
This should be the same as the username parameter used when calling the function, and hence redundant.
This should be the uncompressed length you wish to read.
This should call C1::foo, not D1::foo
This should call C2::foo, not D2::foo
This should call C3::foo, not D3::foo
This should fail for using a nonexistent class constant.
This should fail to check
This should fail, the PS protocol should not support it.
This should fail.
This should indicate a man-in-the-middle attack.
This should not be a dynamic class.
This should not call C::foo, it should fatal
This should only be listed once in the output.
This should raise an error because we are incrementing a string.
This should show the identical warning
This should throw a warning and return NULL since an argument is missing
This shouldn't affect floats, but let's check that.
This signature is a hash calculated on the entire phar's contents, and may be used to verify the integrity of the archive.
This sort of check is especially important if there is any chance that anything done with uploaded files could reveal their contents to the user, or even to other users on the same system.
This soundex function returns a string 4 characters long, starting with a letter.
This source code is licensed under the BSD-style license found in the LICENSE file in the "hack" directory of this source tree.
This source code is licensed under the BSD-style license found in the LICENSE file in the root directory of this source tree.
This special type of socket can be used to manually construct any type of protocol.
This statement will not parse in Hack, but we should not raise an error in decl mode.
This string includes an invalid UTF-8 sequence.
This takes time.
This test also needs to exclude the protected and private variables  since they cannot be accessed from the external object which iterates  them.
This test checks for: - inherited constructors/destructors are not called automatically - base classes know about derived properties in constructor/destructor - base class constructors/destructors know the instanciated class name
This test demonstrates the expected behavior of various input scenarios, where 'expected' is defined as the behavior that exists in php's mail-mailparse package...
This test exercises the register allocator, because it results in a single big tracelet that has more live values in flight than there are physical registers.
This test illustrates the danger with instantiating a non-covariant type variable with this.
This test is a modified version of the original test, bug54265.php, which has been moved to 'bad'.
This test is coded to work with or without the crlf.
This test is currently just making sure we don't totally explode.
This test is failing due to this wrogn check
This test is purely to see whether the function recognises the encoding.
This test is sensitive to what gets jitted vs.
This test might get very long depending on the mashine it's running on.
This test relies on someexception having a lower litstr id to reproduce a specific bug.
This test verifies our ability to typecheck the body of a lambda when it is used as an argument to a generically-typed higher-order function.
This test verifies that the casting mechanism is working correctly.
This test verifies that we are doing the trivial strict equality test at the right point
This tests the parser.
This typically occurs when APC is not enabled.
This uses very much mem.
This value must be in the range from 0 to number of fields - 1.
This value must be one of either SQLITE3_ASSOC, SQLITE3_NUM, or SQLITE3_BOTH.
This value should be generated randomly.
This variable will contain the end position if the parse fails.
This violates an invariant stated in PHP5's documentation at http://us.php.net/lsb which states "In non-static contexts, the called class will be the class of the object instance." For these cases, HipHop reconciles this issue by setting the late bound class to the class of the current instance if there is one.
This way not only versions with different levels like '4.1' and '4.1.2' can be compared but also any PHP specific version containing development state.
This way oop_class gets some singleton behavior since it will be created only once for all insatnces of oop_test.
This way, all scores are relative to a reference run and higher scores implies better performance.
This weirdly is a valid statement for newlocale/uselocale but not for setlocale.
This will always return 0 in the current implementation.
This will be called, for each namespace declaration, after the handler for the end tag of the element in which the namespace was declared.
This will cause elements with higher keys to be renumbered.
This will disable tests too upon install.
This will fail, but it shouldn't mess up the already set LC_TIME category
This will generate a unreachable funclet-protected code.
This will make the processor use the default value for the parameter as specified in the stylesheet.
This will not create file and line items for the call into the error handler
This will not equal the record's original ttl, but will rather equal the original ttl minus whatever length of time has passed since the authoritative name server was queried.
This will not work on Windows.
This will now contain the previous warning
This will only dumps the parameters in the statement at the moment of the dump.
This will only return `true` for provided keys of 0 and 1 since those are the only two keys that can exist in a `Pair`.
This will only return `true` if the provided key is 0 or 1.
This will pass even though there is a newline in the value.
This will return the length of the contents in the output buffer.
This will sort based on path, not including any appended file.
This will trigger an error since it is not ReflectionParameter or ReflectionFunctionAbstract
This works fine if we use simplexml_load_string.
This works without this line
Those arrays must be of the same size as the link identifier array since the first entries of the arrays are used for one search, the second entries are used for another, and so on.
Those coming with BSD sockets background will recognize that those socket resource arrays are in fact the so-called file descriptor sets.
Those works.
Though not recommended, this function may also be called statically to load and create a DOMDocument object.
Three comes from 'RGB', three values per pixel
Three independent arrays of socket resources are watched.
Throw an exception with the class of the given name
Throw from the user error handler after raising a warning about arg count.
Throw out any initial blank lines
Throw some bad apples in there.
Throwing an exception is different from PHP5, which allows for the ReflectionObject to be created but then fatal hard.
Thrown when the driver fails to connect to the database.
Thrown when there are errors reading or writing files to or from the database.
Thrown when unable to parse an option list
Throws ImagickPixelException on error.
Throws ImagickPixelException on failure.
Throws InvalidArgumentException, if Awaitable does not support cancellation.
Throws an InvalidOperationException if the Awaitable is not finished.
Throws for non-xbox threads.
Thus there is no overhead in adding a large number of servers to the pool, even though they might not all be used.
Thus, after a few minutes, the cursor "times out" and the database assumes the client has gotten everything it needs and cleans up its the cursor's resources.
Thus, after you connect, this function will return NULL even if there are secondaries available.
Thus, encountering a marked node downstream of the output constraint means that there is a path from the constraint's output to one of its inputs.
Thus, if a query is sorted by a given field in ascending order, any document with a MongoMaxKey as its value will be returned last.
Thus, if a query is sorted by a given field in ascending order, any document with a MongoMinKey as its value will be returned first.
Thus, if you named an index "superfast query", you could only delete it with the PHP driver by running:    To find what an index is named, you can query the system.indexes collection of a database and look for the name field.
Thus, the best way to delete indexes created in the shell or with custom names is to directly call the deleteIndexes database command.
Thus, this test is set to be norepo.
Thus, to return only the "summary" field, one could say:    To return all fields except the "hidden" field:
Tidy up after test
Time is not mentioned
Time should be given in seconds.
Timeout error  Code: 13  If there was an error while waiting for a query to complete.
Timezone with Latitude, Longitude and GMT offset
Timezones must be stored in a separate field if needed.
Timezones with required data for date_sunrise
Tip If you need to know the number of nodes in the collection, use the length property of the DOMNodeList object.
TipA URL can be used as a filename with this function if the fopen wrappers have been enabled.
To accommodate this, we prepend any key with a special string prefix, "INT" when it's an int, and "STRING" when its a string.
To accomplish this you have to name the different format codes and separate them by a slash /.
To apply to more than one channel, combine channeltype constants using bitwise operators.
To check whether the system is using a configuration file, try retrieving the value of the cfg_file_path configuration setting.
To counter-act this, replace these occurrences with a double dot.
To create an instance that persists between requests, use persistent_id to specify a unique ID for the instance.
To do this you use an array of link identifiers, rather than a single identifier, as the first argument.
To export all the functions, pass a special constant SOAP_FUNCTIONS_ALL.
To export several functions, pass an array of function names.
To fetch only the unique values of a single column from the result set, bitwise-OR PDO::FETCH_COLUMN with PDO::FETCH_UNIQUE.
To get the documents themselves, you can use one of the methods shown above.
To get the output of the executed command, be sure to set and use the output parameter.
To indicate that a parameter is an OUT parameter from a stored procedure, you must explicitly set the length.
To limit the query, specify the optional type parameter.
To make cookies visible on all subdomains then the domain must be prefixed with a dot like '.php.net'.
To make the tar or zip non-executable, the phar stub and phar alias files are removed from the newly created archive.
To make this function available on Windows you must compile your own PHP binaries.
To modify the list of file extensions, simply invoke the functions with the new list of file extensions to use in a single string with each extensions separated by comma.
To move to a position before the end-of-file, you need to pass a negative value in offset and set whence to SEEK_END.
To return an INOUT parameter from a stored procedure, use the bitwise OR operator to set the PDO::PARAM_INPUT_OUTPUT bits for the data_type parameter.
To return an array consisting of all values of a single column from the result set, specify PDO::FETCH_COLUMN.
To return an associative array grouped by the values of a specified column, bitwise-OR PDO::FETCH_COLUMN with PDO::FETCH_GROUP.
To return several values they must return an array with named output parameters.
To return the document with the modifications made on the update, use the new option.
To set a mode, the mode character must be the last one set, however there can only be set one mode but multiple options.
To show variables with numerical prefixes cannot be extracted
To start over, or to tokenize a new string you simply call strtok with the string argument again to initialize it.
To test this PEAR package should be installed
To use LDAP with SSL, compile OpenLDAP 2.x.x with SSL support, configure PHP with SSL, and set this parameter as ldaps://hostname/.
To use it, create a SoapClient object with the exceptions option set to zero or FALSE.
Toggles indentation on or off.
Toggles the compression status of HipHop output, if headers have already been sent this may be ignored.
Too few args
Too few arguments
Too few parameters
Too many args
Too many parameters
Toplevel functions with static local singletons.
Total of all connection weights, used as divisor in key distribution
Trait binding after anon class
Trait that ensures that all mutableish methods that are implemented by immutable vectors throws errors.
Trait that implements all mutating methods of Vectors.
Trait to share behavior between containers that behave like vectors.
Traits are flattend into a class, and that semantics is nothing like a type, or interface, and thus, not propergated.
Translate a `KeyedTraversable` of `Awaitables` into a single `Awaitable of `Map`.
Translate a `KeyedTraversable` of `Awaitables` into a single `Awaitable` of `Map` of key/`ResultOrExceptionWrapper` pairs.
Translate a `Traversable` of `Awaitables` into a single `Awaitable` of `Vector` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
Translate a `Traversable` of `Awaitables` into a single `Awaitable` of `Vector`.
Transliterator provides transliteration of strings.
Transport endpoint is not connected  Generally means that the connection string isn't correct, the driver couldn't even find the database server.
Trigger COW
Trigger run_intercept_handler_for_invokefunc codepath
Truecolor image
Truncates string str to specified width.
Try creating collator with different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try deleting a file which is already deleted
Try getting the default Locale with different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the display_language for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the display_name for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the display_region for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the display_script for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the display_variant for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the keywords for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the prmary language for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try getting the region for different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try it again
Try it with a builtin, too.
Try it with no catch also.
Try normalization and test normalization with Procedural and Object methods.
Try on a StdClass
Try on an object other than the one already bound
Try out G bases as well.
Try parsing different Locales   with Procedural and Object methods.
Try parsing different Locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try reading some or all content of the file opened in write only mode
Try setting the default Locale with different locales with Procedural and Object methods.
Try specifying a correct attribute.
Try specifying an incorrect attribute.
Try subtracting from expected result.
Try the most common flags for 'version'
Try to access constants defined in an included file
Try to access wrong key so a Notice is raised
Try to be idempotent
Try to break stuff
Try to compare long strings.
Try to defeat any possible inlining / constant folding.
Try to fill border
Try to get the deleted keys, should give empty array
Try to include a non-existant file
Try to see if there is a signature
Try to set/get a collation attribute.
Try to set/get collation strength.
Try to sort test data.
Try to specify valid and invalid locale types when getting locale.
Try to unlink file when file handle is still in use
Try to use array key as property
Try to use unserialzied object
Try to use unspecialized handler
Trying different invalid values for 'input' array argument
Trying to copy the links across dir paths given in various notations and dirs having limited access
Trying to create the file in a dir with permissions from 0000 to 0777, Allowable permissions: files are expected to be created in the input dir  Non-allowable permissions: files are expected to be created in '/tmp' dir
Trying to create unique files by passing previously created unique file name as prefix
Trying to do so will result in a RuntimeException being thrown.
Trying to hack around MySQL Server version dependent features 2030 This command is not supported in the prepared statement protocol yet
Trying to pick more elements than there are in the array will result in an E_WARNING level error.
Tuple-like arrays are subtypes of all the special interfaces that arrays are too.
Tuple-like arrays have integer keys
Turn file path into unix:///path/to/sock
Turn off autocommit using a server variable
Turn off strice mode, since it does not allow uninitialized session ID
Turn on code coverage by Eval.RecordCodeCoverage or by using fb_enable_code_coverage and call this function periodically to get results.
Turns encryption on/off on an already connected socket.
Turns off autocommit mode.
Turns off the usual SSL peer certificate and host checks, this is not for production environments.
Turns on searching the include path for class files.
Turns on verbose request information useful for debugging, the debug information is stored in the debugInfo member.
Turns the specified dn, into a more user-friendly form, stripping off type names.
Tweak specific SSL checks for requests.
Two Arguments, second as prefix but without prefix string as third argument
Two arguments, less than expected no.
Two styles of iterators are supported, iterators that map the filename within the tar/zip to the name of a file on disk, and iterators like DirectoryIterator that return SplFileInfo objects.
Type Constants are case sensitive
Type hints are missing as any classes that implements this interface must specify types, meaning that no classes written in PHP can implement this interface if type hints are included.
Type of serialization to use with values stored in redis
Typecheck the currently running endpoint with a given `hh_client`.
Typechecker must consider this nullable
Typechecker should complain about a type mismatch between the typehint and the default value
Typechecker should detect a mismatch here
Typedefs are in the same namespace as classes.
Types array, object and resource are not scalar.
Typical situations lie somewhere between these two extremes.
Typically all the memory allocated for the LDAP result gets freed at the end of the script.
Typically this happens when a function calls another function and expects the return value to be of a certain type or value not including arithmetic or buffer related errors.
Typically you will get 1.
Typically, the message format will come from resources and the arguments will be dynamically set at runtime.
Typically, these expressions will be used to query the database and find matching strings.
UCOL_GREATER
UDP will never cause a connection error, as it is a connection-LESS protocol
UNSAFE_BLOCK
UNSAFE_EXPR
UNSAFE_EXPR -- roflcopter
UNSAFE_EXPR Multiline comments should not cause following line numbers to break.
UNumberFormatAttribute
UNumberFormatPadPosition
UNumberFormatRoundingMode
UNumberFormatStyle constants
UNumberFormatSymbol
UNumberFormatTextAttribute
URI no port
USING VARIABLE VARIABLE
UTF-8  ASCII compatible multi-byte 8-bit Unicode.
UTF-8 ASCII compatible multi-byte 8-bit Unicode.
UTF-8 Note: either convert_encoding or strlen has problem
UTF-8 This works in PHP 5.x currently, but fatals in HHVM right now
UTF-8 assumed
UTF-8 is a standard mechanism used by Unicode for encoding wide character values into a byte stream.
UTF-8 this is an ISO-8859-1 currency sign, but ISO-8859-15 euro sign
Uh oh, we set the member variable to a Foo inside a Foo2
Un-quotes a quoted string.
Unbinds from the LDAP directory.
Uncomment this line if you have libxml 2.6.17 or CVS version after 2005/02/22 earlier versions segfault
Unconditionally defined functions
Undefined data
Undefined offset: 2
Undefined offset: 2, 1, 0
Undefined values here allow a benchmark to define behaviour itself.
Under PHP, if omitted, the crypto_type context option on the stream's SSL context will be used instead.
Undocumented behavior but Zend does it and frameworks rely on it, so..
Unexpected values to be passed as arguments
Unfolding inner array tree.
Unfortunately, zend_strtod doesn't handle Nan's and Infs
Unicode Security and Spoofing Detection http://icu-project.org/apiref/icu4c/uspoof_8h.html
Unicode is on and we are told that the MySQL column type is a binary type.
Unixified Dir
Unixified Dir Or File
Unixified File
Unknown browser uses defaults.
Unless otherwise noted the functions in this class are tolerant of both formats.
Unless you are writing something that interacts with the sharding internals, stop, go directly to MongoDate, do not pass go, do not collect 200 dollars.
Unlike loading XML, HTML does not have to be well-formed to load.
Unlike the implementing function, doesn't have an arg type
Unpacks from a binary string into an array according to the given format.
Unquoted keys
Unregister a function from the spl provided __autoload stack.
Unregisters this instance as an autoloader.
Unserialization can remove static-ness, and we don't try to enforce that it has the same value, which means even if a property is only initialized with a in-class initializer it should not be inferred as a SStr or SArr.
Unserialization does not check values, so property types do not infer specific values.
Unserialization is case-insensitive.
Unsetting array indexes should be fine
Unsigned Integer type variation
Unsubscribe from the specified mailbox.
Until PHP 4.3.0, omitting it would assume 1024 as the line length.
Until we know for sure, let's just create a php symlink to hhvm
Up to nine substrings may be used.
Update an existing old value to a new value.
Update any git hashes in case --latest or --latest-record was used and we changed the hashes currently in frameworks.json.
Update the walkabout strengths and stay flags of all variables downstream of the given constraint.
Updating code according to selected threading model
Upon failure, FALSE is returned.
Upon successful completion the message queue data structure is updated as follows: msg_lrpid is set to the process-ID of the calling process, msg_qnum is decremented by 1 and msg_rtime is set to the current time.
Upon successful completion the message queue data structure is updated as follows: msg_lspid is set to the process-ID of the calling process, msg_qnum is incremented by 1 and msg_stime is set to the current time.
Upper case columns
Usage of literal syntax for collections has been modified to make use of the syntax within this library.
Use "class::method" for method name.
Use 'arc liberate' to rebuild it.
Use 0 for auto-select.
Use PHP's maximum integer value as array key then try and push new elements onto the array
Use `await` or `join` to get the actual `AsyncMysqlQueryResult` object.
Use `await` or `join` to get the actual `Vector` of `AsyncMysqlQueryResult` objects.
Use a fixed prefix so we can ensure length of o/p id is fixed
Use a largeish timeout in CLI mode, so we can wait for hh_server startup if we need to.
Use a submodule/move technique.
Use after and ensure refcounts are still real.
Use array to specify encoding_list
Use as offset
Use bitshifting and masking to access the distinct red, green and blue component values:
Use both in case composer.json has been changed, but the lock file hasn't been updated yet.
Use each of the above functions as an output buffering callback:
Use it with other heap graph functions to extract the information you want.
Use known values to test
Use logical network address for grouping network I/O by intention, instead of physical addresses.
Use md5 of the original and current maps to see if we are different
Use null, false or empty string to unregister a previously registered handler.
Use of class and objects
Use snapshot mode for the query.
Use the constants described in the MongoLog section with bitwise operators to check if specific modules are being logged.
Use the constants described in the MongoLog section with bitwise operators to check the level.
Use the constants described in the MongoLog section with bitwise operators to specify levels.
Use the constants described in the MongoLog section with bitwise operators to specify modules.
Use the proxies in case the test needs access to the outside world
Use the set Environment variable
Use the timeout to avoid curl SlowTimer timeouts and problems
Use these parameters to bind any user-input, do not include the user-input directly in the query.
Use this at your own risk as it could open you up for SQL injection.
Use this function in server mode to collect results instead.
Use this function to do any displaying of text, so that things can be over-written as necessary.
Use this function to toggle the number of allowed async connections on the pools connecting to MySQL with this current client.
Use this instead of unlink to avoid warnings
Use this method to ensure your query is safe from, for example, SQL injection.
Use this name, instead of IP address or URL for I/O status reporting.
Use this parameter to specify another file extension.
Use this to asynchronously connect to a MySQL instance.
Used as the base class for all closures
Used by closure and internal purposes.
Used by the geometric mean computation.
Used by the stream wrapper to open phar:// files.
Used to crash hphp
Used to represent resources
Useful for showing progress as a percentage.
Useful for unit tests that want to muck with globals, and then lock them in.
Useful to handle errors occurred in static methods when there's no object to get error code from.
User defined callback functions
User error handler must not modify error context.
User supplied function is used for comparing the keys.
User-level doesn't override implicit native magic props.
User-level, handled
Users may not change the array itself from the callback function.
Uses google's cpplint.py to check code.
Uses user-defined currency string.
Using "wrong" default type will be reported when trying to use the result in incompatible way
Using CALL threading by default
Using Class and objects
Using Detect Order
Using Encoding List Array
Using GenericClass without type parameters is okay for now
Using UTF-8 internally allows to encode/decode ALL characters.
Using a dummy node, left and right will always be nodes and we avoid special cases.
Using antialiased primitives with transparent background color can end with some unexpected results.
Using array keys as an argument to the 'callback'
Using array without type parameters is okay for now
Using defaults
Using different types of repeatitive keys as well as values for 'input' array
Using named constants is strongly encouraged to ensure compatibility for future versions.
Using other data types will produce unexpected results.
Using specialized executor by default
Using these keys, the MessageFormatter class can concatenate the parts of the message, localize them, and display a well-formed string to the end user.
Using this method to fetch large result sets will result in a heavy demand on system and possibly network resources.
Using unoptimized zlib build fixes the issue.
Usually, the default `""` is fine.
Usually, there will be only one row block in the vector because the query completed in full in one attempt.
Usually, this is 11211.
Utilities for storing and retrieving files from the database.
Utility to return a unique base skeleton from a given pattern.
Utility to return a unique skeleton from a given pattern.
VECTOR, 1, 2, 3, STOP
Valgrind expectedly complains about this: "sigprocmask: unknown 'how' field 2147483647" Skip
Valid Range for Gregorian Calendar 4714 B.C.
Valid Range for Julian Calendar 4713 B.C.
Valid UTF-8 sequence returns code point count.
Valid attribute names.
Valid attribute values.
Valid characters for the map are R, G, B, A, O, C, Y, M, K, I and P.
Valid locale tag and subtag values
Valid methods are: - STREAM_CRYPTO_SSLv2_CLIENT - STREAM_CRYPTO_SSLv3_CLIENT - STREAM_CRYPTO_SSLv23_CLIENT - STREAM_CRYPTO_TLS_CLIENT The following methods are valid, but not currently implemented in HHVM: - STREAM_CRYPTO_SSLv2_SERVER - STREAM_CRYPTO_SSLv3_SERVER - STREAM_CRYPTO_SSLv23_SERVER - STREAM_CRYPTO_TLS_SERVER  When enabling crypto in HHVM, this parameter is required as the session_stream parameter is not supported.
Valid normalization form values.
Valid with cost the default
Valid with cost the same
Valid with cost the same, additional params
Valid, as it's an unknown algorithm
Validate that we can see the first value
Validate that we can see the second value
Validates a document based on a schema defined in the given string.
Validates a document based on the given schema file.
Validates the document based on its DTD.
Var name of the base var.
Variables that should, with some level of preference, stay the same.
Variables will be co-erced to a suitable type for the specifier:
Variants are ok, too.
Variation 1 : Creating links across directories where linkname is stored as an object and array member
Variation 2 : Create hard link to non-existent file
Variation 3 : Create file and a soft link to the file Access data of the file through the soft link  Update the file through soft link Check size of file and soft link link
Variation 4 : Create file and a hard link to the file Access data of the file through the hard link  Update the file through hard link Check size of file and hard link
Variation 6 : Change permission of directory and try creating links inside that directory
Variation 7 : Create soft/hard link to itself
Variation 8 : Create soft/hard link to different directory
Various combinations of arrays to be used for the test
Various functions that accept resource arguments have different coerce modes False
Various input arrays for different format types
Various variables definitions used for testing of the function
Vector is a stack-like collection.
Vectors do not have "copy-on-write" semantics.
Vectors do not support iterating while new elements are being added or elements are being removed.
Vectors do not support taking elements by reference.
Vectors only support integer keys.
Vectors/Maps - some basic tests
Verify return type
Verify that keeping accents works.
Verify that our implementation is the same as for the constructor and strtotime
Verify that our implementation works regardless of position
Verify that removing accents works.
Verify that the reference still exists, and that it is of the right class.
Verify that the reserialized data is equal to the original.
Verify that the splay tree has sorted, unique keys.
Verify that the splay tree has the right size.
Verify that the stream constants have been registered correctly by checking some of them
Verify that you can safely access a Zend resource even after its been closed.
Verifying shm_remove_var worked, this is not sure test though.
Version check.
Versions prior to 4.1 have a weak test and will accept this.
Visit the left side first, so push the right side before the left.
WARNING: The values described here are NOT the actual values in PHP code.
WARNING: Unable to initialise parser of type resource
WHERE CURRENT OF.
WUNTRACED Return for children which are stopped, and whose status has not been reported.
WUNTRACED return for children which are stopped, and whose status has not been reported.
Wait for a certain length of time before an async function does any more work.
Wait for a given Awaitable to finish and return its result.
Wait for signal to arrive.
Wait for the expected number of responses.
Warning  If the destination file already exists, it will be overwritten.
Warning  It cannot be used to add extra criteria to a query on the fly.
Warning  On exit, the arrays are modified to indicate which socket resource actually changed status.
Warning  The parameter must be a string.
Warning  This function returns FALSE for files inaccessible due to safe mode restrictions.
Warning  Using a timeout value of 0 allows you to instantaneously poll the status of the streams, however, it is NOT a good idea to use a 0 timeout value in a loop as it will cause your script to consume too much CPU time.
Warning This class has been DEPRECATED as of version 1.3.0.
Warning, and doesn't change the value try to redefine a pre-defined constant
Warning: This function has been DEPRECATED as of PHP 5.3.0.
Warning: This function has been removed from some SAPI's in PHP 5.3.
Warning: This function may return Boolean FALSE, but may also return a non-Boolean value which evaluates to FALSE.
Warning: line numbers are sensitive, do not change
Warning: this will load the file into memory.
WarningThis function may return Boolean FALSE, but may also return a non-Boolean value which evaluates to FALSE, such as 0 or "".
Warnings are special.
We _could_ be a tiny bit smarter and consider the following code correct by observing that the is_int and is_float guards are exhaustive.
We also do filename lookups
We are allowing type hints on variadic function for Hack modes for the type checker, even though we will not check that every element passed into the variadic matches the type hint.
We are not passing a parameter to the closure call.
We are passing multiple parameters to the closure call
We are raising a fatal since we can't access the protected property.
We can make it through typedefs
We can use the underlying seek implementation.
We can't actually run this function because we don't have a genva implementation...
We can't check if a parameter isn't passed, we can only check its default value, but that fails if I want to pass the default value.
We can't construct a Map or ImmMap from a Set.
We cannot allow Tany to be created in a strict file.
We cannot implement it because we lack a way to unserialize inline.
We cannot patch until we add it to ignore otherwise git thinks it is uncommited change
We certainly wouldn't want to load that into memory all at once, which is what a cursor is for: allowing the client to access the collection in dribs and drabs.
We check for and disable it explicitly in the code.
We check the general ini settings which affect error handling and than verify if a message is given by a division by zero.
We copy the user certificate and authenticate using that in sandcastle
We count the objects we leave on the stack, and expect the destruct count to be quite close to that.
We do not need to constrain the type parameter for type definitions since they cannot put constraints on their type parameters
We do only the most necessary to test it.
We do some consolidation here because the behavior when testing is really non-deterministic.
We do this substitution here so that this test's expected output is not affected by this bug.
We don't currently do a good job inferring the types of member variables defined in traits.
We don't evaluate default arguments when we don't need them, PHP 7 evaluates them on all calls
We don't give TCP connections a tcp:// prefix
We don't have a MySQL instance running for our test runs, so Database tests won't work
We don't have a cached vendor/, but as --local-source-only wasn't specified, we can try to download it.
We don't test all aspects of the documented behaviour.
We don't test_mysqli_get_client_stats_table_1 the NDB ones.
We don't want to see the current classes again in the next iteration of the loop.
We filtered down to the last element, so we don't need to do anything else.
We generate our own only if necessary.
We got failed Tests, offer the user to send an e-mail to QA team, unless NO_INTERACTION is set
We got failed Tests, offer the user to send and e-mail to QA team, unless NO_INTERACTION is set
We have a fatal after the tests have supposedly started but we really don't have a test to examine.
We have a warning after the tests have supposedly started but we really don't have a test to examine.
We have gotten through the prologue and any blank lines and we should be at tests now.
We have the test.
We have this pattern: Tests: 364, Assertions: 585, Errors: 5.
We have to allow whitespace then ending the file before we start the manifest
We intentionally consider null bytes invalid sequences.
We know that our class is in this list.
We maintain a stack of sub-iterators - each of which has a state.
We map those to PHP numeric types - no padding/filling done.
We may get one or more warnings, but then a real test status will come afterwards.
We may however, want to match EXPECT on more than 200 results, so this may need to change later.
We must reset timeout but it must be AFTER we get info
We need this because some collections are not ordered.
We need this hack because the stream wrapper should work even without the __HALT_COMPILER token
We need this little hack to be able to re-run the test
We need to fill in the hole that we created in the middle of the final level.
We need to hide some of these things in functions or hphpc has the same bug for exceptional control flow that this test is intended to catch in hhbbc.
We need to output something every once in a while - if we go quiet, fbmake kills us.
We need to run the emulated version first.
We never care about whatever junk actually called fb_debug_backtrace, or the second-level function which is always some cache wrapper.
We never look at SELF in LEAVES_ONLY
We only catch the first invalid one even if there are more - that matches PHP 7
We redefine setX, so that it doesn't initialize the parent class properly anymore.
We should never get here
We should solve this eventually by forcing all child class methods / members to have type hints if the corresponding method / member in the parent is hinted.
We should stop it in some time.
We shouldn't crash hhvm when we have a private ctor...
We skip those: 13.2.
We switch to the shallow clone first so that generated files like vendor/ go into the new checkout, not the original one.
We therefore collect a list of unsatisfied downstream constraints and attempt to satisfy each one in turn.
We treat these tests as no-ops with respect to calculation.
We use an extra test to cover deprecation warning.
We want to be sure that there really is a png file with a reasonable file size.
We want to confirm that all fields are initialized correctly and that the destructor does not segfault.
We will add label to call it.
We would duplicate the SQL test cases if we have it here and in one of the fetch tests, because the fetch tests would have to call prepare/execute etc.
We'll corrupt the 1024th byte
We'll have to add some more features and options soon.
We're already at the recursion limit, and the current node isn't a leaf
We're expecting a response for the break command, and the command before the break command.
We're pretty close to wasting time with test cases at this point.
We're testing sort order not errors so ignore.
We've tried connecting too recently, don't retry
Weird trait thing
What the test_mysqli_stmt_num_rows_table_1 does is cover an implementation detail of the mysqlnd library.
What we really want to know is that there were a reasonable number of calls to the destructor.
When 0, not core files are created.
When 500 fatal error is about to display, it will invoke this PHP page with all global states right at when the error happens.
When PHP is being used as a server module, the umask is restored when each request is finished.
When a caller passes a Map to a callee, the callee can modify the Map and the caller will see the changes.
When a caller passes a Set to a callee, the callee can modify the Set and the caller will see the changes.
When a caller passes a Vector to a callee, the callee can modify the Vector and the caller will see the changes.
When a debugger is running, this line of code will break into debugger, if condition is met.
When a hack collection is cast to array, this calls toArray
When a hack collection is cast to boolean, this checks toEmpty
When a new element is added or removed, all iterators that point to the Vector shall be considered invalid.
When a new key is added or an element is removed, all iterators that point to the Map shall be considered invalid.
When a value is deleted from the hash, it is written to the current output buffer.
When an element is added or removed, all iterators that point to the Set shall be considered invalid.
When another oop_test instance is created it must reuse the statically stored reference oop_value.
When array are refenced
When array are referenced
When comparing an array that has similar elements  but has been created in a different order 2.
When core files are larger than this size, they will be truncated at this size.
When displaying or printing a number it is converted to a locale-specific string.
When doing a strict comparison of string representation
When doing parallel searches an array of search result identifiers is returned, except in case of error, then the entry corresponding to the search will be FALSE.
When formatting currency, default formatter's currency code is used.
When from_encoding is omitted, detect_order is used.
When given a string it will be cast as an integer when comparing.
When implementing an interface which extends Traversable, make sure to list IteratorAggregate or Iterator before its name in the implements clause.
When importing Zend tests there are a lot of them.
When iterating over a Map, the key/value pairs appear in the order they were inserted.
When iterating over a Set, the elements appear in the order they were inserted.
When language is omitted, it returns the language name as a string.
When more diffs come, a duplication would be probably a better solution.
When not supplied, all channels are blurred.
When not supplied, default channels are replaced.
When output_callback is called, it will receive the contents of the output buffer as its parameter and is expected to return a new output buffer as a result, which will be sent to the browser.
When parsing currency, default currency definitions are used.
When possible, pipes will be used instead of the TCP/IP protocol.
When specified, the key must be specified.
When the ArrayObject is constructed from an array all properties are public.
When the ArrayObject refers to an object an array of the public properties of that object will be returned.
When the call returns, this may point to the first byte position past the end of the string.
When the offset is equal to the length of this node, the new node has no data.
When the value in array is scalar, it will be replaced by the value in array1, may it be scalar or array.
When this function results in the autoload stack being deactivated, any __autoload function that previously existed will not be reactivated.
When this happens, we should adhere to our existing heuristics for map-like array construction.
When this resource is garbage collected, the curl handle will be saved for reuse later.
When using UPDATE, MySQL will not update columns where the new value is the same as the old value.
When using the foreach construct, you will also iterate over the subelements.
When using this specifier on a string, it acts as a cutoff point, setting a maximum character limit to the string.
When we are out of callee-saved registers, we should still do pre-coloring opt instead of picking a random callee-saved register.
When writing unit tests, one may want to stub out a function.
When you create a connection to the database, the driver will not immediately decide on a secondary to use.
When you define a sequence of characters in the charlist argument make sure that you know what characters come between the characters that you set as the start and end of the range.
When you first do a query with slaveOkay set, at that point the driver will choose a secondary for this connection.
When you supply a directory name, it is used.
Where extra functionality is available, the intl extension may expose the ICU break iterator with suitable subclasses, such as IntlRuleBasedBreakIterator or IntlCodePointBreaIterator.
Where possible 'UTF-8' has been entered as a string value
Whereas MySQl 5.5 may not.
Whether it's scoped or not, a static closure cannot have a bound instance.
Whether or not the specified codepoint has the noted boolean property.
Whether pagelet server is enabled or not.
Whether the server is going to stop soon.
While LDAP errno numbers are standardized, different libraries return different or even localized textual error messages.
While MapReduce is powerful, it is often more difficult than necessary for many simple aggregation tasks, such as totaling or averaging field values.
While pure sequences seem to be nesting just fine, pure mappings and mappings with sequences inside can't go very deep.
While the parameters are of type mixed, going to assume they are SplFileInfos for now.
While there is more than one node left in the priority queue:
White background and blue text
White space char
White space may not appear within an individual locale, but is ignored otherwise.
Width and height.
Will additionally produce a Warning when called on a non-array.
Will get a warning
Will return the current dewey binary unless the `HOWTOEVEN_BUILD` environment variable is set.
Will succeed: Function was declared in strict mode, but that does not matter This file uses weak mode, so the call is weak, and float accepted for int
Will succeed: Function was declared in weak mode, but that does not matter This file uses strict mode, so the call is strict, and float denied for int
Windows uses only the first three characters of prefix.
Wipe the user buffer.
With PHP 4.0.6 through 4.1.x this function always exists if the GD module is loaded, but calling it without GD2 being installed PHP will issue a fatal error and exit.
With PHP 4.2.x this behaviour is different in issuing a warning instead of an error.
With an empty prefix, the returned string will be 13 characters long.
With args greater than expected
With args less than expected
With autoload disabled.
With autoload failing to add it.
With autoload, no warning.
With callback function which returns always false
With callback function which returns always true
With default argument
With default callback function
With error reporting off we still get the var
With existing file
With hardlink
With non existent comparison function
With non existent comparison function and extra argument
With non-existing dir path
With non-existing file
With non-existing file or dir
With non-existing source
With one less than the expected number of arguments
With one more than expected number of arguments
With one more than the expected number of arguments
With optional arguments
With partial output on errors.
With standard files and dirs
With symlink
With the XDEBUG_TRACE_NAKED_FILENAME flag set, ".xt" is not added.
With zero arguments
Without QLZ_MEMORY_SAFE this segfaults.
Without a replica set, it will just return an array with one element containing the host that you are connected to.
Without enabling SKIP_PASV_IP flag, the following output will be seen..
Without this mask set the error_handler will be called for every error regardless to the setting of the error_reporting setting.
Won't crash if less than 3 zeros here
Works fine:
Works only when objects consist of hack collections and primitive types.
Wrap an `Awaitable` into an `Awaitable` of `ResultOrExceptionWrapper`.
Wraps a string to a given number of characters.
Writable bits are ignored, and set at runtime based on the phar.readonly INI variable.
Write .cpp files for building libapc_prime.so that can be loaded by an HPHP-compiled server at startup time.
Write a string produced according to format to the stream resource specified by handle.
Write an error in a format recognizable to Emacs or MSVC.
Write initialisation statemenst for all the variables that might be used
Write link it into the existing TARGETS TODO sort these
Write over the last line to avoid random trailing chars on next echo
Write stats to csv file
Write test context information.
Write the data in to the file, verify the write by checking file pointer position,  eof position, and data.
Write the given text to a temporary file, and return the filename.
Write the string at the top left
Write the values to memcache using a raw socket connection to make sure that they are not transformed in any way.
Writes a DTD attribute list.
Writes a full CDATA.
Writes a full DTD element.
Writes a full DTD entity.
Writes a full DTD.
Writes a full attribute.
Writes a full comment.
Writes a full element tag.
Writes a full namespaced attribute.
Writes a full namespaced element tag.
Writes a processing instruction.
Writes a raw xml text.
Writes a single test case to a file
Writes a text.
Writes an end tag even if the element is empty.
Writes the given text into the image using TrueType fonts.
Writes the text and apply a gaussian blur on the image
Writes, commands, and any other operation that sends information to the database and waits for a response can throw a MongoCursorException.
Writing into file
Wrong Parameters
Wrong argument count
Wrong argument types
Wrong array indexes
Wrong encoding
Wrong parameter count in assert
Wrong parameter count in assert_options
Wrong parameter name in assert_options
Wrong parameter type test.
Wrong value is truncated to 255
Wrote: 72 bytes
XHP attributes cannot be declared without a type
XML_OPTION_CASE_FOLDING and XML_OPTION_TARGET_ENCODING are available.
XML_OPTION_SKIP_TAGSTART integer Specify how many characters should be skipped in the beginning of a tag name.
XML_OPTION_SKIP_WHITE integer Whether to skip values consisting of whitespace characters.
XXX: should be __Native, not a builtin
XXXjit doesn't do "missing argument" warnings
Xdebug only records whether or not a line has been excuted, this implementation includes the number of times a line was executed.
Yaml emit callback function, referred on yaml_emit call by class name.
Yamlize the array
Year wise time stamps
Yep, really.
Yes, 1 - the asynchronous query should have been processed
Yes, I really want to check if the object property is empty
Yes, this is a fatal error and I want it to fail.
Yes, this is technically okay at runtime, but we've deliberately decided to ban it due to its error suppression properties.
Yes, we need the temporary variable.
Yes, you can fetch a result - the query has been processed
Yet it is still stable
You almost never want this.
You can also read more about modes on Unix systems with 'man 1 chmod' and 'man 2 chmod'.
You can also specify an alternative openssl configuration file by setting the value of the config key to the path of the file you want to use.
You can also specify the data parameter as a single dimension array.
You can also use 1 and 0 instead of TRUE and FALSE.
You can also use the validateOnParse property of DOMDocument to make a DTD validation.
You can change this behaviour by setting preserve_keys to TRUE.
You can find a list of these classes in the chapter introduction.
You can have a shape as a parameter to a user attribute.
You can have multiple deprecation warnings for PHP 4 style constructors
You can iterate over all the rows of an `AsyncMysqlRowBlock` one by one until the iterator is not valid any longer.
You can leave it out and use an empty array or NULL instead.
You can override a private function with a public one in php.
You can override this setting by running:  then restarting Apache.
You can override with the correct type
You can pass this constructor an `array` of options to tweak the behavior of your pool.
You can prevent the script from blocking by specifying MSG_IPC_NOWAIT in the flags parameter.
You can set it lower though.
You can specify any combination of the following bitmasks.
You can specify which column you want with the column-index parameter.
You can think of a row just like you do a database row that might be returned as a result from a query.
You can use this function e.g. to check if the message was written by the owner of the private key.
You can use this function e.g. to decrypt data which were supposed only to you.
You can use this to install CLI utilities globally, all you need is to add the COMPOSER_HOME/vendor/bin dir to your PATH env var.
You can use variables inside of a print statement
You cannot use a named parameter marker of the same name twice in a prepared statement.
You generally should not do this.
You have to increase it or send smaller chunks of data.
You may be getting outdated dependencies.
You may notice that many methods affecting the instace of `Pair` return an `ImmVector` -- `Pair`s are essentially backed by 2-element `ImmVector`s.
You may use them for sanity-checks that test for conditions that should always be TRUE and that indicate some programming errors if not or to check for the presence of certain features like extension functions or certain system limits and features.
You must ensure that the delimiter argument comes before the string argument.
You must have as many values as you do placeholders.
You need to have a valid openssl.cnf installed for this function to operate correctly.
You need to validate your document with DOMDocument::validate or DOMDocument::validateOnParse before using this function.
You probably won't see this because of the "zend_mm_heap corrupted"
You should also note that PHP doesn't cache information about non-existent files.
You should never have to do this under normal circumstances.
You should not throw a PDOException from your own code.
You shouldn't use this value in a script.
You will block until the connection has been adopted to an `AsyncMysqlConnection`.
You will see leaks with libmysql
You would most commonly use this to set the PDO::ATTR_CURSOR value to PDO::CURSOR_SCROLL to request a scrollable cursor.
You would use this call for an application which "browses" directory entries and/or where you do not know the structure of the directory entries.
You'll find the classes documented using php code in the file spl.php or in corresponding .inc files in subdirectories examples and internal.
ZEND_FETCH_CONSTANT
ZEND_INIT_FCALL_BY_NAME
ZEND_INIT_STATIC_METHOD_CALL
ZEND_ISSET_ISEMPTY_VAR
ZEND_UNSET_VAR
ZEND_VM_DISPATCH_TO_HELPER
Zend allows the class name to be explicitly set to PDOStatement.
Zend doesn't understand 'string' and 'int' typehints, and will only allow NULL defaults.
Zend drops this set without a notice or fatal.
Zend is in the process of deprecating this behavior.
Zend will cast the NULL to 0
Zend's implementation of forward_static_call contains a check for this, implying intent to uphold this invariant.
Zero Argument
Zero Arguments
Zero argument
Zero argument, expected 1 argument
Zero arguments
Zero indicates that no records were updated for an UPDATE statement, no rows matched the WHERE clause in the query or that no query has yet been executed.
Zero indicates that no records where updated for an UPDATE/DELETE statement, no rows matched the WHERE clause in the query or that no query has yet been executed.
Zero is returned if no issues are found with the input string.
Zero means no error occurred.
ZipArchive::ER_EXISTS   File already exists.
ZipArchive::ER_INCONS   Zip archive inconsistent.
ZipArchive::ER_INVAL   Invalid argument.
ZipArchive::ER_MEMORY Malloc failure.
ZipArchive::ER_NOENT   No such file.
ZipArchive::ER_NOZIP   Not a zip archive.
ZipArchive::ER_OPEN Can't open file.
ZipArchive::ER_READ   Read error.
ZipArchive::ER_SEEK   Seek error.
__CLASS__ is the 'use'r class at runtime
`AsyncMysqlConnectionPool` provides more flexibility with other available options, etc.
`Pair` keys are always 0 and 1, repsectively.
`Pair`s do not support taking elements by reference.
`Pair`s only support integer keys.
`Typing.expr` is called twice when typechecking an if condition, and this test verifies that we are not double-counting the number of expressions.
`await` or `join` this result to obtain the actual connection.
`fun` is a special function used to create a "pointer" to a function in a typeable way.
a built in comparison function 2.
a different type of comment
a float value with more precision points
a gereral class
a language construct
a list of lists
a multichar glue value
a point in filled body
a redirected test never fails
a resource var
a resource variable
a simple example of passing by value and by reference
a simple request class that lets us handle http based tests
a string Call all 3 functions indirectly through table
a sub-array
a two-dimensional array 2.
a var which is defined try to unset the element which is non-existent
a variable that is referenced to an array 2.
a variable which is unset
a warning must be issued if we don't use a IV on a AES cipher, that usually requires an IV
a weak test without unicode etc.
absent property despite containsKey
absolute bad path
absolute paths
absolute test
abstract class
abstract class with public, private, protected members
acceses element with value 6
access each element's value
access each element's value anf its element number
access individual elements by string key
access non-existant element
access the array after reset
accesses public instance method
accessible, by default
accessing an array within an array
actual argument's value changed
add a comment here to say what the test is supposed to do
add a second text node to title
add body part
add extras from the template dir
add handlers
add hiphop license
add multipart stuff
add our local endpoint
add php license
add portion to test setting stub from resource
add same CURLOPT to the first handle
add some CURLOPT to the second handle
add the content with has csv fields
add the interval to the start date 'n' times
add the re unquoted.
add the test data to the file
add vars to packet
add zend license
adding a string to the input string which is being tokenised
additional argument passed to callback function
additional array to be passed for intersection
additional code coverage
additional configuration items that may be set to provide proxy support for testes: timeout proxy_host proxy_port proxy_user proxy_pass
address The email address is_group TRUE if the recipient is a newsgroup, FALSE otherwise.
adds a few simple methods to all containers that implement iterators, mainly implemented so we can consolidate all the logic dealing with iterators in one place.
affected rows related
after unserialize the property myObjC::attrD is null instead of expected object
again conversion
again normal value
aka TRUNCATE
all args specified
all have read only
all have rw only
all instance properties get serialized
all permisson to sub dir
all the following are identical, we will convert to utf-8
all versions should at least dump this minimum information
allocate some solors
allow T2a::f to also be seen through alias h don't need qualifier prefix if f is unambiguous
allow connect
allow connect, fix pw
allow empty query_string requests
allow otherwise hidden T2B::f to be seen through alias g
allowed always
allowed to be empty
allowed, but serve no purpose
already in main distro
alternative display function for class bar
always include the config.h file
always strings, like STRINGIFY flag
am invalid mode shoudl result in same o/p as mode 'a'
an array containing integer references
an array containing unsorted hexadecimal values with keys
an array containing unsorted numeric values with indices
an array containing unsorted octal values
an array containing unsorted string values with indices
an array containng unsorted hexadecimal values with keys   There are multiple keys which are duplicate and the later should be picked
an array contains unsorted hexadecimal values
an array contains unsorted hexadecimal values   There are multiple keys which are duplicate and the later should be picked
an array contains unsorted octal values
an array for checking unexpected behavior
an array that contains a referenced array
an error occurred: affected rows should return -1
an ordinary if having 2 actions on TRUE and none on FALSE
analyze the PHP_AUTH_DIGEST variable
and also return them as return values
and default key array
and disconnect
and its stable
and now we try KILL
and now, the same with anonymous placeholders...
and the .lib goes into dev
and the above SSL setup should be always incorrect.
and those for pecl
and value NULL
anonymous callback function
anonymous callback function with argument and null statement
anonymous callback function with null argument
anonymous callback function with reference
anonymous class trait binding
another associative array
another default constructor is OK
any int will work since this::T won't be expression dependent
any other field will fail
any other non-transactional engine pdo_mysql_begin_transaction has more on this, quick check only
append link with data
append the data to the file, starting from current position of the file pointer
arc demands certain permission on its config
are constructor promoted Assume the framework unit tests will be run in parallel until otherwise proven.
are must be decoded on input these are not reencoded on output.
args array  If inside a function, this lists the functions arguments.
args less than expected
args less than min.
args more than expected
args more than expected, expected 1 argument
args more than expected,expected 4
arguments less than expected numbers
arguments more than expected
arity error
around 1 leap year period in years
around 40000 years
array access will be implemented by the time we get to here
array argument
array as return value
array containing all scalar types
array containing different strings with key values
array containing different types of array values for 'var' argument
array containing different types of objects as elements
array containing different types of variables
array containing elements with/without keys
array containing elements with/witout keys
array containing embedded arrays
array containing objects of MyClass
array containing reference variables
array containing sub arrays
array contains combination of capital/small letters
array contains null sub array
array contains sub arrays
array declaration
array for memoizing
array of 3 strings
array of SimpleClass objects having more than one members
array of SimpleClass objects having more than one properties
array of SimpleClass objects with only one member
array of SimpleClass objects with only one property
array of all file access modes
array of arguments
array of array types
array of array values
array of arrays
array of arrays along with some values
array of available hashings to test
array of boolean data
array of boolean type values
array of boolean types
array of boolean values
array of char formats
array of char values
array of chars
array of destination file names
array of different  values for 'num' argument
array of different types of array values for 'val' argument
array of different values for 'input' parameter
array of different values for 'start_key' argument
array of different values for 'val' argument
array of float type values
array of float values
array of floats
array of hexa formats
array of html strings
array of inputs for 'replace_pairs' argument
array of int type values
array of int values
array of integer objects
array of integer objects with different key values
array of integer values
array of integers
array of object values for 'val' argument
array of objects
array of octal formats
array of operatons
array of possible valid values for 'val' argument
array of private key sizes to test
array of resource types
array of resource values
array of scientific formats
array of string formats
array of string objects
array of string objects with different key values
array of string type values
array of string values
array of strings
array of strings used to test the function
array of unexpected values to iterate over
array of unsigned formats
array of values for 'from'
array of values for 'input' argument
array of values for 'to' argument
array of values to iterate over
array of values with indices to iterate over
array of wouldblocks
array of zero or more elements, 1 per instance property
array or object
array to be passed as arguments
array to be passed to optional argument
array types
array value
array values
array values contains minimum and maximum ranges
array with NULL
array with binary data
array with binary values
array with bool key repeatition
array with bool values
array with bool values as keys
array with default keys
array with default keys - numeric values
array with default keys - string values
array with default keys and boolean values
array with default keys and numeric values
array with default keys and numrice values
array with default keys containing unsorted numeric values
array with default numeric index
array with diff sub arrays to be sorted
array with different values
array with different values as width
array with different values for break arg
array with double quoted strings
array with element as 0
array with float values
array with heredocs associative arrays
array with hexa values
array with hexa values as keys
array with int values
array with integer and float values
array with integer values
array with mixed keys
array with mixed values
array with negative float values
array with negative hexa values
array with negative int values
array with negative octal values
array with null entry
array with null key repeatition
array with null string
array with null values
array with numeric key repeatition
array with numeric keys
array with numeric value repeatition
array with object, unset variable and resource variable
array with octal values as keys
array with one element
array with positive float values
array with positive hexa values
array with positive int values
array with positive octal values
array with repetative keys
array with single and double quoted strings
array with single element
array with single quoted and double quoted strings
array with single quoted strings
array with special chars as keys
array with string key index
array with string key repeatition
array with string keys
array with string value repeatition
array with subarray
array without elements
array without elements 2.
array_args an array containing elements with reference variables
array_filter preserves keys, so we do the same.
array_multisort is weird.
arrays containing byRefs
arrays to be passed as arguments
arrays to be passed to optional argument
arrays with default keys
arrays with explicit keys
arrays with float keys
arrays with float values
arrays with integer keys
arrays with integer values
arrays with string keys
arrays with string values
arrays with variation in elements
as a private/protected method
as a static method
as an example how to write crc32 tests PHP does not have uint values, you cannot display crc32 like a signed integer.
ascii mixed case, multiple needles
ascii strings
asio checks first unfinished child
assign a value to static var
assign class as scalar to var
assign this string to a variable
assigned the value TRUE when called
assignment of an array to another variable resets the internal  pointer of the array.
assoc indices
associative array
associative array containing unsorted string values
associative array with different keys
associative array with duplicate keys
associative array with duplicate keys 3.
associative array with key as integers
associative array with mixed keys and sub-array as element
associative array with numeric keys, which will be re-indexed
associative array with string keys, which will not be re-indexed
associative arrays
associative arrays - key as numeric
associative arrays - key as string
associative arrays to sort
associative arrays with different values
assuming running on a reasonable fast CPU time cannot change on the second sample
assuming the test is run in a plain-vanilla CLI environment
at least 64 patterns required to trigger the WuManberReplacement algorithm
at least 64 patterns required to trigger the WuManberReplacement algorithm One of the pattern needs to be longer than one byte
at least one connection
at least two connections
at pos 0, shift everything up
at the start it should be NULL
attempting to change data by reference
auto-detect
autocommit is on, no rollback possible
autocommit should be on by default
automatic downgrade to normal connections has failed
avoid infinite loop if test is failing
b - the argument is treated as an integer, and presented as a binary number.
bad pad_type - passing an undefined one
bad reference
bad_style-ish case inside a lambda
bail out on error
base url prefixed to any requests
based on example at http://www.php.net/manual/en/normalizer.normalize.php
based on zend/ext/filter/010.php
be sure the executables ini settings are compatible with the test, or skip
be sure we have the right endpoints for this test result
be sure you have enough memory and stack for PHP.
because php...
before and after any non number so that for example '4.3.2RC1' becomes '4.3.2.RC.1'.
being abstract, it need not implement any of the methods
binary array
binary data
binary input
binary inputs
binary keys
binary representation
binary strings
binary type variations
blah blah multiline method
blank heredoc string
blank line close the file if the mode to be used is read mode  and re-open using read mode
blank line close the file if the mode to be used is read mode  and re-open using read mode else rewind the file pointer to beginning of the file
blank line rewind the file pointer to bof
blank space as file name
bogus result
bool operand
bool value array
bool values
boolean data
boolean false
boolean false as filename
boolean false as linkname
boolean value
boolean values
boolhandler interrno stringerrstr stringerrfile interrline arrayerrcontext    errno   The first parameter, errno, contains the level of the error raised, as an integer.
borrowed from test/slow/ext_stream/ext_stream.php
both should match
braces having no special meaning are used verbatim
brackets in sentence
break cycles
break ends "group" of case 20 statements
break ends "group" of default statements
break is not rejected here until runtime
break left intentionally
break out of the while loop ...
breakpoint is set here
breakpoint will get hit on this call
buf is passed by reference, so it must be specified as a variable in the argument list.
buffer is only relevant with native PS
buffered normal
buffered result set - let's hope we do not run into PHP memory limit...
bug happened during query processing
bug in mb_parse_str not following PHP's
build a predictable string
builtin class
builtin function
bump up ref count to make a MapVariant copy
busy wait, should time out.
busy wait: intended
but "future" changes are seen
but a public destructor is allowed
but changing with an actual calendar should
but not this one
but now I want to see some error...
but they are held in a transaction by the server.
but this will fine, ofcourse
by default PS is unbuffered - no change
by default, the pointer is on the first element
by foreign name
by legolas558
by using replace_pairs array
c - the argument is treated as an integer, and presented as the character with that ASCII value.
cURL handler
caching cannot be well applied to an object's dynamic properties, since they can be added and removed at any time between calls to property methods.
calculate the hash and dump it
calculate the hash and dump it reading 1000 bytes within the file max size
calculate the hash and dump it, if data read, expecting here no data was read
calculate totals for this table
calculate two-stage tables
calendar has priority
call EndIteration on last call
call T2a::f
call T2b::f via its alias g
call a function
call a function that might generate disk-related exception
call f1, default return value is NULL
call imap_close with CL_EXPUNGE explicitly set in case mailbox not empty
call the functiont
call top, should fail with corrupted heap
call undefined function
call_user_func
call_user_func_array
callback function
callback function always_false
callback function always_true
callback function returning always false
callback function returning always true
callback function with parameter and with return value
callback function with parameter and without return value
callback function without parameter and without return value
callback function without parameters and with return value
callback functions
callback functions int as return value
calling a private function
calling array_fill with negative values for 'num' parameter
calling array_map with different arrays
calling reset between executions
calling the array_fill with all possible valid values for 'val' argument
calling with no parameters
calls /our/ private function
calls __toString
calls back on every new edge in the scan.
calls back on every new node in the scan.
calls f like a static function with class name being the trait name
calls public constructor
calls the PHP 4 style constructor
calls the method filter, which is also the PHP4 style ctor
calls the method mapper, which is also the PHP4 style ctor
calls the private function
calls within that file should stay strict, despite being included by weak file
calls within that file should stay weak, despite being included by strict file
calls within that file should stay weak, despite being included by strict fille
can call cf1 now, as it's been defined
can call ucf1 after its definition is seen Conditionally defined functions
can call ucf1 before its definition is seen
can have arbitrary white space separators
can jump in to a block
can jump out of a block
can only create a hardlink if the file exists.
can only read uncompressed data
can't use ob_gzhandler with zlib.output_compression
candidate safe idiom for determining whether data is serialized
cannot be redeclared
cannot modify cursor after beginning iteration Code: 0  You are calling a method that sets up the query after executing the query.
canonicalized version
capture up to 100 errors
capture, because of inner capture
case from issue
cases which should not yield any output.
cause warning
causes crash
certain all-uppercase Latin sequences can be spoof of Greek
cf2 now exists
chain: Parent record to merge with ipv6 data.
change a CURLOPT in the second handle
change all file's permissions to 777 before deleting
change class name, so a unserialize failure occurs
change dir permission to allow all operation
change internal encoding to UTF-8
change into the PHP source directory.
change mode of file
change the CURLOPT_URL for the second handle
change the dir permisson to test dir on it
change the password for the second DB user and kill the persistent connection
change this next line to true to use good-old hand-assembled go-pear-bundle from the snapshot template
change to 4.0
changes the global
changing mode of file
changing mode of mkdir to prevent creating sub-directory under it
changing output method to html
changing permissions for each temporary directory to delete them
changing the calendar with a cal type should not change tz
changing the class in the string to simulate deserialization into a PHP with a different implementation of C1
char type variations
charsetnr The character set number for the field.
charsets cannot take any other value but utf8 in unicode mode
check SimpleFunctionCall::outputCPPParamOrderControlled
check a dynamic string
check a static string
check a variety of acceptable default values and type hints: pass
check an xhp element
check array
check behavior
check case insensitive
check color of a point on edge..
check connection
check default values and type hints, implementating abstract methods: pass
check extension exists
check file permission
check for a few core functions
check for duplicate method names
check for error while unserializing.
check for even integer values by inspecting the low-order bit
check for extensions that need special handling and regenerate
check high bit of first character always set
check if a commonly used locale is installed in the system
check if array is still ok
check if changing the fetch mode from unbuffered to buffered will cause any harm to a statement created prior to the change
check if data read is of expected size
check if end of file pointer is set
check if end of file pointer is set close the file
check if eof reached
check if link is soft link
check if the link exist
check if the link exists
check if we can convert that thing
check internal encoding is now set to UTF-8
check key and value after the loop.
check lexer
check login
check numeric strings
check numerics
check on unset variables
check order of evaluation of arguments in a function call w.r.t side effects
check result
check retrieved data
check return
check runtime operators on just ints
check that CL_EXPUNGE worked
check that alias can't be set manually
check that default alias can be overwritten
check that file pointer points at eof, expected: 1024
check that imap_close was successful, if not call imap_close and explicitly set CL_EXPUNGE
check that user-defined alias can be overwritten
check the current file size
check the file pointer position
check the file pointer position and eof
check the file pointer position and if eof
check the file size, should be 0 delete all files created
check the filesize and display file content
check the first size
check the isset and unset on non existing key
check the new type
check the new type after conversion
check this and ensure that each returns  the first element after the assignment
check this works and actually returns the boolean value
check upload status
check using isset and empty
check using isset and empty to confirm
check using isset for the element that was unset
check values of URL related constants
check when second arg is given other than boolean TRUE
checked lvar
checking behavior of quote
checking file pointer position initially
checking for Resources
checking for binary safe
checking for element in a sub-array
checking for type FALSE in multidimensional array with loose checking, result:false in loose type check
checking for unexpected number of arguments
checking for unexpected type of arguments
checking if given file is soft link
checking inodes
checking normal operation of addcslashes
checking null array
checking on objects
checking on objects type
checking possible variations
checking statistics of old and renamed file - both should be same except ctime
checking sub-arrays
checking that an integer can always be used where a float is expected
checking that generics are dissalowed for static values
checking that size of symlink remains same
child class which inherits parent class test1
child class which inherits parent class test2
child class which inherits parent class test3
child class which inherits parent class test4
child class which inherits parent test2
child private property
child protected property
child public property
child public static property
chmod 0777 to enable deletion
chmod file to 0777 to enable deletion
chmod to enable deletion of directory
chmod to enable removing test1 directory
chooses first match with equal value, 30 matches 30.0 before 30
chooses the CLI version of php.
chunk size of 2
circular reference
class 1 calls parent constructor
class 2 has an own constructor
class 3 has no constructor
class declaration
class declaration for integer objects
class declaration for string objects
class definition
class definition for object data
class definition for object variable
class deriving above abstract class
class deriving the above abstract class
class for object variable
class keyword
class not derived from PDOStatement
class string  The current class name.
class with __get and __set
class with __get but not __set
class with __set but not __get
class with final method
class with member as object of other class
class with no member
class with no members
class with only member functions
class with only members and with out member functions
class with private member, static member, constant and constructor to initialize the private member
class with protected member, static member, constant and consturctor to initialize the protected member
class with public member, static member , constant and consturctor to initialize the public member
class with public, private, protected members, static, constant members and constructor to initialize all the members
class with static members
class without __get or __set
class without a member
class without member
class without members
classname for classes, interfaces, enums, or traits
clean TZ so that it doesn't bypass the ini option
clean the temp dir and file
cleanhtml.php  A simple script to clean and repair HTML,XHTML,PHP,ASP,etc.
cleanhtml5.php  A simple script to clean and repair HTML,XHTML,PHP,ASP,etc.
cleaning resource handles
cleans and reads first element
clear bit at index 0
clear error stack
clear previous size value in cache
clear statement cache
clear the 6th bit
clear the cache
clear the error stack
clear the stat
clearstatcache do nothing, but there should no warnnings
client has started fetching rows
clone non-owned object
close and delete the file
close connection
close directory
close resource
close resources
close resourses used
close statement
close the FTP stream
close the file
close the file before unlinking
close the file handle
close the file if the mode to be used is read mode  and re-open using read mode else rewind the file pointer to beginning of the file
close the file resouce used
close the file resource used
close the file, get the size and content of the file.
close the files
close the handle so can remove dir in CLEAN section
close the handles
close the resource
close the resource used
close the resources
close the resources used
closed handle
closing resource
closing resource handle
closing resource handle used
closing resource handles
closing resources used
closing the file
closing the file "dummy.txt"
closing the file "dummy1.txt"
closing the file handle
closing the handle
closing the resource
closing the resource handles
closing the resources
closure binding to anonymous class
closure in use param
code blocks
code hasn't been analyzed ...
code to autoload based on directory
combination of associative and non-associative array
combination of numeric and associative arrays
combinition of associative and non-associative array
comment between declarations
comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comment comm
comment separates tokens like whitespace
comment this out and it works in PHP 5 too..
common field set, unifies
common file used
compact variations - arrays with references
compare all stat fields except access time
compare and leave on success
compare header results
compare self stats
compare the results with what we sent
compare the self stat
compare the stat
compare the stats
compare the two stats
compare the two stats - all except ctime
comparing stats after the deletion of subdir and file
comparison function
comparison function for SimpleClass2 objects which has more than one member
comparison function for SimpleClass2 objects which has more than one members
compile time constants
compile time static lookups
compressed file length does not match incompressed lentgh for an uncompressed file
compressed size
concatenated strings
conditional derive from redec gen
config file or args overwrite env var config settings
configure DOCUMENT_ROOT for web tests this assumes that directories from the base url matches directory depth from the base path
configure test paths from config file or command line
confirm file deleted
confirm file deleted delete deleted file
confirm file doesnt exist
confirm file is deleted
confirm file is deleted now close file handle
confirm file is deleted remove temp dir
confirm file is deleted remove the dir
confirm file pointer is not at eof close the file
confirm link is deleted
confirm link is deleted delete temp file
confirm the file pointer position
conformance to Unicode 5.2, section 3.9, D92
connect and table inc connect to mysql and create tables
connection function tests
considering case
consistent overflow-behavior - THIS CONTRADICTS ZEND's BEHAVIOR
consistent with reference, but perhaps not particularly useful
const - const
const - reg
const comment
constants irrelevent for conversion purposes
construct a job definition for each test and add it to the master plan
constructor params
constructors
contain hexadecimal digits 2.
contain hexadecimal digits but do not correspond to 'correct' ints
contains japanese characters, ASCII digits and different, UTF-8 encoded digits
contentLengthB0
contentLengthB1
continue to check if next commonly locale is installed in the system
convert it to new type
convert it to null
convert to int for the test output...
converting stream type to int
copy of input array for next iteration
copy that dir into extras
copy the extensions
copy the handle
copy the sapi
copy to extras
copy to top level
copying the file
correct offset
correct php53 behaviour is to ignore the FILE_USE_INCLUDE_PATH unless the file already exists  in the include path.
correct php53 behaviour is to ingnore the FILE_USE_INCLUDE_PATH unless the file alread exists  in the include path.
correct way of doing above:
correspond to 'correct' integers
corrupt heap
could be a brand new node
could be a fast-terminating __Native loop
could be that MySQL/libmysql 5.6.9 had the flag already but it was no stable release
couldn't determine master  No server in a replica set connection was identified as the primary.
couldn't find a response  Code: 9  If the response was cached and now cannot be located.
couldn't find reply, please try again  Code: 11  The driver saves any database responses it cannot immediately match with a request.
couldn't get response header  Code: 4  A common error if the database or network goes down.
cp1251 Windows-1251, win-1251, 1251 Windows-specific Cyrillic charset.
cp1252 Windows-1252, 1252 Windows specific charset for Western European.
cp866 ibm866, 866 DOS-specific Cyrillic charset.
cpu The amount of time the process is allowed to use the CPU.
create 1 file with some contents
create a basic stream class
create a blank image
create a child object implementing array access
create a copy of the array
create a dir
create a file
create a file in dir1
create a file in the middle directory
create a file in the script directory
create a file in working directory
create a file stream resource
create a file with 512 bytes size
create a link
create a new cURL resource
create a new iterator of the required type.
create a new mailbox and add two new messages to it
create a new temporary file
create a object of each class defined above
create a prepared statement
create a proxy object implementing array access
create a recursive array
create a reference to a modifiable lvalue
create a temp file
create an arc and fill it with white color
create an arc with white color
create an empty file
create an empty file and write the strings with tags
create an object
create copies and destroy later
create directories
create directories and files
create directory
create directory and files
create directory to be passed as string value where possible
create dom document
create file
create file file
create file of size 12000 bytes
create file with following type of contents
create file, read the file content, delete file
create files
create files within the temporary directory
create global parser and printers
create hard link
create hard link to file
create if it doesn't exist
create image
create in cwd
create link delete the link
create mailbox to test whether options has been set to CL_EXPUNGE
create new class from original scalar assignment
create new phar by mkdir
create new table and select from it
create only the file, as base and subdir is already created
create soft link
create soft link and record stat
create soft link to file
create sub_dir
create sub_sub_dir
create temp dir
create temp directory
create temp file
create temp file and directory
create temp file and insert data into it
create temp file, link
create temp file, link and directory
create temporary directories - will remove in CLEAN section
create temporary directory for test, removed in CLEAN section
create temporary file
create test table
create the dots pattern
create the file
create the file and add the content with has csv fields
create the file and test read
create the file to test write
create the include directory structure
create the link
create the multiple cURL handle
create the soft links to the file
create the src dir
create the temp dir
create the temp file
create the temporary directories
create the temporary directory
create tmp table
create/set the dynamic property "color"
creates a copy
creates a new object of the same type.
creating 4 bytes of hole
creating a context
creating a file
creating a file resource
creating an array of strings to be compared
creating an array with resource types as elements
creating an array with resources as elements
creating and deleting subdir and files in the dir
creating anonymous function dynamically
creating dir
creating directories and files
creating directories, symbolic links and files
creating directory
creating dumping file
creating file
creating file in write mode
creating file resource
creating hard link
creating hard link to non_existent file
creating hard links
creating hardlink
creating link to a file in different dir with the same name as the file
creating new file
creating new object
creating new object create a file
creating new object error: as wrong datatype for second argument
creating object with members as filename
creating object with members as linkname
creating object with members as numeric and non-numeric filename and directory name
creating parse.ini file
creating soft link
creating sub-directory test1 under mkdir, expected: false
creating symlink
creating temp dir
creating temp directory and file
creating temp directory which will contain temp file and links created
creating temp file
creating the file
creating the file except for x mode
creating the files
creating the files in existing dir
creating the links
creating the sym link
cstime - system time used by current process and children.
curl handler
current directory
current element
current file pointer position
current file pointer position after rewind operation
current filesize
current location
current state
currently, we only have maps to single-byte encodings
cursor not found  Code: 2  The driver was trying to fetch more results from the database, but the database did not have a record of the query.
custom implementation
cut as false
cut as true
cutime - user time used by current process and children.
data The maximum size of the data segment for the process, in bytes.
data consistency
data may be in any pecl/yaml suitable type
database DNS
daylight saving time is in effect
daylight saving time is not in effect
debug output
debugging detail in output.
decimal numeric string
decimal values as permission
declarationn of the interface 'iTemplate'
declare a class
declaring a class
declaring class
declaring field as optional is possible only in type annotation
declaring global variable
decreasing values
decrements twice before incrementing
default action is to make a shallow copy
default args
default arguments
default base
default break and cut value
default calendar is gregorian
default compile time lookup
default constructor
default fetch mode is BOTH, so we see if the ctor can overwrite that
default internal encoding
default invocation
default key
default length
default pad_type
default setting
default to value
default when we don't know how to detect
define a class
define a default un-caught exception handler
define a level-1 namespace
define a level-2 namespace that happens to have a level-1 prefix
define a level-2 namespace who's prefix is not an existing level-1 ns
define a number of classes that should use the same amount of memory as X, so that X will be allocated at a different address on each request
define a simple generator that returns a series of consecutive values
define fL2 inside fL1
define fL3 inside fL2
define it as an enum in this request
define some class with method
define some classes
define the array of mask strings
define the files to go into these directories, create one in dir2
define these once
define two c-constants
define two d-constants
definig array of start values
defining 'from' argument
defining 'str' argument
defining 'to' argument
defining a class
defining a common function
defining a couple of sample classes
defining a resource
defining an array of len values
defining an array of strings
defining an array of various char formats
defining array of char formats
defining array of different heredoc strings
defining array of different hexa formats
defining array of different len values
defining array of different mask strings
defining array of different start values
defining array of float formats
defining array of int formats
defining array of len values
defining array of mask strings
defining array of non-scientific formats
defining array of octal formats
defining array of scientific formats
defining array of start values
defining array of string formats
defining array of unsigned formats
defining array with keys as heredoc strings
defining array with values as heredoc strings
defining arrays for input strings and tokens
defining class
defining class for object variable
defining different heredoc strings
defining the array for start values
defining varous strings with embedded nulls
definite quantifiers 2.
definitely a prime gmp_random -- not implemented gmp_scan0 "0" bit is found at position 3.
definitely not a prime
definition of input args
definition of required variables
definitions of required input variables
definitions of required variables
deflate string
delete all files created
delete an index that does not exist - trigger error
delete as much output buffers as possible
delete file
delete file with name
delete file with name fwrite_variation1.tmp
delete file with name fwrite_variation2.tmp
delete file with name fwrite_variation3.tmp
delete file with name fwrite_variation4.tmp
delete files
delete files created
delete link
delete temp dir
delete temp dir created
delete temp file
delete temp file created here
delete temp files
delete temporary files
delete the file
delete the file created
delete the link
delete the link clear the cache
delete the link created
delete the links
delete the links created
delete the temp file
delete the temporary file
deletes "dummy.txt"
deletes "dummy1.txt"
deleting file
deleting temporary directory
deleting the link
deleting the links
delimiter :
demonstrate that none of these are added
depends on the build - experimental
derive from redec gen
derived.php
despite the indenting that suggests the true path has 2 statements, in the absence of braces, the true path is the first statement only.
destroy the variable using unset
determine max program depth starting at statement array
determine test type
different OS order files differently so will store file names into an array so can use sorted in expected output
different arrays
different arrays as input
different arrays used to test he function
different arrays used to test the function
different data types to be iterated over
different file modes
different heredoc strings
different heredoc strings empty heredoc string
different heredoc strings for 'ending'
different heredoc strings for 'str'
different heredoc strings single line heredoc string
different input string variation
different integer vlaues
different invalid format strings
different magnitude's
different offsets
different offsets, including negative and beyond size
different pad_lengths
different scalar and nonscalar values in place of callback function
different scalar variables which are unset
different scalar/non scalar values for 'input' argument
different scalar/non-scalar values for array input
different scalar/nonscalar values for 'source'
different scalar/nonscalar values to be used in place of an 'input' argument
different scalar/nonscalar values to be used in place of callback function
different servers may do different things on non-200 results for instance, IIS will deliver it's own error pages, so we cannot expect to match up the EXPECT section.
different single quoted string for 'str'
different strings containing regular chars and special chars
different subarrays
different types of 'input' array
different types of arrays
different valid  arrays
different valid  boolean vlaues
different valid  float values
different valid  float vlaues
different valid  integer values
different valid  integer vlaues
different valid  null vlaues
different valid  scalar vlaues
different valid  string
different valid data
different valid float vlaues
different valid numeric  vlaues
different valid strings
different values for 'chunklen'
different values for 'cmp_function'
different values for 'ending'
different values for 'ending' argument
different values for 'input' argument
different values for 'split_length'
different values for 'str'
different values for 'str' argument
different values for chunklen
different values for directory permissions
different variables which are used as elements of 'array_arg'
different variations of associative array
dir This element contains the absolute path to the home directory of the user.
dir resource handle deleted
dir without write permissions
directory as member
directory dir_variation91 with one sub-directory sub_dir11 and sub-sub-directory sub_dir111
directory dir_variation92 with one sub-directory sub_dir21
directory name stored in an object
directory type resource
disallow clone
disallow cloning
disallow cloning once forever
disjoint field sets, does not unify
display emacs/msvc error output
display the file content, check the file size
do as much as we can do in 5 seconds
do like operation in native php.
do not require all sub iterators to be valid in iteration
do not run linter if there are no changes
do not touch these files
do nothing for now.
do nothing, since all variables are defined as constants already
do nothing.
do some folding here, for blocks
doTests go all out.
doc comment
doc_comment compiler global now contains this Foo comment
documents if no file is provided, it reads from standard input.
does not contain any implementation that is potentially mutable.
does not exist
doesn't exist
doesn't exist bcause of DST
doesn't fatal or warn
doesn't fatal, raises strict standards warning
doesn't matter
doesn't work with InnoDB, which is default in 5.5
doesn't wotk anyway
don't allow tests to retrieve files from anywhere but this subdirectory
don't ask, and don't send results to QA if true
don't bail - column type might not be supported by the server, ignore this
don't bail - it might be that the server does not support the data type
don't bail, engine might not support the datatype
don't call parent
don't error, just silently stop
don't free anything
don't print the message since it can be different
don't print things here, since this tests what accumulates in the output buffer.
double quoted key
double quoted string
double quoted string value
double quoted strings
double_encode false
double_encode true
download the packages into the destination
draw a couple of vertical dashed lines
draw a red polygon
draw the eclipse
draw the polygon
drive letters
driver:decl_type The SQL type used to represent the column value in the database.
drop test table
drop tmp table
dst_image is the destination image, src_image is the source image identifier.
dtor prints here
dummy sope is Closure
dummy sope is Closure should have the same effect
dump and see if its destroyed, expcted: NULL
dump it remove the execute permisson from parent dir, allowing all permission for sub dir
dump the arguments to check that they are passed with proper type
dump the array after element was unset
dump the array to see its unset
dump the array to see that its intact
dump the array to see that that array did not get modified because of using isset, empty and unset on its element
dump the converted data
dump the current locale
dump the handle  try read directory, expected : false
dump the input array to ensure that it wasn't changed
dump the input values to see if they are  passed with correct type
dump the objec to check that all variables are unset
dump the object check the object and member that is not set
dump the object to see the effect, none expected
dump the point to see that variable was unset
dump the resource first
dump the resulting array
dump the sorted array
dump the stat returned value
dump the var
dumpit5.php  a command-line script which dumps the given HTML, PHP, ASP, XHTML, etc.
duplicate key
duplicate key names
duplicate values
duplicate values 3.
dynamic calls to eval are a fatal
e.g. "hostname:port" or a path to a local socket e.g. ":/path/to/socket" for the localhost.
e.g. Add/delete elements, unset elements, etc.
e.g. PHPUnit 3.7.28 by Sebastian Bergmann.
each of these should "just work" but stresses NewPackedArray logic.
eat up all results
echo "Inside " .
echo "Testing int with default null constant" .
echo "Testing int with null null constant" .
echo "len before rtrim: " .
echo 'Top with line-break: ' .
echo 'Top without line-break: ' .
echo the fields which are common to all platforms
echoMeStringRequest with endpoint NOT header destination, doesn't have to understand
echoMeStringRequest with endpoint NOT header destination, must understand
echoMeStringRequest with endpoint as header destination, must understand
echoMeStringRequest with endpoint header destination, must understand, invalid namespace, should receive a fault
echoMeStructRequest with endpoint NOT header destination, doesn't have to understand
echoMeStructRequest with endpoint NOT header destination, must understand
echoMeStructRequest with endpoint as header destination, must understand
echoMeUnknown with endpoint NOT header destination, doesn't have to understand
echoMeUnknown with endpoint NOT header destination, must understand
echoMeUnknown with endpoint as header destination, must understand
element: UTF-8 string
element: boolean
emit an undefined warning
empty array
empty array test
empty class
empty count
empty filename
empty function without return value
empty heardoc string
empty heredoc string
empty iteration
empty linkname
empty namesapce
empty namespace
empty pathname
empty paths
empty string
empty string as filename
empty string as linkname
empty string prefix
emulated...
enable below to get the output in verbose mode.
end HTTPRequest
end creating stream open an SplFileObject using the above test stream
end delete containing large stmt
end expr delete
end multi-stmt delete
end of File content type loop
end of file_content_types loop
end of file_mode loop
end of file_modes loop
end of for - mode_counter
end of for close the file
end of for loop
end of foreach
end of inner for loop
end of inner for loop delete the file created
end of inner for loop delete the file created : fwrite_basic.tmp
end of inner foreach loop
end of innerloop for delete the file
end of mode loop
end of offset loop close the file and check the size
end of offset loop close the file and check the size, the size will have increased by 10 bytes because of holes
end of outer for loop
end of outer foreach loop
end of outerloop for
end of whence loop close the file and check the size
end single line delete
end up at BOF so that randomly generated seek offsets below will know where they are supposed to be
endless-loop protection
endpoints to skip
enforce implicit cleaning of the wire and skipping the last row
enforce seperation
enforced immediately with TUnrelated parent
enforced onto C1
enforced onto C1 with A as parent
enough to fool hphpc into leaving the IssetS,EmptyS opcodes
ensure file pointer at end
ensure in ext/standard/tests/file
ensure legacy token name is returned
ensure none of the dir tar files were freed
ensure nothing blows up when attempting to format objects of the wrong type
ensure stub is not overwritten
ensure that dir doesn't exists
ensure that dir was renamed
ensure that file got renamed to new name
ensure that file pointer is at eof
ensure that file pointer is at eof close the file
ensure that file pointer is at eof now file is at the end try reading with length and allowable tags,expecting false
ensure that file pointer is not at end
ensure that file pointer position is not changed
ensure that internal pointer is moved to last element
ensure that link doesn't exists
ensure that link got renamed
ensure that link was renamed
ensure that rename worked fine
ensure the file pointer position
ensure thta file pointer is at eof
ensure thta file pointer is at eof close file
ensuring that it is only for E_STRICT
enter hook throws the fatal
entire 2-d array
enusre if eof set
enusre if eof set close file
equivalent to above, just has explicit operand
errcontext   The fifth parameter is optional, errcontext, which is an array that points to the active symbol table at the point the error occurred.
errfile   The third parameter is optional, errfile, which contains the filename that the error was raised in, as a string.
errline The fourth parameter is optional, errline, which contains the line number the error was raised at, as an integer.
error - one of the branches result in a map-like array
error condition, first argument as object
error getting database response: errstr  WSA error getting database response: errstr  "errstr" is an io error reported directly from the C socket subsystem.
error getting socket  Code: 10  The socket was closed or encountered an error.
error messages
error out of scope
error style for editors or IDE's
error, Existing exists
error, Something already exists
error, args is array
error: as wrong datatype for second argument
error: int incompatible with string
error: unexpected type
errstr The second parameter, errstr, contains the error message, as a string.
escape character
escape characters
escape sequence chars with key values
escape sequences
establish a new un-caught exception handler
euro currency symbol in ISO-8859-1
eval fails if no newline
example from HTML5, section 2.4
exceeds 32 bits
exception message
exception must be throwed from error handler.
exclude system traits
excluding some files
exclusive/with comments first child element of doc element is context.
exclusive/without comments first child element of doc element is context.
exclusive/without comments using xpath query.
executable that will be tested.
execute query
execute stmt
execute the handles
execution is suspended here, so the following never gets run:
existing add server.
existing phar.zip, alias set
existing phar.zip, no alias set
expect 30,30
expect cc and dd to be 10 and 30
expect false
expect h to be defined and be 10
expect the inner array to be defined
expect true
expect true New stat values taken after creation of file
expect true compare the two stat values, initial stat and stat recorded after  creating file, also dump the value of stats
expect true compare the two stat values, initial stat and stat recorded after  creating files and link, also dump the value of stats
expect y and z to be undefined
expected 19 chars
expected : 0
expected : 1 char
expected : false
expected : no character should be read
expected : no chars should be read
expected : true
expected array is 10,10
expected false
expected of 2
expected to be TRUE, actually FALSE
expected true
expected:  2148
expected: 0
expected: 100 trying to write more than the available data, available 1024 bytes but trying 2048
expected: 1024
expected: 1024/2
expected: 2148
expected: 22 chars
expected: 400
expected: 50
expected: Missing argument Warning
expected: OK
expected: Warning is suppressed
expected: default key 0, value will be replaced by 'bool_key4'   numeric keys
expected: false
expected: false as file handle is still open now close file handle
expected: false close the file, get the size and content of the file.
expected: false reassign write permission to temp file
expected: false remove temp dir
expected: true
expected: true check the filesize and content close the file, get the size and content of the file.
expected: true delete hard link
expected: true on linux
expected: true unlink soft link
expected: value will be replaced by 'bool_key3'
expected: value will be replaced by 'null_key2'
expecting "changed"
expecting 10,3
expecting 1024
expecting false
expecting false rename a existing dir to new name
expecting max_length not to be set
expecting max_length not to be set and be 0 in all cases
expecting max_length to _be_ set
expecting true
expecting true delete the link file now
expecting true on file
expecting true remove the file
expecting true remove the new dir
expecting true rename a hard link across dir
expecting true rename a link across dir
expecting true try to rename an non_existing dir
expecting: default key 0, value will be replaced by 'FALSE'   numeric keys
expecting: value will be replaced by 'NULL'
expecting: value will be replaced by 'TRUE'
expects arg
expects the keys not to be preserved
expects the keys to be preserved
explicit close
explicit errors
explicit numeric keys and numeric values
explicit numeric keys, string values
explicitly in current namespace
explicitly in top-level scope
explicitly inconsistent with C1
explicitly requesting default
exponential value
exptected true
ext/mysqli will not consider it as a 'persistent' connection in a user sense, ext/mysqli will not appy max_persistent etc.
extends keyword
extends string, padding with spaces
extension This doc comment block generated by idl/sysdoc.php
extra code coverage
extra coverage
extract all tests from the CI definition
extract details using long  format
extract details using short format
extract information we need from workflow or CLI
extract one file
extract sandcastle URL from the response
extract two files
extracts file descriptor information from a multi handle.
fL1 definition continues here
fL2 definition continues here
facebook with Cyrillic spoof characters
fails at runtime, but we don't unpack the container's content type because issuing errors for mixed pretty much destroys the feature
fails the requirements of T1
failure, expected Point
failure, expected string
fall through
fallthrough
false Cleanup.
false as linkname
false in stric mode
false in strict mode
false true if exist
false true if not exist with expiration
fatal error
fb_debug_backtrace - returns the current backtrace minus junk.
fbcode is a sub-repo.
feel free to add more yourself
feof is not set to true until you try to read past the end of file.
fetch all results from server, but skip on client side
fetch all rows but the last one
fetch from the interop server
fetch stats
fetch will increment
fetching none, but stats should not be affected - current implementation
fflush and end the output buffering to internal output buffer
fgetc using unset handle
fgets moves the read position.
fgets using unset handle
field redeclaration, error
figure out additional DLL's that are required
file as it is represented in the document model.
file as member
file does not exist
file extension of pages requested via http this allows for php to be configured to parse extensions other than php, useful for multiple configurations under a single webserver
file given to is_link
file input instead of directory
file is modified, get a list of tests that execute this file
file length is too short
file name containing ASCII values
file name containing blank space
file name only with extension
file name starts with blank space
file name starts with numeric and with regular extension
file name stored in an object
file name that is created by create_files
file name with numeric extension
file pointer position
file pointer position after read
file pointer position close the file handle
file pointer to 0
file resource
file resource handle deleted
file should not exist before test
file stream resource
file string  The current file name.
file that's explicitly weak
file that's implicitly weak
file type resource
file_content_type loop
file_mode loop
filename Path to the temporary file name created origfilename The original filename, for uuencoded parts only The first filename entry is the message body.
filename as resource
filename as spaces
filename stored in array with single and double slash notation in its path
filename used here
filenames resulting in valid paths
filenames with invalid path
filesize The maximum size of the data segment for the process, in bytes.
filesize should be 1, and is 2
fill data into file
fill in the buffer
fill polygon with blue
fill polygon with green
fill the file with some data if mode is append mode
fill the fill with some data if mode is append mode
fill up caller-saved
filling data into the file
filling the file some data if mode is append mode
filling the file with some data if mode is append mode
find number of nested statements in statement array
find out TCP port that nobody listens on
find out file position
find the endpoint
finds "Hello, "
finds / followed by one or more of a-z, A-Z and 0-9, followed by zero or more .
finds any number that's not 4 and replaces it with a 4
finds dashes with an indefinite amount of whitespace around them and replaces them with a full stop precedeby no spaces and followed by one space
finish invalid
first args as array
first args as boolean
first argument as floating point value
first create the dir/subdir and files, record the stat
first element
first get a list of all directories
first insert normal value to force initial send of types
first object in array
first test uncompressing invalid string
fix for windows
fix list item's 2nd lines
flag  value as defualt 2.
flag  value as defualt SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally
flag a swap between good and bad
flag value as default SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally SORT_NUMERIC - compare items numerically SORT_STRING - compare items as strings
flag value as defualt 2.
flag value as defualt SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally
flag value as defualt SORT_REGULAR - compare items normally SORT_NUMERIC - compare items numerically SORT_STRING - compare items as strings
flags An integer representing the bit-flags for the field.
flags Any flags set for this column.
flags is also set, which contains a bitmask which can be checked against any of the above constants.
flags, services, regex, and replacement: Parameters as defined by RFC 2915.
float array with duplicate values
float array with scientific notations
float as return value
float const
float key values
float numeric strings
float operand
float type variations
float value
float value array
float value, beyond max negative int
float value, beyond max positive int
float values
floating point representation
flush image
flush the xml buffer using optional flust argument, default is 1
fn call with three args
fn call with two args
followed by zero or more / all more than once.
following operations should not work
following operations should work
foo is foobar You can also use arrays
fopen with interesting windows paths.
for arrays, classes
for binary safe
for each handlers in helpers in original order
for each op1.op_type
for each op2.op_type
for functions
for tables with only basic entities, this member is to be accessed directly for better performance:
for test purposes only
for type aliases
for type aliases only
force a fetch of endpoints, this happens irregardless if no endpoints in database
force conversion from tuple-like to vec-like
force conversion of inner stream to STDIO.
force generator
force integration
force passive connection
force stats update
force stats update drive memory up to its highest peak in the script
force translation
forcefully interpret an UTF-8 encoded string as EUC-JP and then convert it back to UTF-8.
foreach API
foreach by ref
formated string for display This doc comment block generated by idl/sysdoc.php
formats the time value as a string.
forward one week, then behaves like above for week days
found a valid element to start on
found element as first elemet in another iterator
found valid element in current inner iterator
found,  key is in member array
found, public member
free resultset after close
free some links but let index 1 remain
free statement after close
from commit: a0d62f08ae8cbebc88e5c92e08fca8d0cdc7309d
from post or get data
from: https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/3336
ftell on a file handle which is already closed
ftell on a file handle which is unset
ftruncate on a file handle which is unset
ftruncate on close file handle
full buffer dumped every time
full stacktrace
function don't allow promotion
function having 2 declared parameters
function name
function name as NULL
function name having boolean value
function name with boolean name
function name with mixed string and integer
function name with simple string
function name with string and special character
function name within double quotes
function name within single quotes
function name without quotes
function to handle catchable errors
function to parse the http auth header
function to remove directory handle before re-using variable name in test and to ensure directory is not in use at CLEAN section so can me removed
functions don't get the var in scope
functions, or FALSE if there are no more entries to read, or an error code if an error occurred.
fwrite on a file handle which is unset
fwrite to fail
gather all the locales installed in the system
gecos GECOS is an obsolete term that refers to the finger information field on a Honeywell batch processing system.
general other files
generate a random challenge
generate different failure conditions
generate new private key of specified size to use for tests
generate some random seek offsets
generate the function
generate the function call
generate the valid response
generated by idl-to-hni.php
generator is closed here, without running SWITCH_FREE
get UID for new message
get a class
get a file handle
get a heredoc string
get a reference variable
get a resouce variable
get a resource
get a resource type variable
get a resource variable
get an infinitely recursive array
get an object
get an resource variable
get an unset array variable
get an unset variable
get class methods
get context node and check "a:foo"
get different types of array
get dynamic invisible property
get dynamic property
get endpoints for this test
get first result
get functions
get hdr details
get heredoc
get host name from URL
get it back
get last two segments of host name
get methods
get next result
get only the methods from the extension we are querying
get our endpoint
get resource
get resource handle
get resource variable
get the Xenon data then verify that there are no unknown functions and that all of the functions in this file are in the stack
get the contents from the internal output buffer
get the current data type
get the data of size 1024
get the data of size 512
get the dynamic property "color"
get the file pointer to beginning of the file
get the list of installed extensions
get the resource
get the set of included files
get the set of required files
get the thread ids of the two connections...
get two or three function names to play with...
get visible property
getAllKeys doesn't seem to work until after another operation
get_class_method reports different constructor names
gets applied before constructor runs
getting a sibling as reference node to insert
getting resource
getting resource type for file handle
getting the parent node as reference node to insert
getting the resource
gid Group ID of the group in numeric form.
gid Group ID, should be the same as the gid parameter used when calling the function, and hence redundant.
gid The group ID of the user.
give nicer values
give the server a second to really kill the thread
giving NULL as the argument
giving a normal string
giving arguments as NULL
giving arguments more than expected
giving long string to check for proper memory re-allocation
gmp_divexact
gmp_hamdist
gmp_legendre
gmp_nextprime
gmp_perfect_square
gmp_popcount
gmp_prob_prime
gmp_scan1 "0" bit is found at position 3.
gmp_sqrtrem
gmp_testbit
go through method info array marking this function as tested
go to the end
grab the bootstrap script
grapheme_extract extract_type
greater than
greek in UTF-8 to be converted to iso-8859-7
greek strings in UTF-8
group of escape sequences
group of various arrays
group of various arrays with indices
hack to instanciate an object without constructor
hack to make tests work with MS SoapToolkit it's the only one that uses this soapaction, and breaks if it isn't right.
hack to skip reserved words
handle Resource of type curl indicates the handle which it concerns.
handle empty FS
handle empty FV
handle exception
handle file-open failure
handle size
handled exception
hard link name used
has explicit return value, so when included, that value is returned
has no __toString method
has no inputs
has no public property "color"
has sub node statements
hash the output
hash_equals - Compare two strings in constant time  Note that this function is meant to be slower than a standard strcmp which short-circuits the comparison once the result is known.
have a negative shift
haystack as needle
headers can be either an associative array keyed by header name, or an indexed array, where each element contains a single header line.
helper for ctor
helpers This doc comment block generated by idl/sysdoc.php
here doc with different whitespaces
here doc with multiline string
here doc with numeric values
here is the problem
here we execute the orders
here you can see the bar member var beeing a string
heredoc array with  unset variable
heredoc array with object, unset variable and resource variable
heredoc array with unset variable
heredoc keys
heredoc string
heredoc string containing embedded 'new line chars'/'new lines' in the string
heredoc string value
heredoc string with NULL
heredoc string with blank line
heredoc string with only numeric values
heredoc string with only numerics
heredoc string with single character
heredoc strings
heredoc with blank line
heredoc with different white space characters
heredoc with different whitespaces
heredoc with empty value
heredoc with multiline
heredoc with multiline string
heredoc with numeric values
heredoc with quoted strings and numeric values
heredoc with quotes and slashes
heredoc with special characters
hex in string
hex integers
hex value as permission
hexa decimal numbers
hexa-decimal integer data
hexadecimal 'digits'
hexadecimal as integer
hexadecimal number
hexadecimal numeric string
hexadecimal type variations
hexadecimal value
hexadecimal values
hhvm phpunit
hhvm seems inconsistent in how this array is sorted, so...
hi test foo
hide e_warning warning about timezones
hide errors from interrupted syscalls
home dir shortcut char
hopefully we'll never see a file name that's not covered by this regular expression...
hphp output: Hello, 3dude
hphp output: Hello, 5
hphp output: Hello, uh oh
hphpc won't call the autoloader unless there exists a  definition for the class somewhere
hphpc won't call the autoloader unless there exists a definition for the class somewhere
http://3v4l.org/8Peti
http://3v4l.org/FtFt6
http://3v4l.org/S4isH
http://3v4l.org/T1JaE
http://3v4l.org/qa6EP
http://3v4l.org/sbf0s
http://icu-project.org/apiref/icu4c/ucsdet_8h.html
http://www.php.net/manual/en/language.operators.comparison.php
https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/2408
https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/3094
https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/3096
https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/3899
https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/4084
https://github.com/facebook/hhvm/issues/4086
https://github.com/php/php-src/pull/865
huge negative value
i - add PID of the current process currently PHP is not multi-threaded, so it should be save to test for the PID of this PHP process
i got nothin
i stands for integer with base detection.
iconv.internal_encoding  ISO-8859-1   output-charset string  Specifies the character set to use to compose the MIME header.
iconv.internal_encoding  UTF-8   line-length integer  Specifies the maximum length of the header lines.
id column - skip it
identical to at, implemented for ArrayAccess
identical to containsKey, implemented for ArrayAccess
identifier name contains underscore
identifier name starts with underscore
identifiers for the actual locale, valid locale WARNING: The values described here are NOT the actual values in PHP code.
if 0 look into entity
if at some point internal encoding changes, set correct one in INI section or use file 'TranslitFail1.ISO-8859-1'.
if conversion to string is done by echo, for example, an exeption is thrown.
if fewer arguments are passed than there are paramaters declared, a warning is issued and the parameters corresponding to each each omitted argument are undefined
if imap_close was successful test whether CL_EXPUNGE was set by doing a message count
if it errors out, just ignore it and rely on regular methods
if no content, return false
if null or the empty string, the default time zone for the runtime is used.
if running local, calls executeCode, otherwise does an http request
if set, copy phpt files into this directory, which should be accessible via an http server.
if the test uses POST or GET, and it's not the cgi executable, skip
if this is a cgi test, prepare for it
if this is a cgi, remove the headers first
if this is in our skip list, skip it
if this is negative, we have a 32-bit int
if true doesn't run tests, just outputs executable info
if we had a simple cast to unsigned char, this would be the same as 0
if we haven't reached our startpoint, skip
if we specify an endpoint, skip until we find it
if we want to manage our own padding
if we're doing web testing, then we wont be able to set ini setting on the command line.
if we're looking for a specific method, skip unless we have it
if..elseif....else
ignore INSERT error, NOTE: command line returns 0, affected_rows returns -1 as documented
ignore exception tested elsewhere
ignore here
ignore it, we might not have sufficient permissions
ignore response Let client run until script quits
ignore some well-known system dlls
ignore stuff in our build dir, but only if it is one of our targets
ignore this error
ill-formed name, but no error.
imagescale - Scale an image using the given new width and height.
implement abstract 'AbstractClass' class
implement abstract 'abstract_class' class
implement abstract class
implement the interface
implement the interface 'iTemplate'
implemented for ArrayAccess
implicit close
implicitly in current namespace
implicitly public
implicitly weak mode code
import PHP-Parser
impossible to assign this since we don't return references here
in /home/hartmut/projects/php/dev/head/ext/xml/tests/bug30266.php on line 22
in collections mode, all traits get an additional static method
in collections mode, any class using a trait gets an additional static method
in php, it incorrectly reports problems with iv in ECB mode.
in the future we can store size separately and pad the array
in the version strings and also inserts dots .
in this context, equivalent to using a null statement
inaccessible, by default
include a snapshot identifier
include common file related test functions
include common file test functions
include file for imap_stream
include file.inc
include file.inc for create_files function
include for create_files/delete_files functions
include the common file related test functions
include the file.inc for common functions for test
include the file.inc for common test funcitons
include the header for common test function
include the trailing slash
inclusive/with comments first child element of doc element is context.
inclusive/without comments first child element of doc element is context.
incomplete header  Code: 7  Highly unusual.
incomplete response  Code: 8  Highly unusual.
incorrect parameter type
increase max nesting to account for deep scripts
increases array to 4 elements
increases array to 5 elements
increases code coverage by having ufp open
increasing and decreasing values
increasing values
increment by one to create the situation  of accessing beyond array size
increment by one to create the situation of accessing beyond array size
increment the value of the static.
increment with initial value only works with binary protocol
increments twice before decrementing
index starts at 0
index starts at 5
indexed array
infinite loop to simulate long processing
information scripts
inherited constructor
ini_set with values expecting numbers but given an empty string
initial sanity checks for no overflow
initialing required variables
initialing required variables defining different heredoc strings
initialing required variables defining different strings
initialing required variables initialing required variables
initialise 'num_req' variable
initialise associative arrays
initialise different arrays
initialise the first argument
initialise the multi-dimensional array
initialise the second argument
initialise the second array
initialising  heredoc strings
initialising a heredoc string
initialising required variables
initialising the required variables
initialising the string array
initialize all required variables
initialize all required variables get an unset variable
initialize the 2-d array
initialize the array having duplicate keys
initialize the array having duplicate values
initialize the second argument
initializes a global, creating it if necessary
initializing object member value
initializing the args array
initializing the array
initializing the format array
initializing variables
initially giving the locale
initially setting the locale
injection text from some user input
inner iterator
inner ones are redundant grouping parens
input array
input array containing elements as reference variables
input array containing references
input array with different false elements
insert 2 elements to hit our overridden compare
insert a new element with int key -10
insert a new element with int key 5
insert a new element with string key ""
insert a new element with string key "red"
insert new method record into info array
inserted new line
inserted new line in a string
inserts using a key of the next available int value
instanceof constant
instanceof does not change the expression id, though the type changes
instanceof has to make adjustments for the fact that arrays are Traversable
instanceof object
instanceof string variable
int as pieces
int not FooInt
int operand
integer array
integer array with duplicate values
integer as glue
integer as hexadecimal
integer as octal
integer numeric strings
integer overflow
integer type variations
integer value
integer values
integers, hex and octal
intentionally doing nothing for now
interface class
invalid args type, valid argument: array
invalid arguments
invalid attribute
invalid because readlink doesn't work with hardlink
invalid date
invalid domain
invalid expression
invalid file handle
invalid filename
invalid first argument
invalid handle
invalid index
invalid input
invalid key
invalid length argument
invalid mode -100
invalid numerics as its prefix with sign or have decimal points
invalid offset
invalid parameters
invalid password to use in this test
invalid pharname
invalid query, another warning
invalid regex  Code: 9  The regex passed to MongoRegex is not of the correct form.
invalid string data
invalid, does nothing
invokes c3::__callStatic
involving variables and other non-basic operators
ipv6: Address for this specific record to merge with chain.
is null or UNKNOWN:0
it has to be strictly an integer
it is getting worse.
it is undefined which pooled connection we get - thread ids may differ
it should been clean
it's a post-increment operation as to the codepoint, i.e., it gives the codepoint starting at the initial position and only then moves the pointer forward
it's can't be used since this will encounter error
item: details
iterate over again to get all different key values
iterate through array again to see which values are considered equal
iterate through original array
iterator API
ivs should be ignored in ecb mode
japenese utf-8
jumped to next Sunday
jumped to next Sunday again
just check that there is only one length
just checking it can be default-constructed...
just coverage
just drop the pcre-x.x.tar.xx here and run the script
just for demo
just make sure all the form constants are defined as in the api spec
just to be sure the most basic stuff really works we check it again...
keep f4bogus from fatalling
key 1.9 is truncated to key 1
key and value from array_index swapped
key can be a runtime expression
key can be a variable
key can be any value possible for an array index.
key of the current element
keys : 20 bytes, 24 bytes, 30 Bytes, 32 Bytes, 40 Bytes
keys are cache-unique, so storing a second value with the same key will overwrite the original value.
keys are created from sub iterators associated information
keys are created from sub iterators position
keys of an array that results from array_filter on a Container are mixed
kill the headers
l_linger not given
label column, result set charset
lambdas in class bodies
largest decimal
last host specification should be the one used
last row has been implicitly cleaned from the wire by freeing the result set
left-facing M not on baseline
left-facing M on baseline
left-facing M on ceiling
left-justification but with a cutoff of 10 characters
left-justification with spaces
len The length of this column.
length The width of the field, as specified in the table definition.
length as Null
length of the file name
length parameter given,not reading entire file
less than expected, 1 arg
less than expected,1 argument
let the OS run the sleep process before sending the signal
let the parent reply...
let y default
let's also generate/update the bundled .reg file
let's hope nobody changes auto_increment_increment while this code executes
let's hope we don't hit a MySQL running on that port...
let's make this mysqlnd only - for libmysql we need debug installation table.inc will create a database connection and run some SQL queries, therefore the debug file should have entries
let's try to play with stored procedures
lets be fair and do the most simple SELECT first
lets go crazy and create a few pconnections...
lets hope this is an invalid attribute code
lets hope we always run this in the same second as we did run the server info request...
lets see if the server agrees to that
lets see what the default is...
libmysql and mysqlnd will show the pdo_type entry at a different position in the hash
libmysql gives a less descriptive error message but mysqlnd, we did not unify the error messages but ignore this slight difference silently
libmysql needs this - otherwise we get a 2015 error
libmysql only
libmysql only - needs extra compile flag, no way to check properly in the PHP user land if its compiled in or not
libmysql return value seems to depend on server version
libmysql should return a string here whereas mysqlnd returns a native int
license length
likely the next iteration will not be within max_execution_time
likewise ...
limit var search to current location
limits to 5 replacements returns 444444789
limits to three replacements
line 2 line 3 line 4 line 5
line integer  The current line number.
lines with different whitespace charecter
link doesn't exists as not created, expected false
link doesn't exists as not created, expected false clear the cache
link files even though it original file doesn't exist yet
link name stored in an object
link name stored in side an array  with default numeric key
link name used
link name used here
linkname as spaces
linkname used to create soft/hard link
linknames resulting in valid paths
linknames with invalid linkpath
links copyright notice
list assignment generates a new expression id
list build-in extensions
list dependencies
list of 3 functions
list of arrays with key and values
list of arrays with/without key values
list of lists with blanks and nulls expect 10 20 40 50 60 70 80
list of lists with just variable assignments - expect 100,200,300
list of opcode handlers and helpers in original order
literally all of them.
little hack for last parameter
load list of enabled extensions
loads the SOAP request to the Document
looks like we can't change this, or it'd change the original zval instead..
loop over key sizes for test
loop through each element of 'input' with default callback
loop through each element of the 'heredoc_array' for 'str'
loop through each element of the 'values' for callback
loop through each element of the array for 'str'
loop through each element of the array for ...
loop through each element of the array for allowable_tags
loop through each element of the array for ar1
loop through each element of the array for ar2
loop through each element of the array for arg1
loop through each element of the array for args
loop through each element of the array for arr1
loop through each element of the array for arr2
loop through each element of the array for array_arg
loop through each element of the array for associative_array
loop through each element of the array for atime
loop through each element of the array for autoload
loop through each element of the array for base
loop through each element of the array for blue
loop through each element of the array for cipher
loop through each element of the array for class
loop through each element of the array for class_name
loop through each element of the array for classname
loop through each element of the array for cmp_function
loop through each element of the array for code
loop through each element of the array for context
loop through each element of the array for data
loop through each element of the array for data_comp_func
loop through each element of the array for data_compare_func
loop through each element of the array for day
loop through each element of the array for different heredoc and mask strings
loop through each element of the array for different values for 'num_req' argument
loop through each element of the array for dirname
loop through each element of the array for encoding
loop through each element of the array for errno
loop through each element of the array for filename
loop through each element of the array for flag
loop through each element of the array for flags
loop through each element of the array for format
loop through each element of the array for fp
loop through each element of the array for function_name
loop through each element of the array for get_as_float
loop through each element of the array for gid
loop through each element of the array for gmt_offset
loop through each element of the array for haystack
loop through each element of the array for heredoc str, mask str , start values and len values
loop through each element of the array for heredoc strings, mask strings and start values
loop through each element of the array for hour
loop through each element of the array for im
loop through each element of the array for imagefile
loop through each element of the array for imagetype
loop through each element of the array for info
loop through each element of the array for input
loop through each element of the array for ip_address
loop through each element of the array for iv
loop through each element of the array for key
loop through each element of the array for key_comp_func
loop through each element of the array for key_compare_func
loop through each element of the array for latitude
loop through each element of the array for len argument
loop through each element of the array for longitude
loop through each element of the array for mask
loop through each element of the array for mask argument
loop through each element of the array for maxlen
loop through each element of the array for method
loop through each element of the array for method_name
loop through each element of the array for min
loop through each element of the array for mode
loop through each element of the array for mon
loop through each element of the array for needle
loop through each element of the array for num check the working of array_fill
loop through each element of the array for obj
loop through each element of the array for object
loop through each element of the array for offset
loop through each element of the array for option
loop through each element of the array for options
loop through each element of the array for parameters
loop through each element of the array for parser
loop through each element of the array for part
loop through each element of the array for path
loop through each element of the array for pathname
loop through each element of the array for pattern
loop through each element of the array for pid
loop through each element of the array for preserve_keys
loop through each element of the array for process_sections
loop through each element of the array for proper_address
loop through each element of the array for quote_style
loop through each element of the array for recursive
loop through each element of the array for red
loop through each element of the array for sec
loop through each element of the array for sig
loop through each element of the array for size
loop through each element of the array for start
loop through each element of the array for str
loop through each element of the array for str argument
loop through each element of the array for strict argument
loop through each element of the array for string
loop through each element of the array for strval
loop through each element of the array for substchar
loop through each element of the array for suffix
loop through each element of the array for time
loop through each element of the array for timestamp
loop through each element of the array for traitname
loop through each element of the array for uid
loop through each element of the array for url
loop through each element of the array for url_component
loop through each element of the array for use_include_path
loop through each element of the array for value
loop through each element of the array for var
loop through each element of the array for whence
loop through each element of the array for year
loop through each element of the array for zenith
loop through each element of the arrays for all arguments
loop through each element of the arrays for str, mask and start argument
loop through each element of the arrays for str, mask and start arguments
loop through each element of the arrays for str,mask and start arguments
loop through each element of the arrays for str,mask,start and len arguments
loop through each element of the arrays for string and mask arguments
loop through each element of the cmp_values for 'cmp_function'
loop through each element of the heredoc_arr for 'str'
loop through each element of the heredoc_arr for str
loop through each element of the values for 'chunklen'
loop through each element of values for 'chunklen'
loop through each element of values for 'ending'
loop through each element of values for 'str' and default value of 'chunklen'
loop through each value of input_values
loop through each values for 'ending'
loop through element of values for 'ending'
loop through the array for 'array' argument
loop through the array for size argument
loop through to check possible variations
loop through to compare each string with the other string
loop through to compare the strings
loop through to compare the strings, for various length values
loop through to consider various offsets in getting the position of the needle in haystack string
loop through to find the length of each string
loop through to get the position of the needle in haystack string
loop through to go each and every element in an array  and comparing the elements with one and other
loop through to merge two arrays
loop through to replace the matched elements in the array
loop through to test each element in the above array
loop through to test each element in the above array  is a readable file
loop through to test each element in the above array  is a writable file
loop through to test each element in the above array  is an executable file
loop through to test each element in the above array is a readable file
loop through to test each element in the above array is a writable file
loop through to test each element in the above array is an executable file
loop through to test each element the above array
loop to check the file opened in different read modes
loop to check whether given object/string has valid given method name expected: true if valid callback false otherwise
loop to create and verify results
loop to test fclose with different invalid type of args
loop to test ftell with different invalid type of args
loop to test rewind with different invalid type of args
loop to test the function with each heredoc string in the array
loop to test working of lcfirst with different values
loop to test working of ucfirst with different values
loopback address
looping to check the behaviour of the function for each string in the array
loose type checking
lstat of link
main script definition continues here
main test harness
maintain file mtimes so that cvs doesnt get crazy
make default
make invisible to static analysis
make it UTF-8
make it a dynamic string
make it non-static
make it not-inlinable Make hhbbc not prove it's going to throw:
make sure 0b overflows like normal integers and 0x hexadecimal integer
make sure any multibyte output is in base 64
make sure it isn't catching exceptions that weren't thrown...
make sure kind still works
make sure normal strings work
make sure there's no regression in matching
make sure we are allowed to call functions
make sure we don't confuse the function argument for a type hint
make sure we suspend
make sure you can undo the custome serialization
make the 3D effect
manually list of tests we want to run in sandcastle
mark added messages for deletion
mark messages in inbox for deletion
mark the file for upload..
match zend on order of which properties are stored
matched the method name
matcherpattern.php
matchertarget.php
matching string having integer in beginning, result:true in loose type check
max -ne int value
max negative integer as hexadecimal
max negative integer as octal
max negative integer value
max positive hexadecimal integer
max positive integer
max positive integer as octal
max positive integer number
max positive integer value
max posotive octal integer
max postive integer as hexadecimal
maximum packet size up to which we test is 10M
maximum packet size up to which we test_mysqli_stmt_send_long_data_table_1 is 10M
maximum subnormal double
may be NULL
mb_ereg 'successfully' matching incorrectly:  Bug now seems to be fixed - error message is now generated when an 'empty' pattern is supplied to mb_ereg.
mb_strpos bounds check is byte count rather than a character count: The multibyte string should be returning the same results as the ASCII string.
mbstring currently implements the following encoding detection filters.
members This consists of an array of string's for all the members in the group.
memlock The maximum number of bytes of memory that may be locked into RAM.
memory leak only
memory, temp, etc
memsize and perm will be ignored.
message sequences instead of numbers
method b1 demostrates self vs.
method bits
method f1 demostrates self and parent
method record fields
method with a body in an interface
methods irrelevent for conversion purposes
min negative integer
min range of hexadecimal integer
min range of integer
min range of octal integer
minimum int divided by -1, shouldn't sigfpe
minimum int mod -1, shouldn't sigfpe
minimum is 7.0
minimum program string
minimum statement count
minumum subnormal double
miscelleous input
missing does not exist Test dynamic class, dynamic method name, static call
missing optional field in declared shape, does not unify
misspelled month name
mixed array
mixed assoc.
mixed associative array, containing null/empty/boolean values as key/value
mixed case function
mixed string with float and chars
mixed string with int and chars
mixed strings
mixed types
mixed value array
mixed value array with different key values
mixed value array with different types of keys
mixedbag is intended to run quickly and test a bunch of functionality.
mode can be in the range from 1 to the maximum value of unsigned long.
mode is ignored on Windows.
mode tells this function which calendar to convert the Julian Day Count to, and what type of month names are to be returned.
more __call testing
more arrays to be intersected
more comment
more doc comment
more important to check that all contents are present than order they are returned in
more than expected
more than expected no.
more than expected number of arguments
more than expected numbers
more than the expected number of arguments
move 40 bytes
move to next element
move up to ext/standard/tests
msg_ctime The time that the queue was last changed.
msg_lrpid The pid of the process that received the last message from the queue.
msg_lspid The pid of the process that sent the last message to the queue.
msg_perm.gid The gid of the owner of the queue.
msg_perm.mode The file access mode of the queue.
msg_qbytes The maximum number of bytes allowed in one message queue.
msg_qnum The number of messages waiting to be read from the queue.
msg_rtime The time that the last message was received from the queue.
msg_stime The time that the last message was sent to the queue.
mtime Checksum in the middle...
multi line heredoc string
multi query
multicodepoint entities
multiline heredoc string
multiple car as glue
multiple elements
multiple existence of needle in haystack
multiple key
multiple layers
multiple separators
multiple spaces
multiplier has to be  greater than or equal to 0.
multiplier has to be greater than or equal to 0.
must be allowed
must not recurse
must not yield anything
must return NULL
must return false
my doc comment
myA has myB, comleting the cycle
myB attaches myC
myC has a referece to myA
mysql_driver.c
mysqli will use the default 3306
mysqli.default_socket requires non-empty string
mysqlnd is a bit more verbose than libmysql.
mysqlnd only
mysqlnd only option m - trace memory allocations
mysqlnd returns native types
mysqlnd will give 2014 as a follow-up of the fallback logic libmysql will give a little more precise 2030 error code However, you get an error and the big question is what happens to the line
mysqlnd: force seperation - create copies
n stands for number of characters processed so far.
name The name of this column as returned by the database.
nameLengthB0
namespace HH
namespace keyword
namespaced class name
native types - int
need a bigger string, with big output
needed for PostgreSQL
needle and haystack are examined in a case-insensitive manner.
needle as NULL
needle as a first word of haystack
needle as haystack
needle as haystack needle string containing one existing and one non-existing char
needle as heredoc string
needle as null string
needle as second word of haystack
needle as single char
needle as special char
needle overlaps in haystack
needle position is counted from the beginning of haystack.
needle should be found
negate values
negative  values as permission
negative 'pad_size'
negative 'pad_size' sub array
negative 'pad_value'
negative DateInterval
negative float value
negative init value
negative integer
negative steps
negative value
negative values
negative/posative integer array
negative/posative integer key value array
negative/posative integers array
negative/positive integers array
nested FV's
never reached
new file size, should be same as before truncating delete all files created
new line chars embedded in strings
new line nulls
new line to separate the output between each element
new mandatory arg is not ok
new object created
new stat of the file, after a softlink to this file is created
next add plain text part
next prime number greater than -1000
next prime number greater than 10
nice, we have a transactional engine to play with
no __call, we have access
no auto increment column
no auto_increment column
no break, but then none is really needed either
no break, so control drops into next label's "group"
no chance to return int with the current PDO version - we are forced to return strings
no characters in second Argument
no checks on number of args
no compression
no data members
no date was parsed, so no errors
no db response  Code: 5  This may not even be an error, for example, the database command "shutdown" returns no response.
no default value, return NULL
no documents given  Code: 6 You're attempting to batch insert an empty array of documents.
no elements in doc  Code: 4  You're attempting to save a document with no fields.
no entries, never flushed
no functions defined on this file
no hostname, no port
no input variables bound
no inverse, outputs nothing, result is FALSE
no length and allowable tags provided, reads entire file
no longer set
no magic getters
no member functions
no message for any PDO call but...
no need for parens
no need to check the return value, will bail and make EXPECTF fail if need be
no needle should be found
no new message
no parameter
no real parser - any excotic setting can fool us
no result set, just output parameter
no result set, one input parameter, output parameter yes, I really do not want to bind input values...
no result set, one input, one output parameter
no result set, one output parameter
no segfault if this is commented out
no substitution
no suffix provided
no warning, but refers to different variable
no we must have removed them at some point - for BC, weakening the test
no worries - server might not support it
no, still bails out
no-such-property error handling goes here
no_index_used bad_index_used flushed_normal_sets flushed_ps_sets explicit_close implicit_close disconnect_close in_middle_of_command_close explicit_free_result implicit_free_result explicit_stmt_close implicit_stmt_close
non context resource
non existing dir
non existing file
non existing filename
non freed resultset
non freed stamement
non newtypes can't have constraints
non scalars that are unset
non stream context resource
non trivial tests require a message list for parent-child communication
non-Gregorian calendar that is locale-defined, required by ICU
non-PHP licenses
non-ascii characters
non-empty string prefix
non-existant element going in
non-existant variable going in
non-existent needle in haystack
non-existing file or dir
non-existing filename
non-existing linkname
non-existing needle in haystack
non-integer type of data resource type variable
non-leap year
non-long indexes
non-numeric offsets
non-persistent connection
non-root one
non-strict mode
non_result_set_queries - DDL
non_scalar values, objects, arrays, resources and boolean
none of the interfaces that exist are safe to use since technically any user code could implement them and the lazyiterables in hack do not follow the same rules.
nonexistent abstract class method
nonexistent function
nonexistent instance method
nonexistent interface method
nonexistent static method
nonexisting connect.
nonexistinghost add server.
nope: force explicit cast to int or string
nope: no strings, even numeric
nope: object
nope: string
nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
normal operation
normal sets
normal string
not a FCallAwait
not a doc comment
not all MySQL Server versions and/or engines might support the type
not allowed -- should desugar to X
not an uploaded file
not cgi spec to put query string on command line, but used by a couple tests to catch a security hole in older php versions.
not derived from Exception
not doc comment
not entirely sure why, but this if statement is needed to trigger an error in a naive implementation of the trivial strict equality check
not exactly what the bug is about, but closely related problem:
not following strict standards
not found, its a function
not found, private member
not in plan already and eligible for inclusion
not necessary, just to show the error sooner
not null because inheritance
not reached
not valid in ISO-8859-1
not what a human might actually expect.
note -- will always be null as DOMConfiguration is not implemented in PHP
note that a label must always precede a statement
note that gzclose is an alias to fclose.
note that gzeof is an alias to gzeof.
note that gzgets is an alias to fgets.
note that gzpassthru is an alias to fpassthru.
note that gzread is an alias to fread.
note that the data types are different
note that there is no savepoint my...
note the differences in the array keys
nothing created
nothing else.
nothing found
nothing should be escaped, it's a valid gbk character
nothing to do
notice this exceeds 32 bits
now a valid query
now check the size of unset variable when different modes are given
now close the file
now compare the real stream with the user stream
now delete the surdir and file and record the stat
now file pointer at end
now handle a SKIPIF section
now has 5 elements
now new stat of the dir after file is created
now point to 2
now point to 3
now really quit it
now second element
now test redis session handler on that port we expect not able to connect error, but no other warnings or notices
now the first and the last one
now the property is the only reference
now the same with a class that defines the property itself, that should give the expected strict warning.
now the same with a class that defines the property itself, too.
now the same with emulated PS
now the same with native PS
now try values that don't fit in long, on 32bit, new types should be sent or 0 will be inserted
now unlink file
now we do the test for a fatal error
now we need to find the location of web index file
now we will try to unset these variables
now, let's have two columns of different type and do type juggling
now, lets check the server variables
null argument
null array test
null as return value
null because no inheritance, so no access to protected member
null heardoc string
null here doc string
null heredoc string
null operand
null prefix
null statement
null test passing not exist and exist at the same time
null true if not exist with expiration
null values
null vlaues
null will convert to this and do what we expect
nullable arguments
number of formats in format strings not matching the no of variables
number of remaining entries in the table
numeric array
numeric as string
numeric assoc.
numeric in the form of string
numeric keys
numeric string
numeric value as glue, pieces as array containg sub array
numeric values
numerical assoc indices
numerics in the form of string
o - the argument is treated as an integer, and presented as an octal number.
object data
object declaration
object for 'input' argument
object of given type
object value
object variable
object which is unset
objects have the same resource, but they are not the same object.
objects of different classes
obscene high gid
octal as integer
octal integer data
octal integers
octal number
octal numeric string
octal representation
octal type variations
octal value
octal value of 83
octal values
of  bytes are read.
of arguments
of arrays than callback function argument
of bytes to be read.
of elements in the input array 3.
of throw clause
official test vectors
offset around 10 years
offset around 6 months
offset around 7 days
offset around a day
offset as negative value
offset as string, converts to zero
offset to large
offset value variations with length values
offset value, length value and preserve_key values variation
offsetSet is used for modifying an existing file, or adding a new file to a tar/zip archive.
ok raise a fatal:
ok tests methodIndexLookup and this variety of dynamic calls trying to exhause f_call_user_func_array cases
ok, 'type' is context sensitive
ok, because we might not be allowed to do this
ok, great we can create a file with a DSN in it
ok: typechecker catches it
ok: typechecker validates it
okay then php
okay to access const via class
okay to access instance property via instance
okay to access static method via class
okay to use a string containing class name
old server is gone
omit 1st and 3rd expressions
omit 2nd operand
omit all 3 expressions
on collision, last entry wins
on directory
on mysqlnd level this would not be allowed
on output this means output encoding fails.
one blank line
one can pass classes as arguments
one more than the expected number of arguments
one result set
one valid argument
only base name matters
only builtins set this
only caught by typechecker
only constructors can promote parameters
only if there is a reason
only invalid
only multi-dimensional array
only public, private or protected allowed
only reference to obj is in the closure
only special chars
only the local copy is changed
only-headers
opcode handlers by code
opcode helpers by name
opcode name to code mapping
open existent directory
open file for reading
open file in each access mode and get meta data
open in append mode
open the directory
open the directory with invalid path
open the directory with valid paths
open the file
open the file for reading
open the file in different modes and check the working of fgetc
open the file instead of directory
open the same directory again without closing it
openfiles One more than the maximum number of open file descriptors.
opening a file
opening file again in read mode
opening file for read
opening file in r/w mode
opening file resource type
opening the file "a" mode
opening the file "ab" mode
opening the file "at" mode
opening the file "w" mode
opening the file "wb" mode
opening the file "wt" mode
opening the file for reading
opening the file in "r" mode
opening the file in "rb" mode
opening the file in "rt" mode
opening the file in different modes
opening the file in different read modes
opening the non-existing file in "x" mode, file will be created
opening the non-existing file in "xb" mode, file will be created
opening the non-existing file in "xt" mode, file will be created
opens a regular connection
openssl 1.0 prepends the string "Full Name:" to the crlDistributionPoints array key.
optional arg is ok
optional functions
options for the curl handler
or .., otherwise FALSE
or FALSE if needle is not found.
or simply by using any other node.
order changes per machine
originally based on ext/standard/tests/file/stream_rfc2397_001.phpt
originally based on ext/standard/tests/file/stream_rfc2397_003.phpt
originally based on ext/standard/tests/file/stream_rfc2397_005.phpt
originally based on ext/standard/tests/file/stream_rfc2397_006.phpt
originally came from ext/standard/tests/general_functions/include_path.phpt
os: IANA number designating the Operating System on the machine referenced by this record.
other operators
other php outputs Permission Denied, p8 outputs no suck file or dir
other php.net bug outputs message File Exists
other prefixes
other types in a array
other types in an array
otherwise just use the offset.
our central interop server, where we can get the list of endpoints
our local endpoint, will always get added to the database for all tests
out of boundary integers
out of range
out of range, three warnings
output "123.10"
output a table of squares
output is in degrees
output of this goes through 2xml
output the picture to a file
outside of range int data
outside of whence range
overload fn with same visibility
override calendar's timezone
override count to force failure
override heap to force corruption by throwing exception in compare
override message
override message and code
overrides both offsetExists and offsetGet
overrides only offsetExists
overrides only offsetGet
overrides only offsetGet and offsetSet
overrule autocommit
overwrite data in middle of the file
overwrite first 400 bytes in the file
overwrite results and check if the cache magic works
own CharacterData, Comment
owner has read only, group and others have no permission
owner has read only, other and group has rwx
owner has rw only, group and others have no permission
owner has rw only, group has no permission and others have rwx
owner has rw only, other and group has rwx
paddingLength
param missing
param not a ressource
parameter This doc comment block generated by idl/sysdoc.php
parameter checking tests will be the same as fclose
parameter checking tests will be the same as fpassthru
parameter checking tests will be the same as fread
parameter checking tests will be the same as gzeof
parameter checking tests will be the same as gzgets
parameter substitution
parameters of helpers
parens are optional
parent class for preconditions
parent could be non-namespaced or be namespaced So get through all T_NS_SEPARATOR and T_STRING Last T_STRING before T_WHITESPACE will be parent name
parent name
parse all these files
parse error
parse error: expected expression
parse only .c and .cpp files
parses the sources and fetches its vars name, type and if they are initialized or not
parsing __CLASS__, __TRAIT__ and __FUNCTION__ tokens
parsing __FILE__ token
parsing __LINE__ and __METHOD__ tokens
partial.php
partially checked
partially typed array
partially typed return value
partially typed return value used here
pass uid without setting FT_UID option
pass-by-value creates second alias to first point
passed an array of referenced variables 2.
passing NULL has no effect
passing an invalid type to set
passing by reference explored further
passing invalid type arguments
passing long string as 'str' and testing default value of chunklen which is 76
passing more no.
passing more than required no.
passing the above condition may be the result of change in the system time.
passing zero argument
passwd The passwd element contains the group's password in an encrypted format.
passwd The passwd element contains the user's password in an encrypted format.
patched HHVM will issue a warning about double mailheader
path as spaces
path as well as suffix provided,
path containing numeric string
path to the php source tree
path with file extension and trailing slashes
path with only files and trailing slashes
path with spaces
pathname as NULL
pathname as an array
pathname as boolean
pathname as member of array
pathname as members of object
pathname as object
pathname as spaces
pathname containing numeric string
paths and suffix given as same
paths with basename only suffix, with suffix removal
paths with binary value to check if the function is binary safe
paths with hostname:dir notation, with suffix variation
paths with numeirc strings
paths with numeric strings
paths with shortcut home dir char, with suffix variation
paths with suffix and trailing slashes with suffix removal
paths with suffix removal
paypal with Cyrillic spoof characters
pdo_transaction_transitions should check this as well...
pear Tests: 678, Assertions: 678, Failures: 29, Skipped: 24.
pecl sapi and extensions
perform some cleanup
perform tests
perform the read file at least 6 char and check
performs dfs over the heap graph, starting from the given edges.
performs dfs over the heap graph, starting from the given nodes.
permissions are given as 2's complement of octal equivalent of 7777
permissions will be given as 2's complement form of -0777
permissions will be given as 2's complement form of -07777
permissions will be given as ocatal equivalent value of 0x777
permissions will be given as octal equivalent value of 777
permissions will be given as octal equivalent value of 7777
persistent connections cannot be closed but only be killed
pg_escape_literal/pg_escape_identifier
pgtextreverse
pgtextshort
php generates permission denied, we generate No such file or dir.
php.ini to use when executing php
php5 has this, we don't use it
php://input is backed by a MemFile
piece together a windows binary distro
pieces as NULL array
pieces as array containing sub array
pieces as array with strings values
pieces as arry with numeric values
please don't shorten this test.
point to a non-existent directory
pointless, but I need more documentation
polyndrome strings
populate array with 'default' keys in reverse order
populate new method record
populate reading material
populate the file with lines of data
port - optional TCP port number, default is the default port for that service flags - optional flags, see following table.
positional args should be typechecked
positive 'pad_size'
positive 'pad_value'
positive DateInterval
positive float value
positive integer
positive value
positive values
posotive steps
pre-fetched
precision The numeric precision of this column.
prefix with path separator of a non existing directory
prepare a holder for the test results
prepare stmt
prepend file:// as git refuses to do a shallow clone of 'local' repos
prepend the "glob://" prefix if it isn't there
pretty dump test, but that is the best way to mimic mysql.c
prevent notice
primary key
primitives are ok
print all children
print directly
print file pointer position before read
print results based on info in global variables
print test results
print the file contents
print the hearder
print, this is found set the found locale as current locale
printing the input array before the shuffle operation
printing the input array with integers before the shuffle operation
printing the input array with strings before the shuffle operation
prints "Hello, hello" in HPHP, but we disallow it because we don't like interpolated nested expressions
prints 1 ..
private constructor
private doesn't matter
private property
probably a prime
process all args for that level
process all traceback levels
process command line args
process file
process one traceback level
property This doc comment block generated by idl/sysdoc.php
protect against missing data
protected property
provoke an error to check if mysql_ping resets it
provoke an error to check if mysqli_ping resets it
public constructor not allowed
public property
public static property
push default reference score
put a side effect in the 1st operand
query with 0 rows
quote a non re portion of the string
raise a warning
re-assign reference variable to different value
read 14 Bytes from the WebP-File, that contains the header
read a char
read again to struck EOF
read all into cache
read an array
read an array with the filename
read an array, fails
read an invalid cert, fails
read cert as a binary string
read cert as a filename string
read cert as a string
read cert from a filename string
read cert from a resource
read charecter from different files which are opened in different modes
read data from the file and check, file pointer position, feof etc
read entire file and strip tags
read entire file and strip tags tags
read file by giving size more than its size
read from closed file
read from fie using fgetc, file opened using different read read modes
read from file
read from file, at least 7 chars
read from file, by giving the file actual size,
read more data than is available
read outstanding data
read rest of the line
read the header
read the line which is without csv fields, provide delimiter and see the working of fgetcsv
read the next 10
read to the end of the file
read with length beyong file size
reading 1000 bytes from file, expecting 1000 bytes
reading 1030 bytes from file, expecting 1024 bytes
reading data from the file after flushing
reading different data from file using different formats
reading file by giving less than its size
reading file when file pointer at end
reading the contents of the file after flushing
reading the data from the file
reading the values from file using different char formats
reading the values from file using different float formats
reading the values from file using different formats formats
reading the values from file using different hexa formats
reading the values from file using different integer formats
reading the values from file using different octal formats
reading the values from file using different scientific formats
reading the values from file using different string formats
reading the values from file using different unsigned formats
reading the values from file using different unsigned int formats
rearange the array
record the extension that the function belongs to
recursive reference
red dashed lines
redec class gen
reduce visibility to future, derived classes
reduction tests
redundant grouping parens
reenable cloning
reenabling should fail
reference array
reference passing
reference variable
reference variables
refresh msg numbers
reg - const
regardless of that, the test always crashes every time.
regular array
regular file name
regular string
regular strings
relative bad path
relative paths
relative test
release stringdata
remove all files in directory so can remove directory in CLEAN section
remove all permissions from dir
remove an item
remove existing license
remove file
remove files while going through directory
remove first element from array
remove hashbang
remove it from this instance
remove non-ASCII chars
remove one alias from second point
remove only alias from first point, so destructor runs
remove only alias from point, so destructor runs
remove only alias from second point, so destructor runs
remove only alias from third point, so destructor runs
remove temp files
remove the directory structure
remove the execute permisson from parent dir, allowing all permission for sub dir
remove the file
remove the property "color"
remove the temp file
remove the write and execute permisson from sub parent
remove write permission from file
removeKey allows unsetting any key, but it still must be statically known
removed, crash too
rename dirs across directories
rename files across directories
rename the link to a new name in the same dir
rename the src dir to a new dir in dest dir
renaming a directory
renaming a directory to numeric name
renaming a file
renaming a file and check stat
renaming a link
renaming existing file to numeric name
repeat check with full switch
repeat the data a few times so that it grows larger than the default cache chunk size and that we have something to seek around...
replace the string in array
report non-silenced errors
reports an error, according to its level
request to unset a declared accessible is OK
request to unset a non-existent is ignored
request to unset an inaccessible is ignored
requestIdB0
requestIdB1
require Circle.inc to get at the Circle class type, which in turn uses the Point type
require a file that has a return statement with a return value
require a file that has a return statement without a return value
require a file that has no return statement
require all sub iterators to be valid in iteration
require an existing file
require an existing file.
require another existing file that has its own namespace
required by most modern LDAP servers, use LDAPv3
reschedule to the lowest priority
reset for printing
reset pointer, start again on step one
reset the internal pointer to first element
reset the status to zero
reset value in case implicit conversion was successful
resize and negative value
resolve from use
resolve from use as
resolve fully qualified
resolve in global namespace
resolve in namespace
resolve runtime lookups
resolve runtime lookups with inheritance
resource  variable
resource data
resource type variable
resource value
resource var
resource variable
resource variable in string form
responsibility of subclasses
responsibility of using class
responsibility of using class, see chown_privates
restore detect_order to 'auto'
restricting parent directory
result set object
result_set_queries statistics
results in 3000
results in 6
results in NULL
results in the int 3 rather than the float 3.333...
retrieve all endpoints now
retrieve data
retrieve endpoints from the endpoint server
retrieve the results and put them into the endpoint info
retrieving htmlentities from the ANSI character table
retrieving htmlspecialchars from the ANSI character table
return all the locale found in the system
return all the locale found in the system, except for broken one
return byRef
return length - 1 always, expect false test invalid arguments : non-resources
return mime type ala mimetype extension
return string value
return the count of member variables in the object
return the key and value at index i for this container
return the size of the given container
return type
return type is an array
return undefined variable
return value not used
return without a value, so when included, NULL is returned
returning NULL for closures
returns A2 in WSDL
returns an array containing a record for each defined method.
returns an iterator of the appropriate type
returns element count in the resulting array after arguments are pushed to  beginning of the given array
returns element count in the resulting array after arguments are pushed to beginning of the given array
returns the key and value at given index
returns the length of a given string
returns the shape containing the full type information for this type constant.
rewind on a file handle which is already closed
rewind on a file handle which is unset
rewind the file and read the file  line by line with allowable tags
rewind the file pointer to beginning of the file
rewind the file pointer to bof
rewind the file so that for every foreach iteration the file pointer starts from bof
right-justification with spaces
rname: Email address of the administrative contain for this domain.
root namespace
root privileges are required to raise the msg_qbytes values above the system defined limit.
roundtrip with raw object
rss The maximum number of virtual pages resident in RAM maxproc The maximum number of processes that can be created for the real user ID of the calling process.
rubbish after the 'x:' prefix
run a single set of tests using above options
run all tests, ignore above options
run code on two command lines and look for differences
run diagnostic checks against one var.
run tests on a function.
run the command 'locale -a' to fetch all locales available in the system
run the command application
run the endpoint test
run-tests cannot test for a multiple Vary header
run-tests, I love you for not allowing me to set ini settings dynamically
runtime lookup
s - the argument is treated as and presented as a string.
same as COUNT_NORMAL
same as COUNT_RECURSIVE
same as above
same as above, using integer
same as doing 'a' instead of 0
same but OO interface
same id as finally
same test, with no reference to callback
sanity check with a virgin phar.zip
save new endpoints into database
save the wire
scalar argument
scalars that are unset
scientific notation
script name
script to upgrade PCRE.
search for resouce type in the resource array
second args a integer
second args as NULL
second args as boolean
second args as float
second args as string
second argument charlist as null - does not trim any white spaces
second code point
seconds to run any individual test for any framework
see about ...::class
see about :: in interfaces
see also hphp/hack/hhi/stdlib/builtins_tokens.php
see hphp/runtime/vm/bytecode.h:kMaxBuiltinArgs
see if included file can access including file's variables, and if including file can access the included file's functions and variables
see if internal pointer is in same position as referenced array
see if internal pointer is in the same position from when accessing this inner array
see if we're rounding negative numbers right
see mysqli.c for details
see pdo_mysql_stmt_unbuffered_2050.phpt for an explanation
see what happens if I jump into a if statement
seek forwards 20 bytes.
seek to start of file
seek to the end which is not sensible of course.
segfault here
segmentation fault
select from dual - pseudo table
select from existing table
self compile time lookup
self::X cannot be resolved
self::class is the 'use'r class at runtime
send row to parent
sentence as ending string
separate_zval_if_not_ref
separator for optional parameters
sequence point
serialization and not var_dump preserves whether keys are ints or strings
serialization of FS literals
serialization of FV literals
serialize an empty new object
serialize and unserialize
serialize defaults to TRUE which means that the message is serialized using the same mechanism as the session module before being sent to the queue.
serialize result
server and/or engine might not support the data type
server knows about it
server or engine might not support this
server should have the form:    The connection string always starts with mongodb://, to indicate it is a connection string in this form.
session_badconf_emptyprefix from pecl extension
session_badconf_prefix from pecl extension
session_basic.php from pecl extension tests
session_id initialisation
set URL and other appropriate options
set after client error
set config into environment, this allows executed tests to find out about the test configurations.
set default for non stored class name
set dynamic invisible property
set dynamic property
set dynamic property to an instance having a destructor
set file pointer to 0
set file pointer to eof
set it twice, checking if memory for the previous one is correctly freed
set locale to en_US.UTF-8
set of currency symbol according to above list of locales
set of locales to be used
set of possible flag values
set some options
set the 6th bit
set the background color to black
set the file pointer to 0
set the file pointer to EOF
set the file pointer to eof
set the options
set the url we want to use
set the value ot a new one
set to beginning of file
set to current system time
set to default handler
set to default value, with Invalid timestamps
set to new type
set up directory
set up environment
set up local endpoint
set up temp mailbox with  simple msgs
set up temp mailbox with 1 msg get an unset variable
set up temp mailbox with 1 simple msg
set up temp mailbox with 2 msgs
set up temp mailbox with 3 messages
set up temp mailbox with 3 msgs
set up temporary mailbox with one simple message
set visible property
set/get comparison
setAttribute used to disappear for no good reason.
setOption already throws a warning for bad values
setText resets the pointer
setting de interlace bit to off
setting the interlace bit to on
setting umask
setup for containers
setup temp mailbox
setup temp mailbox with 1 msg
shape with known and unknown fields, does not unify
shapes must have compile-time constant key names
shell The shell element contains the absolute path to the executable of the user's default shell.
shoud be available
should be an error
should be at the end and no notice
should be empty array, not null
should be equal to closing to my understanding
should be error
should be ignored
should be quivalent to octal 1
should be separated, i.e. not reference anymore.
should be: 81cafc260aa8d82956ebc6212a362ecc
should by unresolved type inside a typevar
should concatenate first and second title text nodes
should conflict
should constant propagate "heh" to here
should do nothing
should error because parent::open hasn't been called
should fail
should fail, foo is missing
should fail, strict mode
should fail.
should fatal
should give error, not be the same as 255
should have no effect
should not error
should not output 'bar'
should not throw syntax errors
should now read dir1 file
should pass
should print 'zero' test static array
should reached the end
should read dir2 file
should read the dir1 file
should read the file in script dir
should read the file in working dir
should read the file in working directory
should read the working dir file
should return a notice that the constant is already defined
should return one value key pair with key being in lowercase
should return one value key pair with key being in uppercase
should return same length
should still read dir1 file
should still work
should succeed, weak mode
should throw
should throw syntax errors
should use Atlantic/Azores
should work
should work if the thread id is correct
should work...
shouldn't be able to do this.
shouldn't be displayed
show body for msg 1
show default value is NULL
show final result
show lengths to help triage in case of failure expected headers since its CGI
show or not
show that attempts to use a non-existent property cause one to be created even in the absence of the __set/__get machinery.
show that when elses are nested, an else matches the lexically nearest preceding if that is allowed by the syntax
shown if system does not have hstrerror
shows 'Hello'
sign specifier on a negative integer
sign specifier on a positive integer
simple array
simple array test
simple case with missing element
simple checks
simple checks with trailing slashes
simple class with a variable and method
simple class with members - variable and method
simple heredoc string
simple metadata check
simple parameter test
simple paths
simple paths with trailing slashes
simplified version of static
simulate __sleep not having a return statement or returning nothing
simulate blocking I/O
simulate phpunit
simulates blocking I/O
single argument
single char
single char for needle
single character
single element
single line heredoc string
single quoted key
single quoted string
single quoted string value
single quoted strings
size of base dir
size of destination
size of destination after copy
size of destination before copy
size of file inside subdir
size of soft link fill data into file
size of source
size of source after copy
size of source before copy
size of subdir
size of the file
size of the source
size of the symlink itself
size value is more than the no.
size value is zero 4.
skip API version, phar flags, alias, metadata
skip a pointless test
skip body of the file
skip divide-by-zeros
skip empty blocks
skip results, don't fetch all from server
skip to end
skip two steps
skipping "./"
sleep for 5 seconds
sleep for a while to allow msg to be delivered
so compatible with it for now
so fgets will be called even if we are at the end of the file on last time to set the eof flag but it will fail to read.
so we run on different range of ports every time
soft link cannot test hard links unless you are root.
soft link name used
solution: referencing the first element first:
some bogus usage
some builds of php do not support this, silence the warning
some code here
some comment
some default seeks that will cause buffer/cache misses
some initial cases for the simplifier
some keys default, others not
some random tests used for debugging fast method call and various  invoke paths php53 means this feature cannot be tested under php 5.2
some short C-style comments interspersed with tokens
some simple examples
some undefined variable warnings
something found
something was created
sort the array, retain a temp.
sorting array_arg as whole array
sorting different strings: single quoted, double quoted and heredoc strings
sorting not supported for FV yet...
source filename of exception
source line of exception
source string must have fewer bytes then the smallest pattern above
source string must not have fewer bytes then the smallest pattern above
space as filename
space as key bool keys
space as linkname
special characters
special chars
special chars in string
special chars in strings
specify explicit key
specify explicit keys
specify testing
split so diff tool would pick me up
splits files in functions and calls the other functions
sscanf is a builtin that takes all additional args by ref.
stack The maximum size of the process stack, in bytes.
standard execution
standard integer representation
standard string output
start in list at this endpoint debug output
start invalid
start output buffering
start testing
start the buffering of next command to internal output buffer
start the test
start value variations with length values
stat contains 13 different values stored twice, can be accessed using  numeric and named keys, compare them to see they are same
stat of the dir created
stat of the file created
stat of the link created
statement call  after close
static call
static is class-specific
static method
static not allowed in constants
static properties irrelevent for conversion purposes
static::class is the 'use'r class at runtime
status check
status of daylight saving time unknown
std iterator
stderr is a pipe that the child will write to
stdin is a pipe that the child will read from
stdout is a pipe that the child will write to
step should be given as a positive number.
still AKempty, checked
still messages for everything else
still need to close it, not to leave a zombie behind
still not fine
still present
still set, even though passed in by reference and unset
still shows 'Hello'
still works...
stime - system time used by the current process.
stmt object status test
stop: otherwise hoistability would create an infinite loop
store current directory
store resources in array
store resources in array for comparison
store resources in array for comparison.
store the data in a regular file so that we can compare the results
store the info
stored function
stored proc which returns one result set
stored proc which returns two result sets
storing size of symlink in a local variable
str_rot13 expects 1 param and returns NULL when passed 2 params.
stream wrapper not found
strict Bad because duplicate variables on LHS
strict Because of the ordering here, things will fail to load if we don't properly mark A and C as not being hoistable
strict Case not exhaustive, but we're casing on a newtype, so it is fine.
strict Copyright 2004-present Facebook.
strict Correct usage of Shapes::keyExists
strict Hacky replacement XHP base class for testing.
strict If a class is declared abstract final then it cannot contain any abstract type constants
strict Lurrrrrrrrrrrr
strict Make sure we block this trickiness:
strict Make sure we can't instantiate enums
strict Non-literal index
strict Nonexisting field in ad-hoc shape
strict Nonexisting field in declared shape
strict Nonexisting field in intersection of ad-hoc shapes
strict Nonexisting field in intersection of declared shapes
strict Not matching return type of keyExists
strict Reason for shape type should point to the last operation that modified it
strict Removing field from intersection of shapes
strict Removing field from shape
strict Should be fine.
strict Should fail because C2::FOO is really a bool
strict Should fail because FOO is a newtype
strict Should fail because bool
strict Should fail because foo isn't an int or a string
strict Should fail because it doesn't match
strict Should fail because no constraint
strict Should fail because string isn't a supertype of int
strict Should work because foo is an int
strict Since finale class cannot be overridden, that also means their type constants cannot be overridden.
strict Test a bunch of sequencing things that don't cause errors.
strict Test for interface trying to implement
strict Test of expression dependent type of local variable for foreach
strict Test of expression dependent type of local variable for switch/case
strict Test of expression dependent type of local variable for try/catch/finally
strict Test that we check constraints for the 'as' part of newtypes
strict The test proves that it is safe to allow the 'this' type as a public property.
strict This file test is a basic test that new class_id produces a expression dependent type.
strict This file test the expression dependent type associated with local variables
strict This file tests expression dependent types for locals variables when integration occurs
strict This is an example of a pattern I see being useful with type constants
strict This test that expression display ids are properly reset All hh_shows should report the same output
strict This tests that using the 'this' type as an argument to a public instance method is safe.
strict Too few arguments
strict Using 'this' as an argument is kind of strange.
strict error: abstract type const
strict error: non-existent class
strict error: non-existent type constant
strict exn stands for extensible
strict mode
strict option OFF
strict option ON
strict type checking
string argument
string array
string as return value
string const
string containing control character
string containing control characters
string containing escape char
string containing simalr chars
string containing single quote
string data
string key/value
string keys
string not FooString
string representation
string type variations
string values
string with a space
string with backslash characters
string with backslashes
string with double backslashes
string with double quotes
string with hexadecimal number
string with html and php tags
string with newline character
string with nul character
string with nul characters
string with numbers
string with single quotes
string with special characters
string with special chars
string with tab character
string with value "f1"
string without any characters that can be backslashed
string1 and string2 of same "stream" type
strings and concat
strings containing escape chars
strings containing quotes
strings containing white spaces
strings notation of permission,  wont work properly
strings with different white spaces
strings with escape characters
strings with escape chars
strings with hexadecimal NULL
strings with octal NULL
strip all text nodes from this tree
strip off line terminator echo "len after rtrim:  " .
strip out prefix "convert.iconv."
strip white space and any "minus" signs
stripped-down version of overloading.php for inclusion in the spec
strlen currently does it's own hand-rolled type-checking because we emit a bytecode for it.
strlen of the string
sub array dumps the resulting array
sub node should be removed
sublcass of builtin class
submit to sandcastle
submodules end up with a file called .git.
subpatterns in parentheses
substr returns false on empty strings
subtyping works with tuples
succeeded involving constants
succeeds because all refs are closed
successfully close the directory handle so can delete in CLEAN section
suffix removal checks
suffix removal checks with trailing slashes
sum of array containing different float values
suppress errors as is generating a lot of "array to string" notices
suppress errors as won't be able to remove "." and ".." entries
swap two integers
switch warning on and test return value
switch..case, default
symlink to a non-existent path
symlink to a regular file using a relative dest
symlink to a regular file using an absolute path
symlink to a symlink using a relative path
symlink to a symlink using an absolute path
syntax error
systemlib can't have closures, so we get this...
table The name of this column's table as returned by the database.
table.inc will create a database connection and run some SQL queries, therefore the debug file should have entries
take on NULL by default
taking default args
taking lstat of symlink
taking references
target and port: hostname and port where the requested service can be found.
target: FQDN of the mail exchanger.
targetpattern.php
tcp The Transmission Control Protocol is a reliable, connection based, stream oriented, full duplex protocol.
tell should be 7, 29, 83, 100, 127, 142, 1142
temp dir created
temp dir created in present working directory
temp dir creating and deleting subdir and files in the dir
temp dir deleted
temp dir name used here
temp dir renaming a directory and check stat
temp dir touch a directory and check stat, there should be difference in atime
temp dir used
temp directory used here
temp dirname used
temp dirname used here
temp file created
temp file deleted
temp file name used here
temp file used
temp file used here
temp filename used
temp filename used here
temp files created
temp files created with this prefix the content that is filled into the temp files as created
temp link name used
temp link touch a link, check stat, there should be difference in atime
temperory array for checking unexpected behavior
temporary addition for Kent's setup, Win32 box
test 50 bytes to 50k
test CBC, ECB modes test encrypt decrypt test tripledes, aes test different lengths of key, iv test no iv being passed on CBC, ECB  test upto 32 bytes with unlimited strength
test HHVM_VERSION and HHVM_VERSION_ID matches
test IssetM
test UnsetM
test a successful flush
test a unsuccessful flush
test against non-class/non-interface "types" and even non-types
test all transitions before specified time range
test all transitions when PHP_INT_MIN is supplied and an end before the first transition
test all transitions when PHP_INT_MIN is supplied and an end just after the first transition
test alternate syntax
test begin after end of range equal
test begin and end of range equal
test begin and end of range equal to same transition time
test binary data transfer
test comment
test compression
test conversion to array type
test conversion to null type
test conversion to object type
test conversion to resource type
test conversion to string type
test conversion to these types
test copying of a phar with mounted entries
test doubles around -4e21
test elseif
test end of range equal to transition time
test equality of result
test fgetss with all read modes
test for equality
test for invalid values
test for stats of dir/file when their names are stored in an array
test for stats of dir/file when their names are stored in objects
test for stats of link when their names are stored in object and array
test for the correct behavior this time
test for valid values
test fread with file opened in "r" and "rb" mode only Content with numeric and strings with it
test freeing queue in RSHUTDOWN
test ftruncate with file opened in different modes
test if color exists and is accessible, or is dynamic
test if dummy exists and is accessible, or is dynamic
test if dynamic dummy exists
test if hidden exists and is accesible, or is dynamic
test if x exists and is accessible, or is dynamic
test invalid arguments : non-resources
test invalid values
test manually created array
test mapping for system function names
test memleaks here
test multi-char delimiter
test mysql_connect localhost
test mysql_connect localhost:port
test mysqli_connect 127.0.0.1
test mysqli_connect localhost:port
test mysqli_real_connect
test mysqli_real_connect compressed
test mysqli_real_connect with db
test mysqli_real_connect with port
test namespace prefix is also included
test namespace prefix is also included.
test non-existent file request
test only this endpoint
test only this method
test open for write with corrupted phar
test open for write with new phar
test packed array
test passing in the same variable where 1 is by value, the other is a different type and by reference so should be updated to the new type.
test portable POSIX characters 0..127
test relative directories and stream contexts.
test resource cleanup
test setlocale by specifying a specific locale as input
test simple function case
test simple text transfer
test single-char delimiter
test standard skipif sections
test start and end of range equal to transition time
test start of range equal to transition time
test that mb_ereg can match correctly when passed different character classes.
test that the logging is appending without newlines
test the effects of writing to a file on the stats of the file
test the effects on stats by changing permissions of a dir
test the effects on stats by changing permissions of link
test the effects on stats by deleting file/subdir from a dir
test the effects on stats with changing permissions of file
test the effects on stats with creating file/subdir in a dir
test the effects on stats with writing data into a  file
test the effects on the stats of dir/file for changing permissions of dir/file
test the stats of dir/file when their names are stored in objects
test the stats of file opened in write mode and then same in read mode
test these functions on array which is already unset
test too few and too many parameters
test use of list
test using a series of classes, some derived
test using a series of interfaces
test using variables that are not instances
test valid values
test validation
test without any error
test wordwrap by passing different values for break argument
test wordwrap by passing different values for width argument
testctag A processing instruction
testing RecursiveArrayIterator
testing UDF
testing array changing
testing chmod with a non-existing file
testing empty and isset on arrays
testing empty array, should no notice at all
testing exception scoping
testing loops scoping
testing on hard link
testing on soft link
testing scalar variables
testing static access for methods and properties in anon classes
testing sticky bit
testing that names existing on both sides of if is defined
testing traits in anon classes
tests FPushFunc
tests FPushFuncD
thank you Helgi
that runs for several whole lines
the "current" element as seen by the iterator is unmodified
the array is with  three elements in it.
the array is with three elements in it.
the array is with two elements in it.
the code has to be serialized and unserialized to get a deep copy
the config.h needs special care
the core dll
the correct answer is 'Baz'
the default gc root size is 10,000
the error doesn't show the filename but 'Unknown'
the exception thrown in this test results in a memory leak, which is fine
the first parameter is special
the first part isn't relevant generate the line offsets array
the first time you run this script you will be asked to  associate it with a program.
the following encoded-words are identical and are UTF-8 Japanese.
the following values may be ORed to it.
the important part here are the indexes 1 and 2
the lines below will catch by '__get' magic method since these variables are unavailable anymore
the main recursion function.
the mother of all interop tests
the namespaceURI is "http://www.w3.org/2000/xmlns/" and neither the  qualifiedName nor its prefix is "xmlns".
the next 2 generate java messages so we don't replicate the php messages
the null is successfully unwrapped
the occurrence of a postfix operator should have no impact on the parse of the rest of the expression.
the order of the array 2.
the problem does not occur with 1 field only selected.
the qualifiedName has a prefix and the  namespaceURI is null
the qualifiedName or its prefix is "xmlns" and the  namespaceURI is  different from  "http://www.w3.org/2000/xmlns/"
the redirect section allows a set of tests to be reused outside of a given test dir
the reference doesn't persist across the clone
the rest are fine...
the test executables settings, used for web tests
the timezone can be overridden when not specifying a calendar
the used file is actually irrelevant, so just use this file even though it's not an .ini
the way escape string differs from PostgreSQL 9.0
there is no diff and we can't extract username we cannot schedule sandcasstle job
these need parens
this bucket will trigger the segfault
this calls __set but not __get
this causes a segmentation fault
this change is in function context
this checks f,g,G conversion for snprintf/spprintf
this comment will be removed
this comment-like thingy really is part of the string literal
this could fail with shorter returns, but it never does...
this cycle echoes all associative array key where value equals "apple"
this definition escapes the clause
this definition escapes the clause, even with terminality
this depends on terminality calculation
this doesn't create the include dirs in this directory we change to this to ensure we are not part of the include paths.
this doesn't work, expected false
this else does NOT go with the outer if
this else does go with the outer if
this fails because the manifest length does not include the other 10 byte manifest data
this file has a wrong crc
this file is not used in the cron job use it to test the gcc regex with the sample data provided
this file may be duplicated to provide testing for multiple php binaries or configurations.
this gives invalid args to shell_exec
this grants you access to protected methods and members
this is a C-style comment ...
this is a token passed to all iterators so it can be invalidated.
this is an Apache Licensed font, see separate LICENSE file
this is an ISO-8859-1 circle R
this is an ISO-8859-1 umlaut
this is fine this is fine since it is a subdir of an allowed dir
this is name of the file
this is not fine any more since the file is not in the allowed dir set now
this is not fine since it is not a subdir of an allowed dir
this is not the same as "dummy"
this is ok:
this is where we actually store elements
this is wrong:
this key is in the sub-array
this line doesn't crash PHP
this line has no impact on test output on Windows
this line will crash CLI
this link won't get created
this makes ob_end_clean raise an error
this may stop working in future versions, but is here for code coverage purposes
this means there can be up to a .9 millisecond difference which will fail this test.
this might cause a warning - no index used
this must be a class, closure does not trigger segfault
this next line is for increased code coverage
this one also generates a java message rather than our own so we don't replicate php message
this one was already deleted from the cache
this returns false since we didn't pass any info to the constructor
this satisfies 1 line of code coverage
this satisfies another line of code coverage
this segfaulted before
this should be allowed
this should be an error, since it can never be true
this should be false
this should be flagged as an error
this should die -- Exception class must be abstract...
this should fail
this should produce an out of sync error
this should raise one more warning
this should repeat the same range
this should show an error, cause results are not buffered
this string is an excerpt of a phar archive that caused an infinite loop
this test ensures that our variance checks don't raise a false positive on `this`, which is implemented as a special `as` type constraint
this test randomly fails on Windows and this is the cause.
this test works fine with Expat but fails with libxml which we now use as default further investigation has shown that not only line count is skippet on CDATA sections but that libxml does also show different column numbers and byte positions depending on context and in opposition to what one would expect to see and what good old Expat reported just fine ...
this tests coverage of the case where the phar exists and has no files
this tests if the cache is working correctly, as the char tables must be rebuilt after the locale change
this throws an exception
this triggers the custom error handler
this variable to use with isset
this will always return null, but it's safe from type checking perspective, so no error
this will end up OK
this will end up crashing
this will fine
this will fine too
this will make conversion fail.
this works as expected
this works fine delete link
this::T is resolved as C::T, and D::T in case of unresolved type.
throw out any blank lines after these pattern
thrown exception in the callback
throws exception in pseudomain
time zone has priority
timestamp has to be some wednesday
to 9999 A.D.
to avoid trouble with  numeric ranges, lets pass the numbers as a string
to enable dir deletion
to ensure all elements are displayed get an unset variable
to ensure we include the file in RepoAuthoritative mode
to make sure that max_links is really set to one
to make sure the array's life cycle is correct
to make sure we have at least one working connection...
to thickness pixels.
todo ssl connections
too few arguments
too many arguments
too many parameter
top doesn't take any args, lets see what happens if we give it one
total number of tests run find max nested statement depth
totalmem The maximum size of the memory of the process, in bytes.
touch a file check stat, there should be difference in atime
tragically these work also
trailing separators
trailing white space is ignored
transitive lambda captures
translating single char
treated as a string
tries to find "lo, world" at start of string
trigger a generator
trigger error handler
trigger generator
trigger run
trim out newline since Map doesn't like them in its keys
trim with unset/null/boolean variable - retuns an empty string
true true if not exist
true, similar to 'abstract class'
true, true, false
truncate it
truncate it to half of its current size
truncate it to size 0
truncate the file created earlier in subdir, the size of the file is 12000bytes truncate the same file, in the loop , each time with the decrement in size by 1200 bytes, until -1200bytes size
truncate the file to its current filesize, size should not change
truncate the file to smaller size and display the content
truncate the file when file pointer is positioned at end of the file
try different locale names
try fgetc on files which are opened in non readable modes w, wb, wt, a, ab, at, x, xb, xt
try fgets on files which are opened in non readable modes w, wb, wt, a, ab, at, x, xb, xt
try fread when file pointer at end
try isset/unset/empty on a member function
try n delete the dir create the dir now
try n read a char, none expected
try n read a line, none expected
try not to segv when you have no arguments:
try now with traditional
try protected here
try reading from file which is having zero content create the file and then open in read mode and try reading
try reading the file opened in different modes of reading
try renaming a non existing file
try template dir
try the basic options
try to access non-existant elements
try to allocate something in that memory
try to draw a white ellipse
try to get dir handle
try to open 2 links
try to open 3 links
try to open, expected failure
try to override the context node
try to read
try to respect php.ini but make run time a soft limit
try to set invalid serialize_handler
try to trigger usual "match known text" optimization
try to truncate it and display the file content
try to truncate it to a negative size, size should not change
try to truncate it to size bigger then current
try to truncate it to while file pointer at the end
try to use stmt_affected_rows like stmt_num_rows
try uncompressing empty string
try various case combinations of keywords
ttl  "Time To Live" remaining for this record.
tvCoerceParamToStringInPlace
two arbitrary dates
two blank lines
two fields are needed.
two foreaches
two result sets
two valid multi-byte characters
two-dimensional assoc.
type  String containing the record type.
type aliases
type constant
type string  The current call type.
u - the argument is treated as an integer, and presented as an unsigned decimal number.
udp The User Datagram Protocol is a connectionless, unreliable, protocol with fixed record lengths.
ugly trick for ZEND_VM_DEFINE_OP
uid User ID of the user in numeric form.
uid User ID, should be the same as the uid parameter used when calling the function, and hence redundant.
umasking directory
umasking file
unallocated index
unbalanced tag, ignore it.
unbind twice
unbuffered result set
unchecked lvar
undefined  variable
undefined and unset vars
undefined attribute
undefined data
undefined object
undefined variable
undefined variable in string form
undefined/unset vars
unexpected argument type
unexpected arguments
unexpected no.
unexpected number of arguments
unhandled exception
unicode mode
unicode mode should throw a warning
unixifed path
unknown class
unknown type
unknown use is defaulted to value
unlink old test results
unlink the file
unlinking directory
unreachable:
unrechable, but make the typechecker happy.
unrelated parent method
unset a member and check
unset a variable
unset all properties
unset and dump the array containing all the resources to see that unset works correctly
unset bool vars and undefined var
unset data and return value
unset file handle
unset file type resource
unset object
unset the element
unset the file handle
unset the global var
unset the resource
unset the static var
unset the variable
unset the variable passed
unset the vars
unset the whole array
unset them to make it null.
unset variable
unset variables
unset/undefined  vars
unset/undefined arrays
unsets global "version"
unsets local "version" in current scope
unsetting data
unsigned int type variation
unsigned integer representation of a negative integer
unsigned integer representation of a positive integer
unsupported tags
until we find something better
unused 0x2000000
unusual data
up to level 5.
upload the file
uploaded file
urlencode so that non-ascii shows up parsable in phpt file
use :: notation, as a const is implicitly static
use Booleans for label values
use a prefix not used in context
use bin2hex to catch those cases were raw is true
use callee saved
use class properties
use get_class_methods to see effect if any
use groups of expressions
use if with an instance of a class
use isset to see that array is not set
use it like num_rows
use my handler
use recursion to implement a factorial function Note: can call a function prior to its definition
use stat on file created using "w" and "r" mode of fopen
use the context argument with include path
use unset/empty/isset to check the object
used by HACKLIB_iteratable.
used in result table output
used in result table output PRIVATE VARIABLES
used to count the number of charsets
used to flag a swap between good and bad 4 bad ones
used to trigger gc_collect_cycles
useful to implement methods like map to operate in a general manner the second optional option returns an ImmVector from a pair when the method warrants it
user Custom Element
user abstract class abstract function
user abstract class non-abstract function
user defined exception code
user exceptions.
user function
user interface method
user private instance method
user private static method
user public instance method
user public static method
user supplied data
username and password are specified, the constructor will attempt to authenticate the connection with the database before returning.
uses RenameFunction to ensure that all arguments are retained
using a collection to break out of hhas implementation
using built-in function 'chr' as 'callback'
using built-in function 'is_int' as 'callback'
using directly the sub_array as pieces
using language construct 'echo' as 'callback'
using language construct 'exit' as 'callback'
using only array_shift:
using other white spaces
using quote chars in sentence
using reasonable numbers for these operators.
using same name
using special chars in sentence
using xpath query with registered namespace.
utf8_strlen
utime - user time used by the current process.
valid 4 byte char - smiling face with heart-shaped eyes
valid expression
valid flags
valid html and php tags
valid stream context
valid, but vacuous, as it has no side effect and its value is not used
value defined in common base class
value of Z isn't available to the pre-class
value of l_onoff is not always 1, Darwin returns 128
value stored with string key
valueLengthB0
values stored with numeric index
values that equate to 1 2.
variable can have name
variable initialisation
variable value change shall have no impact
variables are binary
variadic arguments
variation of offset and length to point to same element
variation of start and length to point to same element
variations in multiplier as well as string to be repeated.
variations in string and multiplier as an integer
variations of three arguments with use of various extract types
variations of two arguments
variations with four arguments
variations with three arguments
variations with two arguments
various char formats
various combinations of arrays to be used for the test
various float formats
various formats
various hexa formats
various integer formats
various octal formats
various offsets
various read modes
various scientific formats
various string formats
various string inputs
various unsigned int formats
various utility functions
various write only modes
verify clone by calling method on new object
verify doc2 does not depend on doc1
verify that the algorithm works
verifying content stays
verifying private property
verifying protected property
verifying public property
very light-weight function to extract a single named file from a gzipped tarball.
very likely a bug, but someone could have done something on the server between the second last insert and the lock, therefore don't stop just bail
very likely we do have both of them...
vfsstream already provides isolation for unit tests, allow it
violate type inference via SetG
virtualmem The maximum size of the virtual memory for the process, in bytes.
visibility and static ordering unimportant
wait a bit to let the process finish
wait while mysql closes connection
warning, not an array
warnings are unhandy, lets go for exceptions for a second
warns and bails returning null
was Locale::VALID_LOCALE Show them.
we also need CURLOPT_VERBOSE to be set to test CURLOPT_STDERR properly
we also need to set CURLOPT_VERBOSE to test CURLOPT_STDERR properly
we are aiming for maximum compression to test MYSQLI_CLIENT_COMPRESS
we are lucky, we can run the test
we assume the above as test_mysqli_get_client_stats_table_1ed and in the following we check only those
we can turn it off
we cannot be sure which class this method corresponds to, so mark method as needing to be verified
we compare the results of fgets using differing line lengths to  test the fgets layer also
we do not have spl_autoload_registered yet
we don't need bigger
we eval the section so we can allow dynamic env vars for cgi testing
we expect a different return value than our input value typically the difference is only the type
we get "Catchable fatal error: saying Object of class could not be converted to string" by default when an object is passed instead of string.
we get "Catchable fatal error: saying Object of class could not be converted to string" by default when an object is passed instead of string: The error can be  avoided by choosing the __toString magix method as follows:
we get "Catchable fatal error: saying Object of class could not be converted to string" by default, when an object is passed instead of string.
we get "Catchable fatal error: saying Object of class could not be converted to string" by default, when an object is passed instead of string: The error can be  avoided by choosing the __toString magix method as follows:
we get "Catchable fatal error: saying Object of class needle could not be  converted to string" by default when an object is passed instead of string: The error can be  avoided by choosing the __toString magix method as follows:
we get "Catchable fatal error: saying Object of class needle could not be converted to string" by default when an object is passed instead of string: The error can be avoided by choosing the __toString magix method as follows:
we got this far without problems.
we have found a start tag
we have to trim as AES rounds the blocks and decrypt doesnt detect that
we know the type, position and name of this symbol, but we won't know where it's definition is
we might get the old handle
we need exclusive access for a moment
we need to skip this test_mysqli_get_client_stats_table_1 in unicode - we send set names utf8 during mysql_connect
we only want to know that src directory is in the include path
we really want to skip it...
we should add ruled when to expect them
we should never get here, we use warnings, but never trust a system...
we sohuld have no default link
we sohuld have no default link anymore
we want headers also, so fopen
we will repeat a max of 20 times
we're assuming loopback is 1.
weight: Ranking to weight which of commonly prioritized targets should be chosen at random.
werkt al niet meer
what about long values for a valid option ...
what gets interpreted.
when keys are different in terms of only case
when no offset is given, use read position.
when this task is fixed or o_id on static calls
when using CGI, strip the headers from the output
while not EOF
while this method returns an array containing the names of the two inherited, private properties and adds to that the one private property from the current class, serialize runs in the context o fthe type of the object given it.
while..., do..while, break, continue
white-space only / empty keys are skipped
whole 2-d array dumps the resulting array
whole array
width as -ne and cut as false
width as -ne and cut as true
width as zero and cut as false
width as zero and cut as true
will be initialized upon first access
will cause an error
will overwrite itself
will print "PATH:Array"
will return false as pattern would match half way through string
will return true as pattern matches from start of string
will stay as they are since their character codes are above 127 and they do not have a named entity representaion.
will throw an exception
windows system dlls that should not be bundled
windows, dev and rdev will not match this is expected
with 'callback' argument
with NULL as second Argument
with a different story with respect to unreachable code ...
with all args
with all possible arguments
with always_false callback function
with always_true callback function
with autoload options..
with boolean value as second Argument
with characters range as second Argument
with current handle delete temporary files
with defalut args
with default 'callback' argument
with default and optional arguments
with default args
with default args  check the file pointer position and if eof
with default argument
with default arguments
with default as well as optional arguments
with default callback
with default keys and boolean values
with default keys and numeric values
with default len value
with default length
with default numeric index
with default start and len value
with default start and len values
with different wildcard characters
with double quoted strings
with explicit compression level, length
with heredocs associative arrays
with hotname:dir notation
with incorrect callback function
with invalid PHP tags and invalid tokens
with invalid open tag for testing entire source to be unknown token
with length, delimiter  check the file pointer position and if eof
with more arguments
with multiple escape sequences as second Argument
with numbers range as second Argument
with one argument less than expected
with one more than the expected number of arguments
with only numbers
with optional arguments
with php open/close tags
with previous handle
with repeated needles
with single quoted strings
with single space as second Argument
with some special characters as second Argument
with specific length
with string key
with string key index
with three argument less than expected
with three arguments
with two argument less than expected
with two arguments
with type hints
with valid php tags and invalid tokens
with var args
with white space chars
with zero arguments
without "needle"
without a __wakeup method, any instance property present in the string takes on its default value.
without output buffering, the debug messages will cause all manner of warnings
without php open/close tags testing for T_INLINE_HTML
without quotes
without second Argument
without the correct inference of foo as an async generator, this would raise an error about an Awaitable being used dangerously
without wild-card char
work around for PHP 5.3.0 - 5.3.2 https://bugs.php.net/50731
works in php, not HHVM
works with/without use clause
would call with not AttrPublic
would call, not attr public
write .diff
write a blank line
write at the end of the file
write attribute_ns without start_element first
write data to the file
write header
write line of text
write some data to cause overflow
write some test files to test folder
write to a file in csv format
write to temp file
write-out the first 30 permutations
writes "goodbye", then destructors are called.
writing 100 bytes
writing a blank line
writing data to the file
writing object to the file
writing to an empty file
writing to the file
wrong crc32
wrong parameter count
wrong params
wrong resource type
wrting 6 bytes of data
x is not defined
x modes require that file does not exist
xml_parse_into_struct ..
yaml with some custom tags
yes, I know it goes to the wrong place
yippie - we can create databases etc.
you can add regression tests for your extension here the output of your test code has to be equal to the text in the --EXPECT-- section below for the tests to pass, differences between the output and the expected text are interpreted as failure see php5/tests/README for further information on writing regression tests
you can bind as many values as you want no matter if they can be replaced or not
you can resume using the cursor later, from where it was located, if more data were received.
you can specify a range of characters.
zend 5.5 doesn't warn on this access, but warns on all others
zend_fetch_var_address_helper
zend_vm_opcodes.c
zero argument
zero arguments
zero as argument
zero elements
zero gmp_sqrt
zero means no error occurred.
zero-padding works on strings too
zerovalue for width
zlib default
zlib format
